Project Gutenberg's The Year When Stardust Fell, by Raymond F. Jones

This eBook is for the use of anyone anywhere at no cost and with
almost no restrictions whatsoever.  You may copy it, give it away or
re-use it under the terms of the Project Gutenberg License included
with this eBook or online at www.gutenberg.org


Title: The Year When Stardust Fell

Author: Raymond F. Jones

Release Date: September 7, 2010 [EBook #33660]

Language: English


*** START OF THIS PROJECT GUTENBERG EBOOK THE YEAR WHEN STARDUST FELL ***




Produced by Greg Weeks, Roger L. Holda, Mary Meehan and
the Online Distributed Proofreading Team at
http://www.pgdp.net









                      The Year When Stardust Fell

                       _A Science Fiction Novel_

                          By Raymond F. Jones

[Transcriber note: Extensive research did not uncover any evidence that
the U.S. copyright on this publication was renewed.]


Jacket Design by James Heugh
Endpaper Design by Alex Schomburg

_Cecile Matschat, Editor
Carl Carmer, Consulting Editor_

THE JOHN C. WINSTON COMPANY
Philadelphia, Toronto

Copyright, 1958
By Raymond F. Jones

FIRST EDITION

_Made in the United States of America_

_To Laura Lee_




Contents


_Of Men of Science_

1. _The Comet_

2. _Breakdown_

3. _Power Failure_

4. _Disaster Spreads_

5. _Thief_

6. _The Scientist_

7. _Dust from the Stars_

8. _Attack_

9. _Judgment_

10. _Victory of the Dust_

11. _The Animals Are Sick_

12. _Decontamination_

13. _Stay Out of Town!_

14. _Mobilization_

15. _Battle_

16. _Black Victory_

17. _Balance of Nature_

18. _Witchcraft_

19. _Conquest of the Comet_

20. _Reconstruction_

_About the Author_




_Of Men of Science_


The story of man is the story--endlessly repeated--of a struggle:
between light and darkness, between knowledge and ignorance, between
good and evil, between men who would build and men who would destroy. It
is no more complicated than this.

That light, knowledge, good, and constructive men have had a small edge
in this struggle is attested to by our slow rise over the long millennia
of time. In taking stock of our successes, however, it is easy to assume
the victory has been won. Nothing could be further from the truth. This
is a contest that is never ended, nor can it be, as long as men are upon
the Earth.

While man has free choice, the elements of darkness, ignorance, evil and
destruction are available for him to choose, and there are times when
these seem the best alternatives.

At the end of the 18th century one of the greatest minds of all time was
destroyed by one stroke of a guillotine blade. The judge who presided at
the trial of the great French chemist Lavoisier is reported to have
said, "The Republic has no need of men of science."

Choices like this have often been made by the society of man. A turnoff
to darkness has been deliberately taken, superstition has been embraced
while knowledge has been destroyed.

When times are placid we assume such choices could result only from some
great insanity; that the men who made them had themselves known more
pleasant days. The truth is that there are extremes of circumstance
which could force almost any man to abandon that which he has always
held to be right and good, and only the very giants could stand up and
prove themselves unmoved.

Such giants may seem, in ordinary life, rather obscure. Illustrating
this are the people in this story: a somewhat pompous little mayor; a
professor of chemistry in a small-town college in the mountain west; a
minister of the gospel, who would be lost with a big-city congregation;
a sheriff who doesn't care what happens to him personally as long as he
sticks to the kind of rightness that has always worked; and a
high-school boy who learns what it means to do a man's work.

Such people are important, the most important people alive today. They
are the ones whose hands hold all that our culture has achieved when
catastrophe overtakes us.

The illusion of security is a vicious one. With physical comforts around
us, the abyss that is just beyond our walls is forgotten: the abyss of
outer space, beyond the paper-thin atmosphere shielding us; of the fires
in the earth beneath; of the hurricane winds beyond the horizon; of the
evil and insanity in the minds of many men.

The caveman dared not forget these abysses, nor the frontiersman, nor
the scientist who fought the witch hunters to bring forth a new truth of
Nature. But when we believe we are secure we do forget them.

In catastrophe, the most recent achievements of the race are the first
to go. When war comes, or mobs attack, or hurricanes strike, our science
and our arts are abandoned first. Necessity of survival seems to insist
that we cannot fool with things of the mind and of the soul when
destruction threatens the body. And so, "The Republic has no need of men
of science."

Emergency can take any form. Here is a story in which the mechanical
foundation of our culture is threatened. Whether the means of this
threat, as I have pictured it, could possibly occur, I do not know. I
know of no reason why it could not, if circumstances were right.

But more important, this is what happens to a small, college town caught
up in such disaster. How quickly do its people dispense with their men
of science and turn to superstition and mob rule for hope of survival?

It is perhaps not so apparent to those of us who have grown up with it,
but we have witnessed in our own time, under threat of calamity, the
decline of science before a blight of crash-priority engineering
technology. Today, we hear it faintly whispered, "The Republic has no
need of men of science."

Insofar as he represents the achievements of our race over the great
reaches of time, the scientist will always be needed if we are to retain
the foothold we have gained over Nature. The witch doctors and the
fortunetellers clamor for his niche and will gladly extend their
services if we wish to change our allegiance.

The story of THE YEAR WHEN STARDUST FELL is not a story of the distant
future or of the remote past. It is not a story of a never-never land
where fantastic happenings take place daily. It is a story of my town
and yours, of people like you and me and the mayor in townhall, his
sheriff on the corner, and the professor in the university--a story that
happens no later than tomorrow.

R. F. J.




Chapter 1. _The Comet_


The comet was the only thing in the whole sky. All the stars were
smothered by the light of its copper-yellow flame, and, although the sun
had set two hours ago, the Earth was lit as with the glow of a
thunderous dawn.

In Mayfield, Ken Maddox walked slowly along Main Street, avoiding
collisions with other people whose eyes were fixed on the object in the
sky. Ken had spent scores of hours observing the comet carefully, both
by naked eye and with his 12-inch reflecting telescope. Still he could
not keep from watching it as he picked his way along the street toward
the post office.

The comet had been approaching Earth for months, growing steadily to
bigger proportions in the sky, but tonight was a very special night, and
Mayfield was watching with increased awe and half-dread--as were
hundreds of thousands of other communities around the world.

Tonight, the Earth entered the comet's tail, and during the coming
winter would be swept continuously by its million-mile spread.

There was no visible change. The astronomers had cautioned that none was
to be expected. The Earth had passed through the tails of comets
before, although briefly, and none of the inhabitants had been
physically aware of the event.

This time there was a difference. As intangible as a mere suspicion, it
could yet be felt, and there was the expectancy of the unknown in the
air.

Ken prided himself on a scientific attitude, but it was hard not to
share the feelings of those around him that something momentous and
mysterious was taking place this night. There would be no quick passage
this time. Earth would lie within the tail for a period of over four
months as they both made their way about the sun.

Such close-lying orbits had never occurred before in the known history
of the world.

"It's frightening, isn't it?"

Ken was aware that he had stopped at the edge of a crowd in front of
Billings Drugstore, and beside him Maria Larsen was staring intently
upward as she spoke.

She was a small, blonde girl with intense blue eyes. Ken smiled
confidently and looked down at her. "No," he said. "It's a beautiful
thing. It's a kind of miracle that we should be alive when it happened.
No human beings have ever seen such a sight before."

Maria shivered faintly. "I wish I could feel that way. Do you think it
will get any bigger?"

"Yes. It will not reach its closest approach for over three months, yet.
Its approach is very slow so we won't notice much change."

"It is beautiful," Maria agreed slowly, "but, still, it's frightening.
I'll be glad when it's gone."

Ken laughed and tucked the girl's arm in his. There was something so
disturbingly serious about the Swedish girl, who was spending a year in
Mayfield with her parents. Her father, Dr. Larsen, was a visiting
professor of chemistry, engaged to teach this season at the State
Agricultural College in Mayfield. Ken's own father was head of the
chemistry department there.

"Come down to the post office with me to get some stamps," Ken said.
"Then I'll drive you home."

"It's closed. You can't get any stamps tonight."

"Maybe the boys in gray haven't been too busy watching the comet to
stock the stamp machine. Look out!" He pulled her back quickly as she
stepped from the curb. A wheezy car moved past, its driver completely
intent on his observation of the comet.

"Old Dad Martin's been trying to wrap that thing around a pole for 25
years," Ken said unhappily. "It looks like he's going to make it
tonight!"

Along the street, bystanders whistled at the aged driver, and
pedestrians yelled at one another to get out of the way. The car's
progress broke, for a moment, the sense of ominous concern that spread
over Main Street.

At the post office, Ken found Maria's prediction was right. The stamp
machine was empty.

"I have some at home," the girl said. "You're welcome to them."

"I need a lot. Mother's sending out some invitations."

"I'm sure I have enough. Papa says I'm supporting the postal department
with all the letters I write to everyone at home in Sweden."

"All right, I'll take you up on it. I'll get skinned if I don't get
them. I was supposed to pick them up this afternoon and I forgot all
about it."

"I thought I learned good English in the schools in Sweden," said Maria
wistfully, "but I don't seem to understand half what you say. This
'skinned'--what does that mean?"

"Nothing you need to worry about," Ken laughed. "If you would teach me
English the way you learned it, Miss Rymer would give me a lot better
marks in her class."

"Now I think you're making fun of me," said Maria.

"Not me. Believe me, I'm not! Hey, look what's coming down the street!
That's old Granny Wicks. I thought she had died a long time ago."

In front of the post office, an ancient white horse drew a light,
ramshackle wagon to a halt. From the seat, a small, wizened, old woman
looked at the crowd on the street. She dropped the reins in front of
her. Her eyes, set deeply in her wrinkled face, were bright and sharp as
a bird's, and moved with the same snapping motions.

From both sides of the street the bystanders watched her. Granny Wicks
was known to everyone in Mayfield. She was said to have been the first
white child born in the valley, almost a hundred years ago. At one time,
her horse and wagon were familiar, everyday sights on the streets, but
she seldom came to town any more.

Many people, like Ken, had had the vague impression that she was dead.

She appeared lively enough now as she scrambled down from the wagon seat
and moved across the sidewalk to the post office steps. She climbed
these and stood in front of the doors. Curiously, the crowd watched her.

"Listen to me, you!" she exclaimed suddenly. Her voice was high and
shrill, reminding Ken of an angry bird's. Maria looked at him
wonderingly, and he shrugged his shoulders.

"Don't ask me what she's up to. She's pulled some corkers in her time."

Granny Wicks looked over the gathering crowd. Then she pointed a bony
arm at the glowing comet. "You know what it means," she exclaimed
shrilly. "You feel it in your bones, and your hearts quiver with fear.
There's death in the sky, and an omen to all the inhabitants of the
Earth that destruction awaits men."

She stopped and glared. The laughter that had first greeted her gave
way to uneasiness as people glanced at their neighbors, then hastily at
the comet, and back to Granny Wicks. Some began moving away in
discomfort.

"You're scared to listen, eh?" Granny shrilled at them. "You're afraid
to know what's in store! Turn your backs then! Close your ears! You
can't change the signs in the heavens!"

A movement in the crowd caught Ken's eye. He saw the stout figure of
Sheriff Johnson moving toward the steps. The law officer stepped out in
front and approached Granny Wicks.

"Come on now, Granny," said Sheriff Johnson. "You wouldn't want to scare
folks out of a good night's sleep, would you?"

"You let me alone, Sam Johnson! I'm saying what I have to say, and
nobody's going to stop me. Listen to me, all of you! There's death in
Mayfield in the winter that's coming, and spring won't see one man in
ten left alive. Remember what I say. The stars have sent their
messenger...."

"Okay, Granny, let's go," said the Sheriff. "You've said your piece and
scared the daylights out of everybody. You'd better be getting on out to
your place before it gets dark. The comet won't light things up all
night. How's your supply of wood and coal for the winter, Granny? The
boys been getting it in for you?"

"I got plenty, Sam Johnson. More'n I'll need for this winter. Come
spring, I won't be around to be needing anything else from anybody.
Neither will you!"

The Sheriff watched as the old woman climbed to her wagon seat again.
Those standing nearby helped her gently. She took the reins and snapped
them at the weary horse.

"Take care of yourself, Granny!" someone called.

Sheriff Johnson stood silently on the steps until the wagon passed out
of sight around the corner of the block. Then he moved slowly by Ken and
Maria. He smiled grimly at Ken.

"It's bad enough to have that thing hanging up there in the sky without
that kind of talk." He glanced up for a moment. "It gives you the
willies. Sometimes I wonder, myself, if Granny isn't half-right."

There was a stillness in the street as the people slowly dispersed ahead
of the Sheriff. Voices were low, and the banter was gone. The yellow
light from the sky cast weird, bobbing shadows on the pavement and
against the buildings.

"Shall we go?" Maria asked. "This is giving me--what do you say?--the
creeps."

"It's crazy!" Ken exclaimed with a burst of feeling. "It shows what
ignorance of something new and strange can do. One feebleminded, old
woman can infect a whole crowd with her crazy superstitions, just
because they don't know any more about this thing than she does!"

"It's more than that," said Maria quietly. "It's the feeling that people
have always had about the world they find themselves in. It doesn't
matter how much you know about the ocean and the winds and the tides,
there is always a feeling of wonder and fear when you stand on the shore
and watch enormous waves pounding the rocks.

"Even if you know what makes the thunder and the lightning, you can't
watch a great storm without feeling very small and puny."

"Of course not," Ken said. "Astronomers feel all that when they look a
couple of billion light-years into space. Physicists know it when they
discover a new particle of matter. But _they_ don't go around muttering
about omens and signs. You can feel the strength of natural forces
without being scared to death.

"Maybe that's what marks the only real difference between witches and
scientists, after all! The first scientist was the guy who saw fire come
down from the sky and decided that was the answer to some of his
problems. The witch doctor was too scared of both the problem and the
answer to believe the problem could ever have a solution. So he
manufactured delusions to make himself and others think the problem
would just quietly go away. There are a lot of witch doctors still
operating and they're not all as easy to recognize as Granny Wicks!"

They reached Ken's car, and he held the door open for Maria. As he
climbed in his own side he said, "How about coming over to my place and
having a look at the comet through my telescope? You'll see something
really awe-inspiring then."

"I'd love to. Right now?"

"Sure." Ken started the car and swung away from the curb, keeping a
careful eye on the road, watching for any others like Dad Martin.

"Sometimes I think there will be a great many things I'll miss when we
go back to Sweden," Maria said thoughtfully, as she settled back in the
seat, enjoying the smooth, powerful ride of Ken's souped-up car.

Ken shot a quick glance at her. He felt a sudden sense of loss, as if he
had not realized before that their acquaintance was strictly temporary.
"I guess a lot of people here will miss the Larsens, too," he said
quietly. "What will you miss most of all?"

"The bigness of everything," said Maria. "The hundreds and hundreds of
miles of open country. The schoolboys with cars to cover the distance.
At home, a grown man is fortunate to have one. Papa had a very hard time
owning one."

"Why don't you persuade him to stay here? Mayfield's a darn good place
to live."

"I've tried already, but he says that when a man is grown he has too
many things to hold him to the place he's always known. He has promised,
however, to let me come back if I want to, after I finish the university
at home."

"That would be nice." Ken turned away, keeping his eyes intently on the
road. There was nothing else he could say.

He drove slowly up the long grade of College Avenue. His family lived in
an older house a block below the brow of College Hill. It gave a
pleasant view of the entire expanse of the valley in which Mayfield was
situated. The houses of the town ranged themselves in neat, orderly rows
below, and spread out on the other side of the business section. In the
distance, north and south, were the small farms where hay and dairy
stock and truck crops had been raised since pioneer times.

"I'll miss this, too," said Maria. "It's beautiful."

Ken wasn't listening to her, however. The car had begun to sputter
painfully as it took the curve leading off the avenue to Linwood Street
where Ken lived. He glanced at the heat indicator. The needle was almost
at the boiling point.

"For Pete's sake! The water must have leaked out of the radiator."

Ken pulled the car to the curb in front of the house and got out,
leaving the engine idling. He raised the hood and cautiously turned the
radiator cap with his handkerchief. A cloud of steam shot out, but when
he lifted the cap the water was not quite boiling, and there was plenty
of it.

Maria came up beside him. "Is something wrong?"

"You've got me there. The radiator's clean. The pump isn't more than two
months old. I checked the timing last Saturday. Something's gone sour to
make her heat up like that."

From across the street, his neighbor, Mr. Wilkins, approached with a
grin. "Looks like the same thing hit us both. Mine started boiling as I
came up the hill tonight. It's got me stumped."

"The circulation must be clogged," said Ken. "Either that or the timing
has slipped off. That's all it could be."

"Those were my ideas, too. Both wrong in my case. Let me know if you get
any other bright ones." He moved off with a pleasant wave of his hand.

"It will cool," said Ken to Maria. "By the time you're ready to leave
I'll be able to drive you home."

"I wouldn't want you to damage your car. I can walk."

"We'll see."

He led her around the house. In the center of the backyard loomed the
high, round dome of his amateur observatory. It was Ken's personal
pride, as well as that of the members of the Mayfield High Science Club,
who had helped build the shell and the mountings. The club used it every
Thursday night when the seeing was good.

Ken had ground the precision mirror alone. He had ground his first one,
a 4-inch glass, when he was a Boy Scout. Three years later he had
tackled the tremendous job of producing a 12-inch one. Professor Douglas
of the physics department at the college had pronounced it perfect.

Ken opened the door and switched on the light inside the dome. "Don't
mind the mess," he said. "I've been taking photographs of the comet for
the last month."

To Maria, who was used to the clutter of a laboratory, there was no
mess. She admired the beauty of the instrument Ken and his friends had
built. "Our university telescope isn't any better," she said.

"You can't tell by the plumbing," Ken laughed. "Better take a look at
the image before you pass judgment."

Skilfully, he swung the long tube around to the direction of the comet.
With the fine controls he centered the cross hairs of the eyepiece on
the blazing object in the sky.

"It's moving too fast to stay in range very long," he said.

Maria stepped to the observer's position. She gasped suddenly at the
image of the fiery monster hovering in the sky. Viewing the comet along
the axis of the tail, as the Earth lay at the edge of it, an observer's
vision was like that of a miniature, flaming sun with an offcenter halo
of pulsing, golden light.

To Maria, the comet seemed like something living. Slow, almost
imperceptible ripples in the glowing scarves of light made them sway as
if before some mighty, cosmic wind in space.

"It's beautiful," Maria murmured, "but it's terrible, too. No wonder the
ancients believed comets brought evil and death upon the Earth. I could
almost believe it, myself!"




Chapter 2. _Breakdown_


Ken Maddox could not remember a time when he had not wanted to become a
scientist. Maybe it started when his father first invited him to look
through a microscope. That was when he was a very small boy, but he
could still remember the revelation of that experience. He remembered
how it had seemed, on looking away from the lens, that the whole world
of normal vision was only a fragment of that which was hidden behind
curtains and shrouds and locked doors. Only men, like his father, with
special instruments and wisdom and knowledge, could ever hope to
understand the world of the unknown, which the ordinary person did not
even suspect.

Now, at sixteen, Ken was tall, with black hair that had an annoying curl
to it. He was husky enough to be the main asset of the football squad of
Mayfield High School in his senior year. He knew exactly where he was
going and what he was going to do. He would be one of those men who
lived beyond the mere surface of the world, and who would seek to
understand its deep and hidden meanings.

Ken thought of this as he watched Maria at the telescope. What a
difference between knowing the comet as this instrument showed it, and
with the knowledge revealed by modern astronomy, and knowing it as the
average person in Mayfield did.

Ken and Maria stayed in the observatory until the comet had almost
disappeared below the horizon. Mrs. Maddox brought a snack of sandwiches
and punch.

"I always do this when I see the observatory dome open," she said,
smiling. "I never know when Ken's going to quit his stargazing and come
in for the night."

"We're about through, Mom. I'll drive Maria over to her place and be
back in a little while."

"I'm going to loan him the stamps," Maria said.

Mrs. Maddox looked at Ken in mock severity. "You mean you forgot
_again_?"

"No--I remembered," Ken said lamely. "After the post office closed, that
is. Anyhow, Maria has plenty."

"Well," said Mrs. Maddox, "I know who's going to have to mail my
invitations if they're ever to get out in time for the party!"

After he and Maria had finished the snack, Ken started his car again.
The engine had cooled to normal temperature, but he watched the
indicator closely as he drove. Nothing seemed right about the action of
the car. The engine had turned over sluggishly when he pressed the
starter button, as if the battery were almost dead. Now it lugged
heavily, even when going downhill.

"The whole thing's haywire," Ken said irritably. "It acts like the
crankcase is full of sand or something."

"Let me walk the rest of the way," said Maria. "You take the car back,
and I'll bring the stamps over on my way to school in the morning."

"No, we're almost there. Nothing much more could go wrong than already
has."

When they reached Maria's place they found Professor and Mrs. Larsen
sitting on the porch.

"We've been watching the comet," Maria said excitedly. "Ken let me look
at it through his telescope."

"A remarkable event," said Professor Larsen. "I feel very fortunate to
be alive to witness it. My generation hasn't had this kind of privilege
before. I was a child when Halley's comet appeared."

"I've been trying to tell Maria what a lucky break this is, but she
agrees with Granny Wicks," said Ken.

"Oh, I do not!" Maria snapped.

"Granny Wicks?" Professor Larsen inquired. "Your grandmother?"

"No." Ken tried to cover the professor's lack of familiarity with
American idioms. "She's just the town's oldest citizen. Everybody likes
her and calls her Granny, but her mind belongs to the Middle Ages."

"You hear that, Papa?" cried Maria. "Her mind belongs to the Middle
Ages, and he says I'm like Granny Wicks!"

Maria's mother laughed gently. "I'm sure Ken didn't mean your mind is of
the Middle Ages, too, dear."

Ken flushed. "Of course not. What I mean is that Granny Wicks thinks the
comet is something mysterious and full of omens, and Maria says she sort
of thinks the same about it."

"I didn't say anything about omens and signs!"

"Well, except for that...."

"Except for that, I suppose we are all in agreement," said Professor
Larsen slowly. He drew on his pipe and it glowed brightly in the
darkness. "The whole universe is a terrible place that barely tolerates
living organisms. Almost without exception it is filled with great suns
that are flaming, atomic furnaces, or dead cinders of planets to which a
scrap of poisonous atmosphere may cling. Yes, it is indeed a great
miracle that here in this corner of the universe conditions exist where
living things have found a foothold. We may be glad that this is so, but
it does not pay man to ever forget the fierceness of the home in which
he lives. Earth is merely one room of that home, on the pleasant, sunny
side of the house. But the whole universe is his home."

"That's the thing I've been trying to say," Ken answered. "We can know
this without being afraid."

Maria's father nodded. "Yes. Fear is of no use to anyone. Awe, respect,
admiration, wonder, humility--these are all necessary. But not fear."

Maria turned from the group. "I'll bring the stamps, Ken," she said.

"Won't you come in and have some cake?" Mrs. Larsen asked.

"No, thanks. Mother fed us before we left my place. I'm afraid I
couldn't eat any more."

In a moment Maria was back. "Here are two whole sheets," she said. "I
hope that will be enough."

"Plenty. I'll see you get repaid tomorrow. Good night, everybody."

"Good night, Ken."

He moved down the walk toward his car and got in. When he pressed die
starter button the engine groaned for a few seconds and came to a
complete stop. He tried again; there was only a momentary, protesting
grind.

Ken got out and raised the hood and leaned over the engine in disgusted
contemplation. There was no visible clue to the cause of the trouble.

"Is your battery dead?" Professor Larsen called.

"No. It's something else." Ken slammed the hood harder than he had
intended. "I'll have to leave it here overnight and pick it up in the
morning."

"I can push you home with my car, or at least give you a ride."

"No, please don't bother," Ken said. "I'll tow it home with Dad's car
tomorrow. I'd just as soon walk, now. It's only a few blocks."

"As you wish. Good night, Ken."

"Good night, Professor."

       *       *       *       *       *

Ken's clock radio woke him the next morning. He reached over to shut off
the newscast it carried. There was only one item any commentator talked
about now, the comet. Ken wondered how they could get away with a
repetition of the same thing, over and over, but they seemed able to get
an audience as long as they kept the proper tone of semi-hysteria in
their voices.

As his hand touched the dial to switch it off, something new caught
Ken's attention. "A curious story is coming in from all parts of the
country this morning," the announcer said. "Auto mechanics are reporting
a sudden, unusually brisk business. No one knows the reason, but there
seems to be a virtual epidemic of car breakdowns. Some garagemen are
said to be blaming new additives in gasoline and lubricating oil. It is
reported that one major oil company is undertaking an investigation of
these charges, but, in the meantime, no one really seems to have a good
answer.

"In connection with the comet, however, from widely scattered areas
comes the report that people are even blaming these engine failures on
our poor, old comet. In the Middle Ages they blamed comets for
everything from soured cream to fallen kingdoms. Maybe this modern age
isn't so different, after all. At any rate, this comet will no doubt be
happy to get back into open space, where there are no Earthmen to blame
it for all their accidents and shortcomings!"

Ken switched off the radio and lay back on the pillow. That was a real
choice one--blaming the comet for car breakdowns! Page Granny Wicks!

The breakdowns were curious, however. There was no good reason why there
should be a sudden rash of them. He wondered if they had actually
occurred, or if the story was just the work of some reporter trying to
make something out of his own inability to get into a couple of garages
that were swamped by the usual weekend rush. This was most likely the
case.

However it didn't explain why his own car had suddenly conked out, Ken
thought irritably. He'd have to get it over to Art Matthews' garage as
soon as school was out.

At school that morning there was little talk of anything but the comet.
After physics class, Ken was met by Joe Walton and three other members
of the science club, of which Ken was president.

"We want a special meeting," said Joe. "We've just had the most
brilliant brainstorm of our brief careers."

"It had better be more brilliant than the last one," said Ken. "That
drained the club treasury of its last peso."

"I was watching the comet last night, and I began to smell the dust of
its tail as the Earth moved into it...."

"You must have been smelling something a lot more powerful than comet
dust."

"I said to myself--why don't we collect some of that stuff and bottle it
and see what it's made of? What do you think?" Joe asked eagerly.

Ken scowled. "Just how many molecules of material from the comet's tail
do you think there are in the atmosphere over Mayfield right now?"

"How do I know? Six--maybe eight."

Ken laughed. "You're crazy, anyway. What have you got in mind?"

"I'm not sure," Joe answered seriously. "We know the comet's tail is so
rarefied that it resembles a pretty fair vacuum, but it _is_ composed of
something. As it mixes with the atmosphere we ought to be able to
determine the changing makeup of the air and get a pretty good idea of
the composition of the comet's tail. This is a chance nobody's ever had
before--and maybe never will again, until we go right out there in
spaceships--being right inside a comet's tail long enough to analyze
it!"

"It sounds like a terrific project," Ken admitted. "The universities
will all be doing it, of course, but it would still be a neat trick if
we could bring it off. Maybe Dad and Professor Larsen will have ideas on
how we could do it."

"We ought to be able to make most of the equipment," said Joe, "so it
shouldn't be too expensive. Anyway, we'll have a meeting then, right
after school?"

"Yes--no, wait. The engine in my car conked out. I've got to go over to
Art's with it this afternoon. You go ahead without me. Kick the idea
around and let me know what's decided. I'll go along with anything short
of mortgaging the football field."

"Okay," said Joe. "I don't see why you don't just sell that hunk of junk
and get a real automobile. You've got a good excuse now. This breakdown
is a good omen!"

"Don't talk to me about omens!"

       *       *       *       *       *

Art Matthews had the best equipped garage in town, and was a sort of
unofficial godfather to all the hot-rodders in the county. He helped
them plane the heads of their cars. He got their special cams and
carburetor and manifold assemblies wholesale, and he gave them fatherly
advice about using their heads when they were behind the wheel.

Ken called him at noon. "I've got troubles, Art," he said. "Can I bring
the car over after school?"

"I'm afraid I can't do a thing for you today," Art Matthews said. "I
don't know what's happened, but I've had tow calls all day. Right now
the shop is full and they're stacked four-high outside. I'm going to do
a couple of highway patrol cars and Doc Adams'. I figured they ought to
have priority."

Ken felt a sudden, uneasy sense of recognition. This was the same kind
of thing he had heard about on the radio that morning! A rash of car
breakdowns all over the country. Now, the same thing in Mayfield!

"What's wrong with them?" he asked the mechanic. "Why is everybody
coming in with trouble at the same time?"

"They're not coming in," said Art. "I'm having to go out after them. I
don't know yet what's wrong. They heat up and stall. It's the craziest
thing I've run into in 30 years of garage work."

"Mine acted the same way," Ken said.

"Yeah? Well, you're in good company. Listen, why don't you and maybe Joe
and Al come down and give me a hand after school? I'll never get on top
here without some help. After we get these police and other priority
cars out of the way, maybe we can get a quick look at what's wrong with
yours."

"It's a deal."

Joe Walton wasn't much in favor of spending that afternoon and an
unknown number of others in Art's garage; he was too overwhelmed by the
idea of analyzing the material of the comet's tail. However Art had done
all of them too many favors in the past to ignore his call for help.

"The trouble with this town," Joe said, "is that three-fourths of the
so-called automobiles running around the streets belong down at
Thompson's Auto Wrecking."

Al Miner agreed to come, too. When they reached the garage after school
they saw Art had not been exaggerating. His place was surrounded by
stalled cars, and the street outside was lined with them in both
directions. Ken borrowed the tow truck and brought his own car back from
the Larsens'. By that time the other two boys were at work.

"Batteries are all okay," Art told him. "Some of these engines will turn
over, but most of them won't budge. I've jerked a couple of heads, but
I can't see anything. I want you to take the pans off and take down the
bearings to see if they're frozen. That's what they act like. When
that's done, we'll take it from there."

Ken hoisted the front end of one of the police cars and slid under it on
a creeper. Art's electric impact wrenches were all in use, so he began
the laborious removal of the pan bolts by hand. He had scarcely started
when he heard a yell from Joe who was beneath the other police car.

"What's the matter?" Art called.

"Come here! Look at this!"

The others crowded around, peering under the car. Joe banged and pried
at one of the bearings, still clinging to the crankshaft after the cap
had been removed.

"Don't do that!" Art shouted at him. "You'll jimmy up the crankshaft!"

"Mr. Matthews," Joe said solemnly, "this here crankshaft has been
jimmied up just as much as it's ever going to get jimmied. These
bearings are welded solid. They'll have to be machined off!"

"Nothing could freeze them to the shaft that hard," Art exclaimed.

Joe moved out of the way. Art crawled under and tapped the bearing. He
pried at it with a chisel. Then he applied a cold chisel and pounded.
The bearing metal came away chip by chip, but the bulk of it clung to
the shaft as if welded.

"I've never seen anything like that before in my life!" Art came out
from beneath the car.

"What do you think could cause it?" Joe asked.

"Gas!" said Art vehemently. "The awful gas they're putting out these
days. They put everything into it except sulphur and molasses, and they
expect an engine to run. Additives, they call 'em! Detergents! Why can't
they sell us plain old gasoline?"

Ken watched from a distance behind the group. He looked at the silent,
motionless cars in uneasy speculation. He recalled again the radio
announcement of that morning. Maybe it _could_ be something they were
adding to the gas or oil, as Art said. It couldn't, however, happen so
suddenly--not all over the country. Not in New York, Montgomery,
Alabama, San Francisco, and Mayfield. Not all at the same time.

Art turned up the shop lights. Outside, as the sun lowered in the sky,
the glow of the comet began turning the landscape a copper-yellow hue.
Its light came through the broad doors of the garage and spread over the
half-dismantled cars.

"All right, let's go," said Art. His voice held a kind of false
cheeriness, as if something far beyond his comprehension had passed
before him and he was at a loss to meet it or even understand it.

"Let's go," he said again. "Loosen all those connecting rods and get the
shafts out. We'll see what happens when we try to pull the pistons."




Chapter 3. _Power Failure_


The news broadcasts the following morning were less hysterical than
previously. Because the news itself was far more serious, the announcers
found it unnecessary to inject artificial notes of urgency.

Ken listened to his bedside radio as he watched the first tint of dawn
above the hills east of the valley. "The flurry of mechanical failures,
which was reported yesterday, has reached alarming proportions," the
announcer said. "During the past 24 hours garages in every section of
the nation have been flooded with calls. From the other side of the
Atlantic reports indicate the existence of a similar situation in Europe
and in the British Isles.

"Automobile breakdowns are not the most serious accidents that are
taking place. Other forms of machinery are also being affected. A crack
train of the Southern Pacific came to a halt last night in the Arizona
desert. All efforts of the crew to repair the stalled engine were
fruitless. A new one had to be brought up in order for the passengers to
continue on their way early this morning.

"From Las Vegas comes word that one of the huge generators at Hoover Dam
has been taken out of service because of mechanical failure. Three other
large municipalities have had similar service interruptions. These are
Rochester, New York, Clinton, Missouri, and Bakersfield, California.

"Attempts have been made to find some authoritative comment on the
situation from scientists and Government officials. So far, no one has
been willing to commit himself to an opinion as to the cause of this
unexplained and dangerously growing phenomenon.

"Yesterday it was jokingly whispered that the comet was responsible.
Today, although no authority can be found to verify it, the rumor
persists that leading scientists are seriously considering the
possibility that the comet may actually have something to do with the
breakdowns."

Ken turned off the radio and lay back with his hands beneath his head,
staring at the ceiling. His first impulse was to ridicule again this
fantastic idea about the comet. Yet, there had to be _some_ explanation.

He had seen enough of the engines in Art's garage last night to know
they had suffered no ordinary mechanical disorder. Something had
happened to them that had never happened to engines before, as far as he
knew. The crankshafts were immovable in their bearings. The pistons had
been frozen tight in the cylinders when they tried to remove some of
them. Every moving part was welded to its mating piece as solidly as if
the whole engine had been heated to the very edge of melting and then
allowed to cool.

Apparently something similar was happening to engines in every part of
the world. It could only mean that some common factor was at work in
London, and Paris, and Cairo, and Mayfield. The only such factor newly
invading the environment of every city on the globe was the comet.

It would almost require a belief in witchcraft to admit the comet might
be responsible!

Ken arose and dressed slowly. By the time he was finished he heard his
father's call to breakfast from downstairs.

Professor Maddox was already seated when Ken entered the dining room. He
was a tall, spare man with an appearance of intense absorption in
everything about him.

He glanced up and nodded a pleasant good morning as Ken approached. "I
hear you worked overtime as an auto mechanic last night," he said.
"Isn't that a bit rough, along with the load you're carrying at school?"

"Art asked us to do him a favor. Haven't you seen what's been happening
around town?"

"I noticed an unusual number of cars around the garage, and I wondered
about it. Has everyone decided to take care of their winter repairs at
the same time?"

"Haven't you heard the radio, either, Dad?"

"No. I've been working on my new paper for the _Chemical Journal_ until
midnight for the last week. What has the radio got to do with your work
as a mechanic?"

Quickly, Ken outlined to his father the events he had heard reported the
past two days. "It's not only automobiles, but trains, power plants,
ships, everything--"

Professor Maddox looked as if he could scarcely believe Ken was not
joking. "That would certainly be a strange set of coincidences," he said
finally, "provided the reports are true, of course."

"It's true, all right," said Ken. "It's not a matter of coincidence.
Something is causing it to happen!"

"What could that possibly be?"

"There's talk about the comet having something to do with it."

Professor Maddox almost choked on his spoonful of cereal. "Ken," he
laughed finally, "I thought you were such a stickler for rigid,
scientific methods and hypotheses! What's happened to all your rigor?"

Ken looked down at the tablecloth. "I know it sounds ridiculous, like
something out of the dim past, when they blamed comets for corns, and
broken legs, and lost battles. Maybe this time it isn't so crazy when
you stop to think about it, and it's absolutely the only new factor
which could have some worldwide effect."

"How could it have any effect at all--worldwide or otherwise?" Professor
Maddox demanded.

"The whole world is immersed in its tail."

"And that tail is so tenuous that our senses do not even detect the
fact!"

"That doesn't mean it couldn't have some kind of effect."

"Such as stopping engines? Well, you're a pretty good mechanic. Just
what did the comet do to all these stalled pieces of machinery?"

Ken felt his father was being unfair, yet he could scarcely blame him
for not taking the hypothesis seriously. "I don't know what the comet
did--or could do--" he said in a low voice. "I just know I've never seen
any engines like those we took apart last night."

In detail, he described to his father the appearance of the engine parts
they had dismantled. "I brought home some samples of metal we cut from
the engine blocks with a torch. Would you take them up to the laboratory
at the college and have them examined under the electron microscope?"

"I wouldn't have time to run any such tests for several days. If you are
intent on pursuing this thing, however, I'll tell you what I'll do. You
and your science club friends can come up and use the equipment
yourselves."

"We don't know how!"

"I'll arrange for one of the teaching fellows to show you how to prepare
metallic samples and operate the electron microscope."

Ken's eyes lighted. "Gee, that would be great if you would do that, Dad!
Will you, really?"

"Come around after school today. I'll see that someone is there to help
you."

Art Matthews was disappointed when Ken called and said none of the
science club members would be around that afternoon. He couldn't keep
from showing in his voice that he felt they were letting him down.

"It's not any use trying to get those engines running," Ken said. "The
pistons would never come out of most of them without being drilled out.
We're not equipped for that. Even if we got things loosened up and
running again, what would keep the same thing from happening again?
That's what we've got to find out."

Art was unable to accept this point of view. He held a bewildered but
insistent belief that something ought to be done about the mounting pile
of disabled cars outside his garage. "We can get some of them going,
Ken. You fellows have got to lend a hand. I can't tackle it without
help."

"I'm sorry," Ken said. "We're convinced there's got to be another way to
get at the problem."

"All right. You guys do whatever you figure you've got to do. I can
probably round up some other help."

Ken hung up, wishing he had been able to make Art understand, but the
mechanic would probably be the last person in Mayfield to accept that
the comet could have any possible connection with the frozen engines.

As Ken walked to school that morning he estimated that at least 25
percent of the cars in Mayfield must be out of commission. Some of the
men in his neighborhood were in their driveways futilely punching their
starters while their engines moaned protestingly or refused to turn over
at all. Others were peering under the hoods, shaking their heads, and
calling across the yards to their neighbors.

In the street, some cars were lugging with great difficulty, but others
moved swiftly along without any evidence of trouble. Ken wondered how
there could be such a difference, and if some might prove immune, so to
speak, to the effect.

He had called a meeting of the club in the chemistry laboratory for an
hour before the first class. All of the members were there when he
arrived.

Ken called the meeting to order at once. "I guess you've all heard the
news broadcasts, and you know what's happening here in town," he said.
"Yesterday you talked about the possibility of collecting samples and
analyzing the material of the comet's tail. I don't know what you
decided. You can fill me in later on that. The problem is a lot more
important now than it was yesterday.

"It's beginning to seem as if the presence of the comet may actually be
responsible for the wave of mechanical failures. Finding out how and why
is just about the biggest problem in the whole world right now."

A babble of exclamations and protests arose immediately from the other
members of the group. Al Miner and Dave Whitaker were on their feet. Ted
Watkins waved a hand and shouted, "Don't tell us you're swallowing that
superstitious junk!"

Ken held up a hand. "One at a time. We haven't got all day, and there's
a lot of ground to cover. Ted, what's your comment?"

"My comment is that anybody's got a screw loose if he believes the
comet's got anything to do with all those cars being in Art's garage.
That stuff went out of fashion after the days of old Salem."

Several of the others nodded vigorously as Ted spoke.

"I guess we do need to bring some of you up to date on the background
material," said Ken. "Joe, tell them what we found last night."

Briefly, Joe Walton described the engines they had dismantled.
"Something had happened to them," he said, "which had never happened to
an engine since Ford drove his first horseless carriage down Main
Street."

"It doesn't mean anything!" exclaimed Ted. "No matter what it is, we
haven't any basis for tying it to the comet."

"Can you name any other universal factor that could account for it?" Ken
asked. "We have an effect that appears suddenly in Mayfield, Chicago,
Paris, and Cairo. Some people say it's the additives in gasoline, but
you don't get them showing up simultaneously in all parts of the world.
There is no other factor common to every locality where the mechanical
failures have occurred, except the comet.

"So I called this meeting to suggest that we expand our project beyond
anything we previously had in mind. I suggest we try to determine the
exact relationship between the breakdowns and the appearance of the
comet."

Big Dave Whitaker, sitting at the edge of the room, rose slowly in his
seat. "You've got the cart before the horse," he said. "You've got a
nice theory all set up and you want us to beat our brains out trying to
prove it. Now, take me. I've got a theory that little green men from
Mars have landed and are being sucked into the air intake of the
engines. Prove my theory first, why don't you?"

Ken grinned good-naturedly. "I stand corrected, but I won't back down
very far. I won't suggest we try to prove the connection with the comet,
but I do propose to set up some experiments to discover if there is any
relationship. If there is, then what it is. Does that suit you?"

"I'll go along with that. How do you propose to go about it?"

"Let's find out where the rest stand," said Ken. "How about it, you
guys?"

"I'll go for it," said Ted, "as long as we aren't out to prove a
medieval superstition."

One by one, the others nodded agreement. Joe Walton said intensely,
"We'll find out whether it's superstition or not! There's no other
possible cause, and we'll prove it before we're through."

Ken smiled and waved him down. "We're working on a hypothesis only.
Anyway, here's what I have to suggest by way of procedure: Since the
tail of the comet is so rarefied, there aren't many molecules of it in
the atmosphere of this entire valley. I don't know just what the
mathematical chances of getting a measurable sample are. Maybe you can
work out some figures on it, Dave. We'll have to handle an enormous
volume of air, so let's get a blower as large as we can get our hands on
and funnel the air through some electrically charged filters. We can
wash down these filters with a solvent of some kind periodically and
distill whatever has collected on them."

"You won't get enough to fill the left eye of a virus suffering from
arrested development," said Ted.

"We'll find out when we get set up," said Ken. "My father has agreed to
give us access to the electron microscope at the college. Maybe we can
use their new mass spectrograph to help analyze whatever we collect."

"If we knew how to use a mass spectrograph," said Ted.

"He's offered to let one of the teaching fellows help us."

"What will all this prove, even if we do find something?" Dave asked.
"You'll get all kinds of lines from a spectrogram of atmospheric dust.
So what?"

"If we should get some lines that we can't identify, and if we should
get those same lines from metallic specimens taken from the disabled
engines, we would have evidence of the presence of a new factor. Then we
could proceed with a determination of what effect, if any, this factor
has on the engines."

Ken looked around the group once more. "Any comments, suggestions,
arguments? There being none, we'll consider the project approved, and
get to work this afternoon."

As they left to go to their first classes, Ted shook his head gloomily.
"Man, you don't know what you're biting off! All we've done so far is
build a few ham radios, a telescope, and some Geiger counters. You're
talking about precision work now, and I mean _pree_-cision!"

Throughout the day Ken, too, felt increasing doubts about their ability
to carry off the project. It would be a task of tremendous delicacy to
analyze such microscopic samples as they might succeed in obtaining.
Microchemical methods would be necessary, and none of them had had any
experience in that field. His father was an expert with these methods
and though he might scold them for tackling such a difficult project,
he'd help them, Ken thought. He always had.

This was no ordinary project, however. Ken had no idea how seriously
scientists in general were considering the comet as the offender, but
certainly they must be working frantically on the problem of the
mechanical disorder. Unless they found another cause very soon, they
were certain to turn to an analysis of the comet's tail. It would be
very satisfying if Ken's group could actually be in the vanguard of such
a development.

He tried to ridicule his own conviction that the comet held the key. He
had no reason whatever for such a belief, except the fact of the comet's
universal presence. How it could stop an automobile engine or a railroad
train was beyond his wildest imaginings.

But there was nothing else. Nothing at all.

On the way home after school, there seemed to Ken to be a subtle change
that had come over the valley since morning. Along the streets, cars
were parked in front of houses to which they did not belong. Little
knots of people were standing about, talking in hushed tones. The comet
was aflame in the sky.

There seemed to be not merely an awe and an uneasiness in the people,
but a genuine fear that Ken could not help absorbing as he moved past
them on the sidewalks. Their faces were yellow and flat under the glare
of the comet, and they looked at him and at each other as if they were
strangers in an alien land.

Almost without being aware of it, Ken found himself running the last
half-block before he reached his own home. He burst in the door and
called out with forced cheeriness, "Hi, Mom, what's cooking? I'm
starved. The whole gang's coming over in a few minutes. I hope you've
got something for them."

His mother came out of the kitchen, her face gray with uncertainty.
"You'll have to do with sandwiches this afternoon," she said. "I haven't
been able to use the electric stove since noon."

Ken stared at her.

"There's something about the power," she went on. "We haven't any
lights, either. They say the power station at Collin's Dam went out of
commission this morning. They don't know when they'll be able to get it
back on."




Chapter 4. _Disaster Spreads_


While he stood, shocked by his mother's statement, Ken heard the phone
ringing in the next room. On battery power at the telephone central
office, he thought.

His mother answered, and there was a pause. "Professor Maddox is at the
college," she said. "You can probably reach him there, or I can give him
your message when he comes home."

She returned to the doorway. "That was the power company. They want your
father and Dr. Douglas to have a look at their generators.

"Ken, what do you think this means?" she asked worriedly. "What will
happen if all our power goes off and doesn't come back on? Do you think
your father has any idea what's causing the trouble?"

Ken shook his head. "I don't know, Mom. So far, nobody seems to know
anything."

In less than 15 minutes, Professor Maddox hurried into the house.
"Couldn't get my car going," he said. "It's stalled on the campus
parking lot. The power company wants me to go to Collin's Dam."

"I know," said Mrs. Maddox. "They called here."

He paused a moment, staring out the window, a look of bewilderment on
his face. "This thing seems to be more serious than I would have
believed possible. There's just no explanation for it, none at all!"

"Any chance of my going along, Dad?" Ken said.

"I'm afraid not. We're going in Dr. Larsen's car, and it's half loaded
with instruments. I hope we make it there and back without breaking
down.

"I'll probably be back early this evening, but don't hold dinner on my
account."

"There will be only sandwiches," said Ken's mother. "I can't cook
anything."

"Of course. Just leave me some of whatever you have."

From the doorway Ken watched his father and the other two scientists. He
thought he detected a loginess in the engine as Professor Larsen drove
away from the curb.

What they hoped to accomplish, Ken didn't know, but he felt certain they
would find the same thing in the generators that had been found in the
automobile engines. The bearings were probably frozen so tight that they
and the shaft had become one solid piece of metal. He hoped the
scientists would bring back some samples of the metal.

By 4 o'clock all the members of the science club had arrived. They met
in what Ken called his "science shack," a small building next to the
observatory. Here he kept the amateur radio equipment belonging to the
club, and his own personal collections in the several different fields
in which he had been interested since his Boy Scout days.

In each of his companions, Ken could see the effect of the feeling that
now pervaded the town. Their usual horseplay was almost forgotten, and
their faces were sober to the point of fear.

"We aren't going to be able to run our blower by electricity," said Joe
Walton. "We can't even get power for the precipitating filters."

"Let's scrounge anything we can find that runs on gasoline or coal oil,"
said Al Miner. "If we act fast we ought to be able to pick up some old
motorcycle engines or some power lawn mowers from the dump. Thompson's
have probably got some. We can try people's basements, too. Let's get as
many as possible, because we don't know how long any one will last, and
we may have to run the blower for weeks, in order to get any kind of
sample."

"Good idea," said Ken. "Here's something else: Who's got a car left to
gather this stuff in?"

The boys looked at each other.

"Ours was still running this morning," Frank Abrams said, "but I won't
guarantee how long we can count on it."

"Pretty soon there won't be any we can count on. We've got to get a
horse and wagon before they start selling for as much as a new Cadillac
used to."

"My uncle's got one on his farm," said Dave Whitaker. "He would probably
loan it to me, but he's five miles out of town."

"Take my bike," said Ken. "See if he'll let you borrow it and a wagon
for at least a couple of weeks or longer. Bring some bales of hay, too."

"Right now?"

"Right now."

When Dave had gone, Al said, "What about the blower? Anybody know where
we can get one of those?"

"I think there's one at Thompson's," said Ted. "They pulled it out of
Pete and Mary's restaurant when they remodeled."

"That would be just a little kitchen blower. Not big enough--we need a
man-sized one."

Ken said, after a long pause, "There isn't one in town. The chances of
getting one from somewhere else are practically zero. Frederick is 50
miles away and by tomorrow there may not be a car in town that would go
that far."

"Look," said Al, "how about the air-conditioning systems in town? There
isn't one that's any good where it is, now. Both the high school and the
college have big ones. I'll bet we could get permission at either place
to revamp the intake and outlet ducts so we could put in our filters and
precipitators. Your father and his friends could swing it for us at the
college."

"You might be right! It's worth trying. For precipitators we can rig a
battery-powered system that will put a few thousand volts on the
screens. Art will let us have enough car batteries for that. I think
we're set!"

       *       *       *       *       *

Dave Whitaker did not return until dusk, but he had succeeded in getting
the horse and wagon, and a load of hay. He deposited this in his own
yard before driving back to Ken's place.

During the next two or three hours the boys found two old motorcycle
engines, a power lawn-mower motor, and one old gasoline-powered washing
machine. All of these they took down to Art Matthews' place and begged
him for space and tools to overhaul the equipment.

"You can have the whole joint," Art said dejectedly. "This pile of junk
will never move!" He waved a hand at the cars lined up and down both
sides of the streets near his place.

By 9 o'clock they had succeeded in getting all of the small engines
running, but they dared not test them too long, hoping to conserve all
possible life that might be left. When they were through, they returned
to Ken's house. Mrs. Maddox had sandwiches ready for them.

No word had been heard from the three scientists who had gone to the
power plant. Maria called, anxious about her father.

"I'm worried, Ken," she said. "What would happen to them out there if
the car breaks down and they have no place to go?"

"They'll be all right," Ken reassured her. "They probably found
something bigger than they expected at the dam. If they should have
trouble with the car they can find a phone along the road at some
farmhouse and let us know."

"I can't help worrying," said Maria. "Everything feels so strange
tonight, just the way it does before a big thunderstorm, as if something
terrible were going to happen!"

Ken sensed the way she felt. It was all he could do to hold back the
same reaction within himself, but he knew it must be far more difficult
for Maria, being in a foreign country among strangers with customs she
didn't understand.

"Why don't you and your mother come over here until they get back?" he
asked.

"Suppose they don't come back at all? Tonight, I mean."

"Then you can sleep here. Mom's got plenty of room."

"I'll ask Mamma. If it's all right with her, we'll be right over."

Ken hoped they would come. He found himself concerned beyond all reason
that Maria and her mother should be made comfortable and relieved of
their worries.

He went out to the backyard again, where all the other members of the
club were still lounging on the grass, watching the sky. The comet was
twenty degrees above the horizon, although the sun had long since set
below the western mountains. No one seemed to feel this was a night for
sleeping.

"Let's try your battery portable for a few minutes," said Joe Walton.
"I'd like to know what's going on in the rest of the world."

Ken brought it out and turned it on. The local station was off the air,
of course, and so was the one in Frederick. Half the power there came
from the Collin's Dam. More than one-third of the usual stations were
missing, but Ken finally picked up one coming in clearly from the
northern tip of the state.

The announcer didn't sound like an announcer. He sounded like an
ordinary man in the midst of a great and personal tragedy.

"Over three-fourths of the cars in the United States," he was saying,
"are now estimated to be out of commission. The truck transportation
system of the country has all but broken down. The railroads have
likewise suffered from this unbelievable phenomenon.

"All machinery which involves rolling or sliding contact between metal
parts has been more or less affected. Those equipped with roller
bearings are holding up longer than those equipped with bushings, but
all are gradually failing.

"In New York City half the power capacity has gone out of commission.
Some emergency units have been thrown into operation, but these cannot
carry the load, and even some of them have failed. Elsewhere, across the
nation, the story is similar. In Chicago, Kansas City, St. Louis,
Washington, San Francisco--the power systems are breaking down along
with motor and rail transportation.

"For some hours now, the President and his Cabinet have been in session
with dozens of scientific leaders trying to find an explanation and a
cure for this disastrous failure of machinery. Rumors which were
broadcast widely this morning concerning possible effects of the comet
have been thoroughly discredited by these scientists, who call them
superstitions belonging back in the Middle Ages.

"One final report has just come over the air by shortwave. In the
Atlantic Ocean the Italian steamer _White Bird_ has radioed frantically
that her engines are dead. Over eight hundred passengers and crew are
aboard.

"All ship sailings have been canceled since noon today. Vessels at sea
are returning to nearest port. There is no ship available which can take
off the stranded passengers and crew of the _White Bird_. She floats
helpless and alone tonight in the middle of the Atlantic Ocean.

"As a power-conservation measure, broadcasting on this network will
cease until midnight, eastern standard time. Turn your radios off. Keep
all unnecessary lights off. Avoid consumption of power in every possible
way. Be with us again at midnight for the latest news and information."

There was a restlessness in all of Mayfield. None of the townspeople
felt like sleeping that night. Ken's group watched the comet until it
disappeared below the horizon. Some of them observed it through the
telescope. On either side of the Maddoxes' yard the voices of neighbors
could be heard under the night sky, speaking in hushed tones of the
thing that had happened.

Maria and Mrs. Larsen arrived, and Maria joined Ken and his friends in
the backyard. He told her what they had heard on the radio.

"That ship ..." Maria said slowly. "The _White Bird_, out there alone in
the ocean--what will become of all those people?"

Ken shook his head slowly. "There's no way to get to them. There's not a
thing that can be done. Nothing at all."

They remained quiet for a long time, as if each were thinking his own
thoughts about the mystery and loneliness and death riding the forsaken
ship in the middle of the ocean, and how soon it might be that the same
dark shadow settled over the cities and towns.

Maria thought of her far-off homeland, and the people she knew, suddenly
frightened and helpless in their inability to get power and food.

Ken thought of the scenes that must be occurring in the big cities of
the United States. People everywhere would not be sleeping tonight. They
were all citizens of a civilization that was dependent for its life on
turning wheels and on power surging through bright wires across hundreds
of miles of open country. Without those turning wheels, and the power in
those wires there was no food, there was no warmth, there was no life.

They listened to the radio again at midnight. There was little that was
new. The President's council had found no solution, nor had they come to
any decisions. Scattered riots and public disorders were springing up,
both in Europe and America. On the high seas, the captain of the _White
Bird_ was begging for assistance, demanding to know what had happened
that no ship could be sent to his aid.

Word finally came from Ken's father and his companions that their car
had failed after leaving the dam to return home. They had reached a
farmhouse where they would spend the rest of the night. They would try
to find some kind of transportation in the morning.

In the early-morning hours Ken's friends drifted away, one by one, to
their own homes, and as dawn approached, Ken finally went up to his own
room and slept. Maria and her mother, with Ken's mother, had retired
only a short time earlier.

When he awoke at 9 o'clock Ken had no idea whether or not the school
officials planned to hold classes that day, but he felt that for himself
and the other members of the science club there would be no return to
normal activity for a long time. Since his father would not return for
an indefinite time Ken determined to approach President Lewis of the
college regarding the use of the idle blower and ventilation ducts in
the Science Hall.

He had met President Lewis a number of times and believed the president
would listen to him.

Another matter had disturbed Ken since last night. As soon as he was
awake he called the office of Mayor Hilliard. The Mayor's secretary
answered and said, "Mayor Hilliard is in conference. He will not be
available today."

Ken hesitated. "Tell him it is the Maddox residence calling. I think
Mayor Hilliard will answer."

In a moment the Mayor's voice boomed on the phone. Normally hearty, it
was now weighted with overtones of uncertainty and fear. "Professor
Maddox, I was just about to call you. Would you...."

"This is not Professor Maddox," said Ken. "I'm his son, Kenneth."

"My secretary said...." The Mayor sounded angry now, although he knew
Ken well.

"I didn't say my father was calling," said Ken. "I've got something to
say that I think you will want to hear, and it will take only a minute."

"All right. Go ahead."

"In a day or two the entire town is going to be without power,
transportation, or communication with the outside world. The science
club of the high school has a 1000-watt amateur transmitter that can
reach any point in the United States and most foreign countries. It
requires power. We can operate from batteries, and I would like to ask
you to authorize that all automobile batteries and those belonging to
the telephone company be immediately seized by the city and placed in
official custody, to be used for emergency communication purposes only.
They should be drained of electrolyte and properly stored."

"I appreciate that suggestion," the Mayor said. "I think it's a good
one. Would you boys be able to take care of that?"

"We'd be glad to."

"It's your assignment, then. We are calling a town meeting tonight in
the college auditorium. We especially want your father to be there if he
can, and we'll issue orders for the battery conservation program at that
time."

By noon Ken had gained an interview with President Lewis and had
received permission for his group to make use of the largest blower on
the campus for their air-sampling project. They loaded their tools and
themselves into the ancient wagon belonging to Dave Whitaker's uncle and
spent the rest of the day working at Science Hall.

Ken's father called again to report they had succeeded in renting a
horse and buggy at an exorbitant price from a farmer. When told of the
town meeting that evening, he promised to try to reach Mayfield in time.

Ten minutes before the 8 o'clock deadline, Professor Maddox drew up in
front of the house. He called to Ken without even getting down from the
seat of the wagon. "Get your mother, and let's go!"

Mrs. Maddox appeared, worried and concerned. "You've had nothing to
eat," she protested. "At least come in and have a sandwich and a glass
of milk. It's not cold, but it's fresh."

"No." Professor Maddox shook his head. "We don't want to miss any of the
meeting. Get a coat and come along. It will be chilly later."

Maria and her mother came also. The small wagon was loaded to capacity
as it moved slowly up the hill toward the campus. People were streaming
toward the auditorium from all directions. Most of them were afoot. A
few others had found a horse and wagon. A dozen or two cars chugged
protestingly up the hill, but it appeared that most of these would not
be operating another 24 hours.

As they approached the hall, Professor Maddox chuckled and pointed a
finger ahead of them. "Look there. I'm sure that every citizen of
Mayfield is present or accounted for, now."

Ken glanced in the direction of his father's gesture. The creaky wagon
of Granny Wicks was drawn slowly along by her emaciated horse. Granny's
stick-thin body jounced harshly on the rough seat. Ken fought against a
ridiculous uneasiness as he recognized her.

He knew his father had not heard Granny's speech on the post office
steps, but he was little surprised when his father said, "I'm afraid
Granny Wicks, with her profound knowledge of omens and signs, is about
as much an authority on this matter as any of the rest of us here
tonight!"




Chapter 5. _Thief_


The hall was already filled. Several scores of chairs had been placed in
the corridors, and these were occupied also. People were being ushered
to nearby classrooms where they would hear the proceedings over the
school's public-address system.

"It looks as if we'll have to get it by remote pickup," said Ken. At
that moment Sally Teasdale, the Mayor's secretary, spotted their group
and hurried over.

"Mayor Hilliard told me to watch for you," she said. "He wants you to
sit on the platform, Professor Maddox, and also Dr. Douglas and Dr.
Larsen. The others of your party can sit in the wings."

Professor Maddox agreed and they followed Sally to the stage entrance.
The platform was already occupied by the Mayor and the town councilmen,
the college department heads, and leading citizens of Mayfield. The
professors took their places, while Ken and the others found chairs in
the wings. It was the best seat in the house, Ken decided. They could
see both the platform and the audience below.

It was undoubtedly the largest group that had ever gathered in one place
in Mayfield. In spite of the enormous number present it was a solemn
group. There was almost no talking or jostling. To Ken, it seemed the
faces about him had a uniform appearance of bewildered searching for
reassurance that nothing could really destroy the way of life they had
always known.

Mayor Hilliard arose and called the meeting to order. "I think everyone
knows why we've been called here," he said. "Because of the nature of
the circumstances I think it appropriate that we ask Dr. Aylesworth,
pastor of the Community Church, to offer prayer."

Heads were bowed in reverent silence as Dr. Aylesworth stood before the
assembly and offered a solemn invocation that their deliberations might
receive divine guidance, and their minds be filled with wisdom to combat
the evil that had come upon them.

The minister was a big, ruddy-faced man with a lion's mane of white
hair. The unwavering authority of his voice filled the audience with the
conviction that they were better prepared to face their problems when he
had resumed his seat.

Mayor Hilliard outlined the worldwide situation as he had obtained it
through news reports up to an hour ago. He described the desperate
situation of the nation's larger cities. Their food supplies were
sufficient for only a few days without any replenishment by rail and
truck transportation. Ninety percent of automobile traffic had ceased.
The railroads were attempting to conserve their rolling stock, but 70
percent of it was out of commission, and the remainder could not be
expected to operate longer than a few days. Air traffic had stopped
entirely. On the oceans, only sailing vessels continued to move.

"Mayfield is already cut off," the Mayor went on. "Our last train went
through here 30 hours ago. The trucking companies out of Frederick have
suspended operations. We have no cars or trucks of our own here in town,
on which we can depend. We're on our own.

"So far, the scientists have found no solution. Tomorrow, they may find
one. Or it may be 10 years before they do. In the meantime, we have to
figure out how we, here in Mayfield, are going to carry on.

"Our first consideration is, of course, food supplies. The Council met
this morning, and we have appointed a committee to take immediate
possession of all foodstuffs and every facility for food production
within the entire valley. Beginning tomorrow morning, this committee
will begin to accumulate all food supplies into one or more central
warehouses where they will be inventoried for rationing.

"All stocks of fresh meat will be salted and cured. Home supplies will
be limited to no more than a week's needs of any one item. Hoarders who
persist in their unfair activities will be ordered to leave the
community.

"My fellow citizens, these are stringent and severe regulations, but we
are not facing a time of mild inconvenience. It may well be that in this
coming winter we shall be literally fighting for our very lives. We, as
your leaders, would like a vote of confidence from you, the citizens of
Mayfield, as an assurance that you will co-operate with our efforts to
the best of your ability."

Instantly, nearly everyone in the auditorium was on his feet shouting
his approval of the Mayor's program.

Mayor Hilliard had known he was taking a long chance in presenting so
bluntly such a severe program, but long experience had taught him the
best way into a tough situation was a headlong plunge that ignored
consequences. The ovation surprised him. He had expected substantial
opposition. Visibly moved, he held up his hand for quiet once more.

"Our farms and our livestock will be our only means of salvation after
present food stocks are gone," he said. "A separate subcommittee will
inventory all farmland and cattle and dairy herds and plan for their
most efficient use in the coming season. Crops will be assigned as the
committee sees fit. Farm labor will be taken care of by all of us, on a
community basis.

"A third program that must begin immediately is the stockpiling of fuel
for the coming winter. Wood will be our only means of heating and
cooking because the nearest mines are too far away for us to haul coal
from them by teams. The same is true of fuel oil stocks.

"Heating will be at a minimum. Most of you do not have wood stoves. What
you have must be converted to use of wood. An additional committee will
be appointed to supervise this conversion and the construction, where
necessary, of makeshift stoves out of sheet metal, old oil barrels, and
anything else of which we can make use."

Item by item, he continued down the list of problems the Council had
considered that day. He mentioned Ken's suggestion for conservation of
batteries. He spoke of the problems of medical care without adequate
hospital facilities, of police activities that might be required in a
period of stress such as they could expect that winter.

When he had finished, members of the Council detailed plans of the
separate programs over which they had charge. President Lewis spoke to
pledge support of the college staff. He pointed out the fortunate fact
that they had some of the best minds in the entire country in their
scientific departments, and also had Professor Larsen visiting with
them.

The floor was turned over then to members of the audience for comment
and questions. Most of them were favorable, but Sam Cluff, who owned a
hundred and sixty of the best acres in the valley, stood up red-faced
and belligerent.

"It's all a pack of nonsense!" he declared. "This is just an excuse for
certain people in this town to get their hands in somebody else's
pockets, and to tell other people what to do and how to live.

"I'm not going to have anything to do with it. Anybody who sets foot on
my land to tell me what to raise or to take my goods away is going to
have to reckon with a double-barreled, 12-gauge shotgun.

"If there is any real problem, which I doubt, them Government scientists
will be on the job and get things straightened out so that trains and
automobiles will be running by next week. My advice is for everybody to
go home and let them take care of it."

Mayor Hilliard smiled tolerantly. "I shouldn't have to remind you, Sam,
that some of the best scientists in the world are right here in our own
town, and they say the situation is serious enough for emergency
measures. I hope you won't be foolish with that shotgun, but we're
coming out to see you, tomorrow, Sam."

Granny Wicks seemed to erupt from her place to which she had crowded in
the center of the hall. All eyes turned at the sound of her scratchy,
birdlike voice. "I told you," she shrieked. "I told you what was coming,
and now maybe you'll believe me. There's nothing you can do about it,
Bill Hilliard. Nothing at all. There's death in the air. The stars have
spoken it. The signs are in the sky."

Mayor Hilliard interrupted her. "Perhaps you're right, Granny," he said
gently. "I don't think any of us are going to argue with you tonight.
We're here to do what we can, and to make plans to stay alive just as
long as possible."

At the close, Dr. Aylesworth took the stand. His commanding presence
seemed to draw an aura of peace once more around the troubled group. "We
are civilized men and women," he said. "Let us see that we act as such
during the months that are ahead of us. Let us remember that we may see
a time very soon when there will not be enough food, fuel and clothing
for all of us. When and if that time comes, let us prove that we are
able to be our brother's keeper, that we are able to do unto others as
we would have others do unto us. Above all, may we be able to continue
to call on divine assistance to bring a speedy end to this disaster, so
that when it is over we can look back and be proud that we conducted
ourselves as men and women worthy to be called civilized, and worthy of
the divine approval and aid which we now seek."

It was decided to keep classes going in the various schools as long as
possible, releasing those students who were needed to take assignments
in the emergency program. Ken and the rest of the science club members
obtained immediate permission to devote their full time to the research
program.

On the morning after the town meeting, Ken dressed early and rode his
bicycle toward Art's garage to arrange with the mechanic the details of
the gathering and storage of automobile batteries. On the way he passed
by Frank Meggs Independent Grocery Market, the largest in Mayfield.

Although it was only a little after 7 o'clock, an enormous crowd had
collected outside and inside the store. Curious and half-alarmed, Ken
parked his bicycle and made his way through the crowd. Inside, he found
Frank Meggs ringing up sales of large lots of food.

A red-faced woman was arguing with him at the check-out stand. "A dollar
a pound for white beans! That's ridiculous, Frank Meggs, and you know
it!"

"Sure I know it," the storekeeper said calmly. "Next winter you'll be
glad I let you have them for even that price. If you don't want them,
Mrs. Watkins, please move along. Others will be glad to have them."

The woman hesitated, then angrily flung two bills on the counter and
stalked out with her groceries. Ken shoved his way up to the stand. "Mr.
Meggs," he exclaimed. "You can't do this! All foodstuffs are being
called in by the Mayor's committee."

He turned to the people. "Private hoards of food will be confiscated
and placed in the community warehouse. This isn't going to do you any
good!"

Most of the shoppers looked shamefaced, at his challenge, but Meggs
bristled angrily. "You keep out of this, Maddox! Nobody asked you to
come in here! These people know what they're doing, and so do I. How
much do you think any of us will eat if townhall gets its hands on every
scrap of food in the valley? If you aren't buying, get moving!"

"I will, and I'll be back just as soon as I can find the Sheriff!"

With telephone service now cut off to conserve battery power, Ken
hesitated between seeking Sheriff Johnson at his office or at home. He
checked his watch again and decided on the Sheriff's home.

He was fortunate in arriving just before the Sheriff left. He explained
quickly what was happening at Meggs' store. Johnson had been assigned
one of the few remaining cars that would run. With Ken, he drove
immediately to the store. They strode in, the shoppers fanning out
before the Sheriff's approach.

"Okay, that's all," he said. "You folks leave your groceries right where
they are. Tell the others they had better bring theirs back and get
their money while Meggs still has it. Not that anybody is going to have
much use for money, anyway."

"You've no right to do this!" Meggs cried. "This is my private property
and I'm entitled to do with it as I choose!"

"Not any longer it isn't," said Sheriff Johnson. "There isn't such a
thing as private property in Mayfield, any more. Except maybe the shirt
on your back, and I'm not sure of that. At any rate, you're not selling
these groceries. Accounts will be kept, and when and if we get back to
normal you'll be reimbursed, but for now we're all one, big, happy
family!"

Most of the crowd had dispersed. The armloads and pushcarts full of
groceries had been abandoned. Ken and the Sheriff moved toward the door.

"Another trick like that and you'll spend the time of the emergency as a
guest of the city. Incidentally, we don't intend to heat the jail this
winter!"

Meggs turned the blaze of his anger upon Ken. "This is your fault!" he
snarled. "You and that bunch of politicians know there's not going to be
any shortage this winter just as well as I do. In a week this whole
thing will be straightened out. I had a chance to make a good thing of
it. I'm going to get even with you if it's the last thing I ever do!"

"That's enough of that!" said Sheriff Johnson sharply. "Come along,
Ken."

Ken was not disturbed by Meggs' threat of personal retaliation, but he
was frightened by the realization that Meggs wasn't the only one of his
kind in Mayfield. His patrons were only a shade less unstable. What
would such people do when things really got tough? How much could they
be depended on to pull their own weight?

After he had seen Art Matthews about collecting and storing the
batteries, Ken went up to Science Hall where the rest of the club
members were already at work. Under the direction of Al Miner, who was
the best qualified to plan the alterations of the ventilation ducts,
they made the necessary changes and installed one of the motorcycle
engines to drive the blower. At the same time, three of them built up a
high-voltage, battery-operated power supply to charge the filter
elements.

By evening the assembly was operating. The motorcycle engine chugged
pleasantly. "I wonder how long before that one freezes up," Al said
pessimistically.

"We ought to get more," said Joe. "The way the cars have gone we'll be
lucky to get more than 2 days out of each one of these."

During the day, Ken's father had directed the preparation of metallic
specimens from samples the boys had brought from Art's garage and from
those the men brought back from the power plant. With the high-powered
electron microscope, photographs were taken.

As they finished their work the boys went with Ken to the laboratory.
Professor Maddox looked up. "Hello, Fellows," he said. "Have you got
your piece of machinery running?"

"Purring like a top," said Ken.

"Expected to run about as long," said Al.

"Have you finished any photomicrographs?" Ken asked. "Do they show
anything?"

His father passed over a wet print. The boys gathered around it.

"It doesn't mean much to me," said Dave Whitaker. "Can you tell us what
it shows?"

Ken's father took a pencil from his pocket and touched it lightly to a
barely perceptible line across the center of the picture. "That is the
boundary," he said, "between the cylinder wall and the piston taken from
one of the samples you brought in."

"I can't see anything that looks like a line between two pieces of
metal," said Ted Watkins. "It looks like one solid chunk to me."

"That is substantially what it is," said Professor Maddox. "There is no
longer any real boundary as there would be between two ordinary pieces
of metal. Molecules from each piece have flowed into the other, mixing
just as two very viscous liquids would do. They have actually become one
piece of metal."

He took up another photograph. "Here you can see that the same thing has
happened in the case of the shaft and bearing samples we obtained from
the Collin's Dam power plant. Molecules of the two separate pieces of
metal have intermingled, becoming one single piece."

"How could they do that?" Ken exclaimed. "Metals can't flow like
liquids."

"They can if the conditions are right. When steel is heated to a
sufficiently high temperature, it flows like water."

"But that's not the case here!"

"No, it isn't, of course. At lower temperatures the molecules of a solid
do not possess the energy of motion which they have in a liquid state.
The metallic surface of a piece of cold steel has a certain surface
tension which prevents the escape of the relatively low-energy
molecules; thus it has the characteristics we ascribe to a solid."

"Then what has happened in this case?" Joe asked. "Are you able to
tell?"

Professor Maddox nodded. "The photographs show us what has happened, but
they reveal nothing about how or why. We can see the surface tension of
the two pieces of metal has obviously broken down so that the small
energy of motion possessed by the molecules has permitted them to move
toward each other, with a consequent mixing of the two metals. It has
turned them quite literally into a single piece, the most effective kind
of weld you can imagine."

"What would cause the surface tension to break down like that?" Ken
asked.

"That is what remains for us to find out. We don't have the faintest
idea what has caused it. It becomes especially baffling when we recall
that it has happened, not in a single isolated instance, but all over
the world."

"You would think the metals would have become soft, like putty, or
something, for a thing like that to happen to them," said Joe.

"It would be expected that the hardness would be affected. This is not
true, however. The metals seem just as hard as before. The effect of
mixing seems to take place only when the metals are in sliding motion
against one another, as in the case of a piston and cylinder, or a shaft
and a bearing. The effect is comparatively slow, taking place over a
number of days. The two surfaces must break down gradually, increasing
the friction to a point where motion must cease. Then the mixing
continues until they are welded solidly to each other."

Ordinarily, the dusk of evening would have fallen over the landscape,
but the blaze of the comet now lit the countryside with an unnatural
gold that reflected like a flame through the windows and onto the faces
of the men and boys in the laboratory.

"As to the cause of this phenomenon," Professor Maddox said with an
obviously weary deliberation in his voice, "we can only hope to find an
explanation and a cure before it is too late to do the world any good."

"There can't be any question of that!" said Ken intensely. "The
resources of the whole scientific world will be turned on this one
problem. Every industrial, university, and governmental laboratory will
be working on it. Modern science can certainly lick a thing like this!"

Professor Maddox turned from the window, which he had been facing. A
faint, grim smile touched the corners of his lips and died as he
regarded the boys, especially Ken. His face took on a depth of soberness
Ken seldom saw in his father.

"You think nothing is immune to an attack by so-called modern science?"
he said.

"Sure!" Ken went on enthusiastically, not understanding the expression
on his father's face. "Look at the problems that have been licked as
soon as people were determined enough and willing to pay the cost. Giant
computers, radar eyes, atomic energy. Everybody knows we could have made
it to Mars by now if governments had been willing to put up the
necessary money."

"You still have to learn, all of you do," Professor Maddox said slowly,
"that the thing we call science is only a myth. The only reality
consists of human beings trying to solve difficult problems. Their
results, which seem to be solutions to some of those problems, we call
science. Science has no life of its own. It does not deserve to be
spoken of as an entity in its own right. There are only people, whom we
call scientists, and their accomplishments are severely limited by their
quite meager abilities. Meager, when viewed in comparison with the
magnitude of the problems they attack."

Ken felt bewildered. He had never heard his father speak this way
before. "Don't you believe there are scientists enough--scientists who
know enough--to lick a thing like this in time?"

"I don't know. I'm quite sure no one knows. We became conscious long ago
of the fallacy of assuming that the concentration of men enough and
unlimited funds would solve any problem in the world. For every great
accomplishment like atomic energy, to which we point with pride, there
are a thousand other problems, equally important, that remain unsolved.
Who knows whether or not this problem of weakened surface tension in
metals is one of the insoluble ones?"

"We have to find an answer," said Ken doggedly. He could not understand
his father's words. "There's nothing science can't accomplish if it sets
about it with enough determination. Nothing!"




Chapter 6. _The Scientist_


Ken spent an almost sleepless night. He tossed for long hours and dozed
finally, but he awoke again before there was even a trace of dawn in the
sky. Although the night was cool he was sweating as if it were
mid-summer.

There was a queasiness in his stomach, too, a slow undefinable pressure
on some hidden nerve he had never known he possessed. The feeling pulsed
and throbbed slowly and painfully. He sat up and looked out at the dark
landscape, and he knew what was the matter.

Scared, he thought, I'm scared sick.

He'd never known anything like it before in his life, except maybe the
time when he was 6 years old and he had climbed to the top of a very
high tree when the wind was blowing, and he had been afraid to come
down.

It was hitting him, he thought. He was just beginning to understand what
this stoppage of machinery really meant, and he wondered if there was
something wrong with him that he had not felt it earlier. Was he alone?
Had everyone else understood it before he had? Or would it hit them,
one by one, just as it was hitting him now, bringing him face to face
with what lay ahead.

He knew what had done it. It was his father's expression and his words
in the laboratory the night before.

Ken recognized that he had never doubted for an instant that scientists
and their tools were wholly adequate to solve this problem in a
reasonable time. He had been aware there would be great hardships, but
he had never doubted there would be an end to that time. He had believed
his father, as a scientist, had the same faith.

It was a staggering shock to learn that his father had no faith in
science; a shock to be told that science was not a thing that warranted
a man's faith. Ken had planned his whole life around an avid faith in
science.

He tried to imagine what the world would be like if no engine should
ever run again. The standards of civilized existence would be shattered.
Only those areas of the world, where people had never learned to depend
on motor transportation or electric power, would be unaffected; those
areas of China, India and Africa, where men still scratched the ground
with a forked stick and asked only for a cup of rice or grain each day.

This would become the level of the whole world. Until last night, Ken
had never believed it remotely possible. Now, his father's words had
shaken him out of the certainty that science would avert such
consequences. It _could_ happen.

He thought of his own plans and ambitions. There would be no need for
scientists, nor the opportunity to become one, in a world of men who
grubbed the land with forked sticks. He felt a sudden blind and bitter
anger. Even if the disaster were overcome in a matter of years, his
opportunity would be gone.

He knew at once that such anger was selfish and futile. His own personal
calamities would be the least of the troubles ahead, but, for the
moment, he could not help it. In a way, it felt good because it
overshadowed the dark fear that still throbbed in his body.

But something else was gone, too. The opportunity for him and his
science club friends to investigate the properties of the altered metal
was over. His father and the other scientists had taken over those
studies, and there would be no place for high-school boys who did not
know even enough to prepare a slide for an electron microscope.

It had always been that way, as long as he could remember. He had always
been too young and too ignorant to be intrusted with work that mattered.

He supposed they would turn the operation of the air filter over to one
of the teaching fellows, even though that was something the club could
handle.

The bitterness and the fear seemed more than he could endure. He dressed
quietly and went downstairs. Without lighting a lamp, he found something
to eat. The first light of dawn was showing when he left the house.

For an hour he walked the silent streets without meeting anyone.
Normally, there would have been the sound of milk trucks, and the cars
of early-rising workers. Now there was nothing. The comet had risen just
above the eastern hills, and in its light the city was like some
fabulous, golden ruin that belonged in an ancient fairytale.

Ken didn't know where he was going or what he was going to do. There
ought to be something useful he could do, he thought fiercely.

As he looked down the street, he saw a half-dozen wagons with two teams
each, stopped in front of Sims Hardware and Lumber. In the wagons were
several dozen men. Ken recognized Andrew Norton, of the Mayor's Council,
and Henry Atkins, the Sheriff's chief deputy.

Several of the men were emerging from the hardware store with new axes
and saws. Then Ken understood. This was the first wood detail headed
for the mountains to begin gathering and stockpiling fuel for the
winter. He broke into a run.

Deputy Atkins appeared to be in charge of the group. Ken hailed him. "I
want to go along, Mr. Atkins. May I go?"

The deputy glanced down at him and frowned. He consulted a sheet of
paper he drew from his pocket. "Your name isn't on the list for this
morning, Ken. Were you assigned?"

"I guess not, but I haven't got anything else to do today. Is there any
objection to my going?"

"I don't suppose so," said Atkins dubiously. "It's just that your name
may be on some other list. We don't want to get these things fouled up
right off the bat. There's enough trouble as it is."

"I'm sure my name's not on any other list. I'd have been told about it."

"All right. Climb on."

As Ken climbed into the nearest wagon he was startled to find himself
staring into the face of Frank Meggs. The storekeeper grinned
unpleasantly as he nodded his head in Ken's direction and spoke to his
neighbor. "Now what do you know about that? Old Man Maddox, letting his
own little boy out alone this early in the morning. I'll bet he didn't
let you, did he? I'll bet you had to run away to try to prove you're a
big boy now."

"Cut it out, Meggs," said Atkins sharply. "We heard all about what went
on in your store yesterday."

The man next to Meggs drew away, but it didn't seem to bother him. He
continued to grin crookedly at Ken. "Aren't you afraid you might get
hurt trying to do a man's work?"

Ken ignored the jibes and faced away from the storekeeper. The slow,
rhythmic jogging of the wagon, and the frosty air as they came into the
mountains took some of the bitterness out of Ken. It made him feel
freshly alive. He had come often to hunt here and felt a familiarity
with every tree and rock around him.

The wagon train came to a halt in a grove of 10-year-old saplings that
needed thinning.

"No use taking our best timber until we have to," said Atkins. "We'll
start here. I'll take a crew and go on ahead and mark the ones to be
cut. You drivers unhitch your teams and drag the logs out to the wagons
after they're cut."

There was none of the kidding and horseplay that would have been normal
in such a group. Each man seemed intent on the purpose for which he had
come, and was absorbed with his own thoughts. Ken took a double-bitted
ax and followed Atkins along the trail. He moved away from the others
and began cutting one of the young trees Atkins had marked.

By noon he was bathed in sweat, and his arms and back ached. He had
thought he was in good condition from his football and track work, but
he seemed to have found new muscles that had never come into play
before.

Atkins noticed the amount he had cut and complimented him. "Better take
it easy. You're way ahead of everybody else, and we don't have to get it
all out today."

Ken grinned, enjoying the aches of his muscles. "If it has to be done we
might as well do it."

He was not surprised to find that Frank Meggs had cut almost nothing but
had spent his time complaining to his companions about the unnecessary
work they were doing.

After lunch, which Ken had reluctantly accepted from the others, there
was a stir at the arrival of a newcomer on horseback. Ken recognized him
as Mike Travis, one of the carpenters and caretakers at the college.

Mike tied his horse to the tailboard of a wagon and approached the
woodcutters. "There you are, Ken Maddox," he said accusingly. "Why
didn't you let somebody know where you were going? Your father's been
chewing up everyone in sight, trying to find out where you'd gone. He
finally decided you might be up here, and sent me after you. Take the
horse on back. I'll finish up the day on the wood detail."

Ken felt suddenly awkward and uncomfortable. "I didn't mean to worry
him, but I guess I did forget to say where I was going. Don't you think
it would be okay if I stayed and you told Dad you had found me?"

"Not on your life! He'd chew me down to the ankles if I went back
without you!"

"Okay, I'll go," Ken said. Although he knew he should have left word it
still seemed strange that his father should be so concerned as to send a
man up here looking for him. It seemed like more of the unfamiliar
facets of his father's personality that Ken had glimpsed last night.

Frank Meggs was watching from across the clearing. "I guess Papa Maddox
couldn't stand the thought of his little boy doing a man's work for a
whole day," he said loudly and maliciously. No one paid any attention to
him.

       *       *       *       *       *

Ken tied the mare to a tree on the campus where she could graze. He
glanced over the valley below. Not a single car was in sight on the
roads. Somehow, it was beginning to seem that this was the way it had
always been. His own car seemed like something he had possessed a
thousand years ago.

He found his father in the laboratory working with the electron
microscope. Professor Maddox looked up and gestured toward the office.
As Ken sat down, he shut the door behind them and took a seat behind his
old oak desk that was still cluttered with unmarked examination papers.

"You didn't say anything about where you were going this morning," he
said.

"I'm sorry about that," Ken answered. "I got up early and took a walk
through town. All of a sudden--well, I guess I got panicky when it
finally hit me as to what all this really means. I saw the wood detail
going out and joined them. It felt good out there, with nothing to think
about except getting a tree to fall right."

"You ran away. You were needed here."

Ken stammered. "I didn't think you wanted any of us kids around since
you and the other men had taken over what we had started to do."

"You were angry that it wasn't your own show any longer, weren't you?"

"I guess that's part of it," Ken admitted, his face reddening. He didn't
know what was happening. His father had never spoken to him like this
before. He seemed suddenly critical and disapproving of everything about
Ken.

After a long time his father spoke again, more gently this time. "It's
been your ambition for a long time to be a scientist, hasn't it?"

"You know it has."

"I've been very pleased, too. I've watched you and encouraged your
interests and, as far as I can see, you've been developing in the right
direction."

"I'm glad you think so," Ken said.

"But you've wanted to be a _great_ scientist. You've had an ambition to
emulate men like Newton, Faraday, Davy, and the modern giants such as
Einstein, Planck, de Broglie, Oppenheimer."

"Maybe I haven't got the brains, but I can try."

His father snorted impatiently. "Do you think any one of them tried
deliberately to be great, or to copy anyone else?"

Ken understood his meaning now. "I guess they didn't. You can't really
do a thing like that."

"No, you can't. You take the brains God has given you and apply them to
the universe as you see it. The results take care of themselves.

"Some of us have enough insight to achieve greatness. Most of us lack
the cleverness to cope effectively with such a wily opponent as the
natural universe. Greatness and mediocrity have no meaning to a man who
is absorbed in his study. You do what you have to do. You do what the
best and highest impulses of your brain tell you to do. Expect nothing
more than this of yourself. Nothing more is possible."

"I think I see what you mean," Ken said.

"I doubt it. Most of the men I know have never learned it. They struggle
to write more papers, to get their names in more journals than their
colleagues. They go out of their way to be patted on the back.

"They are the failures as scientists. For an example of success I
recommend that you observe Dr. Larsen closely. He is a man who has done
a great deal to advance our knowledge of physical chemistry."

Professor Maddox paused. Then he said finally, "There is just one other
thing."

"What's that?" Ken asked.

"Up to now, you and all your friends have only played at science."

"Played!" Ken cried. "We've built our observatory, a 1000-watt radio
transmitter--"

"Play; these things are toys. Educational toys, it is true, but toys,
nevertheless."

"I don't understand."

"Toys are fine for children. You and your friends, however, are no
longer children. You haven't got a chance now to grow up and gain an
education in a normal manner. You can't finish your childhood, playing
with your toys. You can't take all the time you need to find out what
your capacities and aptitudes are. You will never know a world that will
allow you that luxury.

"Every available brain is needed on this problem. You've got to make a
decision today, this very minute, whether you want to give a hand to its
solution."

"You know I want to be in on it!"

"Do you? Then you've got to decide that you are no longer concerned
about being a scientist. Forget the word. What you are does not matter.
You are simply a man with a problem to solve.

"You have to decide whether or not you can abandon your compassion for
the millions who are going to die; whether you can reject all pressure
from personal danger, and from the threat to everything and everyone
that is of any importance to you.

"You've got to decide whether or not this problem of the destruction of
surface tension of metals is the most absorbing thing in the whole
world. It needs solving, not because the fate of the world hinges on it,
but because it's a problem that consumes you utterly. This is what
drives you, not fear, not danger, not the opinion of anyone else.

"When he can function this way, the scientist is capable of solving
important problems. By outward heartlessness he can achieve works of
compassion greater than any of his critics. He knows that the greatest
pleasure a man can know lies in taking a stand against those forces that
bend ordinary men."

For the first time in his life Ken suddenly felt that he knew his
father. "I wish you had talked to me like this a long time ago," he
said.

Professor Maddox shook his head. "It would have been far better for you
to find out these things for yourself. My telling you does not convince
you they are true. That conviction must still come from within."

"Do you want me to become a scientist?" Ken asked.

"It doesn't make any difference what I want," his father answered almost
roughly. He was looking away from Ken and then his eyes found his son's
and his glance softened. He reached across the desk and grasped Ken's
hand.

"Yes, I want it more than anything else in the world," he said
earnestly. "But it's got to be what you want, too, or it's no good at
all. Don't try to be anything for my sake. Determine your own goals
clearly, and take as straight a path as you can to reach them. Just
remember, if you do choose science the standards are severe."

"It's what I want," said Ken evenly. "You said you needed me here. What
do you want me to do?"

"Empty trash cans if we ask it," Professor Maddox said. "Forget about
whose show it is. Professor Larsen and I will be directing the research,
and we'll need every pair of hands and every brain that's got an ounce
of intelligence in this field. You do whatever you are asked to do and
think of every possible answer to the questions that come before you. Is
that good enough?"

"More than enough." Ken felt a sudden stinging sensation behind his eyes
and turned to rub their corners roughly. "What about the other fellows
in the club? Can you use them, too?"

"As many as have the ounce of intelligence I spoke of. The rest of them
don't need to know the things I have told you, but with you it was
different. I had to know you understood just a little of what it means
to be a scientist."

"I'll be one. I'll show you I can be one!"




Chapter 7. _Dust from the Stars_


Ken felt he had grown 3 inches taller after his father's discussion. As
if he had passed some ancient ritual, he could be admitted to the
company of adults and his opinions would be heard.

This proved to be true. His father rapidly organized the facilities of
the college laboratories and recruited every possible science student in
the chemistry and physics departments, as well as many from the high
school. As these plans were outlined, Ken made a proposal of his own.

"I believe our first move," he said, "should be to set up a network of
amateur radio stations operating in cities where there are other
laboratories. If you could be in touch with them, ideas could be
exchanged and duplication of work avoided."

"An excellent idea," said Professor Maddox. "You can work it out as we
go along."

"No. It ought to be done immediately," Ken said. "If not, it may be
almost impossible to find anyone on the air later. There may not be many
amateurs who will bother to convert their rigs to battery operation.
There may not be many who can get the batteries together."

"Good enough!" his father said. "Let that have priority over everything
else until you get it organized. Probably you should find at least two
contacts in each of the university centers. Put at the top of your list
Berkeley, Pasadena, Chicago, New York, and Washington, D.C.

"See if you can get relay contacts that will put us in touch with
Stockholm, Paris, London, Berlin, and Tokyo. If so, we can have contact
with the majority of the workers capable of contributing most to this
problem."

"I'll do my best," Ken promised.

Someone would be needed to operate the station and spend a good many
hours a week listening and recording. He didn't want to spend the time
necessary doing that, and he knew none of the other club members would,
either. At once he thought of Maria Larsen. She would undoubtedly be
happy to take over the job and feel she was doing something useful. On
the way home he stopped at her house and told her what he had in mind.
She readily agreed.

"I don't know anything about radio," she said. "You'll have to show me
what to do."

"We won't expect you to learn code, of course," he said. "When we do
handle anything coming in by code one of us will have to take it. We'll
try to contact phone stations wherever possible for this program we have
in mind. Most of the stuff will be put on tape, and Dad will probably
want you to prepare typed copies, too. You can do enough to take a big
load off the rest of us."

"I'll be happy to try."

They spent the rest of the day in the radio room of the science shack.
Ken taught Maria the simple operations of turning on the transmitter and
receiver, of handling the tuning controls, and the proper procedure for
making and receiving calls. He supposed there would be some technical
objection to her operation of the station without an operator's license,
but he was quite sure that such things were not important right now.

It was a new kind of experience for Maria. Her face was alive with
excitement as Ken checked several bands to see where amateurs were still
operating. The babble of high-frequency code whistles alternated in the
room with faint, sometimes muffled voices on the phone band.

"There are more stations than I expected," Ken said. "With luck, we may
be able to establish a few of the contacts we need, tonight."

After many tries, he succeeded in raising an operator, W6YRE, in San
Francisco. They traded news, and it sounded as if the west coast city
was crumbling swiftly. Ken explained what he wanted. W6YRE promised to
try to raise someone with a high-powered phone rig in Berkeley, near the
university.

They listened to him calling, but could not hear the station he finally
raised.

"What good will that do?" Maria asked. "If we can't hear the station in
Berkeley...."

"He may be working on a relay deal through the small rig. It's better
than nothing, but I'd prefer a station we can contact directly."

In a few minutes, the San Francisco operator called them back. "W6WGU
knows a ham with a 1000-watt phone near the university," he said. "He
thinks he'll go for your deal, but he's not set up for battery. In fact,
he's about ready to evacuate. Maybe he can be persuaded to stay. I'm
told he's a guy who will do the noble thing if he sees a reason for it."

"There's plenty of reason for this," said Ken.

"Let's set a schedule for 9 p.m. I ought to have word on it by then."

They agreed and cut off. In another hour they had managed a contact with
a Chicago operator, and explained what they wanted.

"You're out of luck here," the ham replied. "This town is falling apart
at the seams right now. The whole Loop area has been burned out.
There's been rioting for 18 hours straight. The militia have been trying
to hold things together, but I don't think they even know whether
anybody is still on top giving the orders.

"I'll try to find out what the eggheads at the university are doing, but
if they've got any kind of research running in this mess, it'll surprise
me. If they are still there, I'll hang on and report to you. Otherwise,
I'm heading north. There's not much sense to it, but when something like
this happens a guy's got to run or have a good reason for staying put.
If he doesn't he'll go nuts."

The Chicago operator agreed to a schedule for the following morning.

Maria and Ken sat in silence, not looking at each other, after they cut
off.

"It will be that way in all the big cities, won't it?" Maria asked.

"I'm afraid so. We're luckier than they are," Ken said, "but I wonder
how long we'll stay lucky." He was thinking of Frank Meggs, and the
people who had swamped his store.

At 9 p.m., W6YRE came back on. The Berkeley 1000-watt phone was
enthusiastic about being a contact post with the university people. He
had promised to make arrangements with them and to round up enough
batteries to convert his transmitter and receiver.

They had no further success that night.

Ken's father shook his head sadly when told of the situation in Chicago.
"I had counted on them," he said. "Their people are among the best in
the world, and they have the finest equipment. I hope things are not
like that everywhere."

Members of the science club took turns at the transmitter the following
days for 20-hour stretches, until everything possible had been done to
establish the contacts requested by Professor Maddox.

In Chicago there appeared to have been a complete collapse. The operator
there reported he was unable to reach any of the scientific personnel at
the university. He promised a further contact, but when the time came he
could not be reached. There was no voice at all in the Chicago area. Ken
wondered what had become of the man whose voice they had heard briefly.
He was certain he would never know.

Although there was much disorder on the west coast, the situation was in
somewhat better control. The rioting had not yet threatened the
universities, and both Berkeley and Pasadena were working frantically on
the problem with round-the-clock shifts in their laboratories. They had
welcomed wholeheartedly the communication network initiated by the
Mayfield group.

In Washington, D.C. tight military control was keeping things somewhat
in order. In Stockholm, where contact had been established through a
Washington relay after 2 days of steady effort, there was no rioting
whatever. Paris and London had suffered, but their leading universities
were at work on the problem. Tokyo reported similar conditions.

Ken grinned at Maria as they received the Stockholm report. "Those
Swedes," he said. "They're pretty good at keeping their heads."

Maria answered with a faint smile of her own. "Everybody should be
Swedes. No?"

       *       *       *       *       *

The fall winds and the black frost came early that year, as if in fair
warning that the winter intended a brutal assault upon the stricken
world. The pile of logs in the community woodlot grew steadily. A large
crew of men worked to reduce the logs to stove lengths.

They had made a crude attempt to set up a circular saw, using animal
power to drive it. The shaft was mounted in hardwood blocks, driven by a
complicated arrangement of wooden pulleys and leather belts. The horses
worked it through a treadmill.

The apparatus worked part of the time, but it scarcely paid for itself
when measured against the efforts of the men who had to keep it in
repair.

The food storage program was well underway. Two central warehouses had
been prepared from the converted Empire Movie Theater, and the Rainbow
Skating Rink.

Ken wished their efforts at the college laboratory were going half as
well. As the days passed, it seemed they were getting nowhere. The first
effort to identify any foreign substance in the atmospheric dust was a
failure. Calculations showed they had probably not allowed sufficient
time to sample a large enough volume of air.

It was getting increasingly difficult to keep the blower system going.
All of their original supply of small engines had broken down. The town
had been scoured for replacements. These, too, were failing.

In the metallurgical department hundreds of tests had been run on
samples taken from frozen engines. The photomicrographs all showed a
uniform peculiarity, which the scientists could not explain. Embedded in
the crystalline structure of the metal were what appeared to be some
kind of foreign, amorphous particles which were concentrated near the
line of union of the two parts.

Berkeley and Pasadena confirmed these results with their own tests.
There was almost unanimous belief that it was in no way connected with
the comet. Ken stood almost alone in his dogged conviction that the
Earth's presence in the tail of the comet could be responsible for the
catastrophe.

Another theory that was gaining increasing acceptance was that this
foreign substance was an unexpected by-product of the hydrogen and
atomic bomb testing that had been going on for so many years. Ken was
forced to admit the possibility of this, inasmuch as radiation products
were scattered heavily now throughout the Earth's atmosphere. Both
Russia and Britain had conducted extensive tests just before the
breakdowns began occurring.

The members of the science club had been allowed to retain complete
control of the air-sampling program. They washed the filters carefully
at intervals and distilled the solvent to recover the precious residue
of dust.

As the small quantity of this grew after another week of collecting, it
was treated to remove the ordinary carbon particles and accumulated
pollens. When this was done there was very little remaining, but that
little something might be ordinary dust carried into the atmosphere from
the surface of the Earth. Or it might be out of the tail of the comet.
Dust from the stars.

By now, Ken and his companions had learned the use of the electron
microscope and how to prepare specimens for it. When their samples of
dust had become sufficient they prepared a dozen slides for
photographing with the instrument.

As these were at last developed in the darkroom, Ken scanned them
eagerly. Actually, he did not know what he was looking for. None of them
did. The prints seemed to show little more than shapeless patches. In
the light of the laboratory he called Joe Walton's attention to one
picture. "Look," he said. "Ever see anything like that before?"

Joe started to shake his head. Then he gave an exclamation. "Hey, they
look like the same particles found in the metals, which nobody has been
able to identify yet!"

Ken nodded. "It could be. Maybe this will get us only a horselaugh for
our trouble, but let's see what they think."

They went into the next laboratory and laid the prints before Ken's
father and his associates. Ken knew at once, from the expressions on the
men's faces, that they were not going to be laughed at.

"I think there may be something here," said Professor Maddox, trying to
suppress his excitement. "It is very difficult to tell in a picture like
this whether one particle is similar to any other, but their size and
configuration are very much alike."

Professor Douglas grunted disdainfully. "Impossible!" With that
dismissal, he moved away.

Professor Larsen looked more carefully. "You could scrape dust from a
thousand different sources and get pictures like this from half of them
perhaps. Only the chemical tests will show us the nature of this
material. I am certain it is very worthwhile following up."

"I feel certain that whatever contaminating agent we are dealing with is
airborne," said Professor Maddox. "If this is the same substance it will
not tell us its origin, of course, nor will it even prove it is
responsible for these effects. However it is a step in the right
direction. We can certainly stand that!"

"Couldn't we tell by spectroscopic analysis?" said Ken.

"That would be difficult to say. The commonness of the elements involved
might mask what you are looking for. Get John Vickers to help you set up
equipment for making some comparisons."

Vickers was the teaching fellow in the chemistry department whom
Professor Maddox had planned to assign to help the boys when they first
suggested atmospheric analysis. He had become indispensable in the
research since then. But he liked helping the boys; it was not too long
since he had been at the same stage in his own career. He understood
their longing to do something worthwhile, and their embarrassment at
their ineptness.

"Sure, Guys," he said, when Professor Maddox called him in. "Let's see
if we can find out what this stuff is. Who knows? Maybe we've got a bear
by the tail."

It was delicate precision work, preparing specimens and obtaining
spectrographs of the lines that represented the elements contained in
them. Time after time, their efforts failed. Something went wrong either
with their sample preparation, or with their manipulation of the
instruments. Ken began to feel as if their hands possessed nothing but
thumbs.

"That's the way it goes," John Vickers consoled them. "Half of this
business of being a scientist is knowing how to screw a nut on a
left-handed bolt in the dark. Unless you're one of these guys who do it
all in their heads, like Einstein."

"We're wasting our samples," Ken said. "It's taken two weeks to collect
this much."

"Then this is the one that does it," said Vickers. "Try it now."

Ken turned the switch that illuminated the spectrum and exposed the
photographic plate. After a moment, he cut it off. "That had better do
it!" he said.

After the plates were developed, they had two successful spectrographs
for comparison. One was taken from the metal of a failed-engine part.
The other was from the atmospheric dust. In the comparator Vickers
brought the corresponding standard comparison lines together. For a long
time he peered through the eyepiece.

"A lot of lines match up," he said. "I can throw out most of them,
though--carbon, oxygen, a faint sodium."

"The stuff that's giving us trouble might be a compound of one of
these," said Ken.

"That's right. If so, we ought to find matching lines of other possible
elements in the compounds concerned. I don't see any reasonable
combination at all." He paused. "Hey, here's something I hadn't
noticed."

He shifted the picture to the heavy end of the spectrum. There, a very
sharp line matched on both pictures. The boys took a look at it through
the viewer. "What is that one?" Ken asked.

"I don't know. I used a carbon standard. I should have used one farther
toward the heavy end. This one looks like it would have to be a
transuranic element, something entirely new, like plutonium."

"Then it could be from the hydrogen bomb tests," said Joe.

"It could be," said Vickers, "but somehow I've got a feeling it isn't."

"Isn't there a quick way to find out?" said Ken.

"How?"

"If we took a spectrograph of the comet and found this same line
strongly present, we would have a good case for proving the comet was
the source of this substance."

"Let's have a try," said Vickers. "I don't know how successfully we can
get a spectrograph of the comet, but it's worth an attempt."

Their time was short, before the comet vanished below the horizon for
the night. They called for help from the other boys and moved the
equipment to the roof, using the small, portable 6-inch telescope
belonging to the physics department.

There was time for only one exposure. After the sun had set, and the
comet had dropped below the horizon, they came out of the darkroom and
placed the prints in the viewing instrument.

Vickers moved the adjustments gently. After a time he looked up at the
circle of boys. "You were right, Ken," he said. "Your hunch was right.
The comet is responsible. Our engines have been stopped by dust from the
stars."




Chapter 8. _Attack_


There are people who feed upon disaster and grow in their own particular
direction as they would never have grown without it, as does the queen
bee who becomes queen only because of the special food prepared by the
workers for her private use.

Such a man was Henry Maddox. He would not have admitted it, nor was he
ever able to realize it, for it violated the very principles he had laid
down for Ken. But for him, the comet was like a sudden burst of purpose
in his life. He had taught well in his career as professor of chemistry
at the State Agricultural College at Mayfield, but it had become fairly
mechanical. He was vaguely aware of straining at the chains of routine
from time to time, but he had always forced himself through sheer
exercise of will to attend to his duties. There was never time, however,
for any of the research he used to tell himself, in his younger days, he
was going to do.

With the sudden thrusting aside of all customary duties, and with the
impact of catastrophe demanding a solution to a research problem, he
came alive without knowing what was happening. Yet without the imminence
of disaster he would not have found the strength to drive himself so.
This was what he could not admit to himself.

Another who was nourished was Granny Wicks. She should have been dead
years ago. She had admitted this to herself and to anyone else who would
listen, but now she knew why she had been kept alive so long past her
time. She had been waiting for the comet.

Its energy seemed to flow from the sky into her withered, bony frame,
and she drank of its substance until time seemed to reverse itself in
her obsolete body. All her life she had been waiting for this time. She
knew it now. She was spared to tell the people why the comet had come.
Although her purpose was diametrically opposed to that of Henry Maddox,
she also fed and grew to her full stature after almost a century of
existence.

Frank Meggs was surely another. He was born in Mayfield and had lived
there all his life and he hated every minute of time and every person
and every event that told of his wasted life here. He hated College
Hill, for he had never been able to go there. His family had been too
poor, and he had been forced to take over his father's store when his
father died.

He had once dreamed of becoming a great businessman and owning a chain
of stores that would stretch from coast to coast, but circumstances, for
which he blamed the whole of Mayfield, had never permitted him to leave
the town. His panic sale had been his final, explosive hope that he
might be able to make it. Now, he, too, found himself growing in his own
special direction as he fed upon the disaster. He did not know just what
that direction was or to where it led, but he felt the growth. He felt
the secret pleasure of contemplating the discomfort and the privation
that lay ahead for his fellow citizens in the coming months.

While personal fear forced him to the conclusion that the disaster would
be of short duration, the pleasure was nevertheless real. It was
especially intense when he thought of College Hill and its inhabitants
in scenes of dark dismay as they wrestled in vain to understand what had
happened to the world.

There were others who fed upon the disaster. For the most part they
found it an interruption to be met with courage, with faith, with
whatever strength was inherent in them.

It was not a time of growth, however, for Reverend Aylesworth. It was
the kind of thing for which he had been preparing all his life. Now he
would test and verify the stature he had already gained.

       *       *       *       *       *

On the night they verified the presence of the comet dust in the
disabled engines, Ken was the last to leave the laboratory. It was near
midnight when he got away.

His father had left much earlier, urging him to come along, but Ken had
been unable to pull himself away from the examination and measurement of
the spectrum of lines that bared the comet's secret. He had begun to
understand the pleasure his father had spoken of, the pleasure of being
consumed utterly by a problem important in its own right.

As he left the campus there was no moon in the sky. The comet was gone,
and the stars seemed new in a glory he had not seen for many nights. He
felt that he wouldn't be able to sleep even when he got home, and he
continued walking for several blocks, in the direction of town.

He came abreast, finally, of the former Rainbow Skating Rink, which had
been converted into a food warehouse. In the darkness, he saw a sudden,
swift movement against the wall of the building. His night vision was
sharp after the long walk; he saw what was going on.

The broad doors of the rink had been broken open. There were three or
four men lifting sacks and boxes and barrels stealthily into a wagon.

Even as he started toward them he realized his own foolishness and
pulled back. A horse whinnied softly. He turned to run in the direction
of Sheriff Johnson's house, and behind him came a sudden, hoarse cry of
alarm.

Horses' hoofs rattled frighteningly loud on the cement. Ken realized he
stood no chance of escaping if he were seen. He dodged for an instant
into a narrow space between two buildings with the thought of reaching
an alley at the back. However, it was boarded at the end and he saw that
he would have to scale the fence. A desperate horseman would ride him
down in the narrow space.

He fled on and reached the shadows in front of the drugstore. He pressed
himself as flat as possible in the recess of the doorway, hoping his
pursuer would race by. But his fleeing shadow had been seen.

The rider whirled and reined the horse to a furious stop. The animal's
front legs pawed the air in front of Ken's face. Then Ken saw there was
something familiar about the figure. He peered closer as the horseman
whirled again.

"Jed," he called softly. "Jed Tucker--"

The figure answered harshly, "Yeah. Yeah, that's me, and you're--you're
Ken. I'm sorry it had to be you. Why did you have to come by here at
this time of night?"

Ken heard the sound of running feet in the distance as others came to
join Jed Tucker. Jed had not dismounted, but held Ken prisoner in the
recess with the rearing, impatient horse.

Ken wondered how Jed Tucker could be mixed up in a thing like this. His
father was president of the bank and owned one of the best homes in
Mayfield. Jed and Ken had played football on the first team together
last year.

"Jed," Ken said quickly, "give it up! Don't go through with this!"

"Shut up!" Jed snarled. He reined the horse nearer, threatening Ken with
the thrashing front legs.

When Jed's companions arrived, Jed dismounted from the horse.

"Who is it?" a panting voice asked.

A cold panic shot through Ken. He recognized the voice. It was that of
Mr. Tucker himself. The bank official was taking part in the looting of
the warehouse.

The third man, Ken recognized in rising horror, was Mr. Allen, a
next-door neighbor of the Tuckers. He was the town's foremost attorney,
and one of its most prominent citizens.

"We can't let him go," Allen was saying. "Whoever he is, we've got to
get him out of the way."

Mr. Tucker came closer. He gasped in dismay. "It's young Maddox," he
said. "You! What are you doing out this time of night?"

Under any other conditions, the question would have seemed humorous,
coming from whom it did now. But Ken felt no humor; he sensed the
desperate fury in these men.

"Give it up," he repeated quietly. "The lives of fifteen thousand people
depend on this food supply. You have no right to steal an ounce that
doesn't belong to you. I'll never tell what I've seen."

Tucker shook his head in a dazed, uncomprehending manner, as if the
proposition were too fantastic to be considered. "We can't do that," he
said.

"We can't let him go!" Allen repeated.

"You can't expect us to risk murder!"

"There'll be plenty of that before this winter's over!"

"Our lives depend on this food, you know that," Tucker said desperately
to Ken. "You take your share, and we'll all be in this together. Then we
know we'll be safe."

Ken considered, his panic increasing. To refuse might mean his life. If
he could pretend to fall in with them....

"You can't trust him!" Allen raged. "No one is going to be in on this
except us."

Suddenly the lawyer stepped near, his hand raised high in the air.
Before Ken sensed his intention, a heavy club smashed against his head.
His body fell in a crumpled heap on the sidewalk.

       *       *       *       *       *

It was after 2 a.m. when Professor Maddox awoke with the sensation that
something was vaguely wrong. He sat up in bed and looked out the window
at the starlit sky. He remembered he had left Ken at the university and
had not yet heard him come in.

Quietly he arose from the bed and tiptoed along the hallway to Ken's
room. He used the beam of a precious flashlight for a moment to scan the
undisturbed bed. Panic started inside him and was fought down.

Probably Ken had found something interesting to keep him from noticing
the alarm clock on a shelf in the laboratory. Perhaps someone had even
forgotten to wind the clock and it had run down.

Perhaps, even, the bearings of its balance wheel had finally become
frozen and had brought it to a stop!

Mrs. Maddox was behind him as he turned from the door. "What's wrong?"
she asked.

He flashed the light on the bed again. "I'd better go up to the
laboratory and have a look," he said.

Ken's mother nodded. She sensed her husband's worry, and wanted not to
add to it. "Take Ken's bicycle," she said. "It will be quicker, even if
you have to walk it uphill. I'll have some hot chocolate for you when
you come back."

Professor Maddox dressed hurriedly and took the bicycle from the garage.
He did have to wheel it most of the way up the hill, but it would be
easier coming down anyway, he thought. He wondered how much longer the
bearings in it would hold up without freezing.

As he came within view of the laboratory building he saw that the
windows were utterly dark. He knew that even with the shades down he
would have been able to see some glow of the oil lamps which they used,
provided Ken were still there.

He waited a full 10 minutes against the chance that Ken had put out the
lamps and was on his way out. Then he knew Ken had gone long ago. He
ought to call the Sheriff and have the police cars search for him, but
there were no phones and no cars.

He mounted the bicycle in fresh panic and rode recklessly down the hill
to town. At Sheriff Johnson's house he pounded frantically on the door
until the Sheriff shouted angrily through an open window, "Who is it?"

"It's Dr. Maddox. You've got to help me, Johnson. Ken's disappeared." He
went into details, and the Sheriff grunted, holding back his irritation
at being disturbed, because of his long friendship with Henry Maddox.

"I guess I should have gone down to the station," said Professor Maddox,
realizing what he had done. "I had forgotten there would be men on
duty."

"It's all right. I'll come with you."

The Sheriff's car had broken down days before. He kept a horse for his
own official use. "You can ride behind me," he said. "Sally's a pretty
decent gal. You get up there on the porch railing and climb on right
behind me."

Professor Maddox maneuvered himself behind the Sheriff on the horse,
balancing unsteadily as Sally shied away. "Where do you think Ken could
have gone?" asked Johnson. "Don't you suppose he's over at one of his
friend's?"

"He wouldn't do a thing like that without letting us know."

"He went up the canyon with the wood detail 2 or 3 weeks ago."

"I know--but that was different. Aren't there any policemen on the
streets now? What happened to the ones who used to patrol in the radio
cars?"

"They're walking their beats, most of them. Two are mounted in each
district. We'll stop by the station, and then try to find the mounted
officers. It's the only thing we can do."

They moved down the dark, empty streets. It seemed as if there never had
been any life flowing along them, and never would be again. They passed
the station, lit by a smoking oil lamp, and left word of Ken's
disappearance, and moved on. They came to the edge of the business
section, where street lamps used to shine. This area was even more
ghostly than the rest, but policemen patrolled it, perhaps out of habit
and a conviction that failure to do so would admit the end of all that
was familiar and right.

As they rode on, the clatter of other hoofbeats on the cement sounded
behind them. Johnson turned and halted. A flashlight shone in their
faces. It was Officer Dan Morris, who identified himself by turning the
light on his own face.

"The warehouse has been broken into," he said. "Over at the skating
rink. Somebody has busted in and made off with a lot of food."

The Sheriff seemed stunned by the news. "What idiots!" he muttered
self-accusingly. "What complete, pinheaded idiots we turned out to be.
We didn't even think to put a special guard around the warehouse! Do any
of the other patrolmen know?"

"Yes. Clark and Dudly are over there now. I was trying to round up
someone else while they look for clues."

"I'll have to get over there," said Johnson.

"But Ken ..." Professor Maddox said. "I've got to keep looking."

"You come with us. I've got to look into the robbery. Ken can't have
come to any harm. I'll pass the word along and we'll all keep watch for
him. I promise you we will."

"I'll keep on," said Professor Maddox. He slid from the horse. "I'll
keep moving along the street here. If you find anything, I'll be
somewhere between here and home."

Unwillingly, Sheriff Johnson turned and left him. The sounds of the two
horses echoed loudly in the deserted street. Professor Maddox felt a
burst of anger at their abandonment of him, but he supposed the Sheriff
was doing what he had to do.

He recognized that it was foolhardy to be afoot in the deserted town
this time of night. Without a single clue to Ken's whereabouts, what
could he hope to accomplish? He strode on along the sidewalk in the
direction the policeman had disappeared. It was as good a direction as
any.

After he had gone a block he stumbled in the darkness. Some soft,
resilient object lay across the sidewalk before Billings Drugstore. In
anger at the obstacle, Professor Maddox caught himself and moved on. A
sound stopped him. A groan of agony came from the object upon which he
had stumbled. He turned and bent down and knew it was a human being.
Faintly, under the starlight, he glimpsed the dark pool of blood on the
sidewalk. He turned the body gently until he could see the face. It was
Ken.

He didn't know how long he knelt there inspecting the motionless
features of his son. He was aware only of running frantically in the
direction of the warehouse. He found Johnson. He clutched the Sheriff's
arm. "They've killed him!" he cried. "I found Ken and they've killed
him!"

Johnson turned to the nearest officer. "Ride for Dr. Adams. Dudly, get
that horse and wagon that's at Whitaker's place. Where did you say you
found Ken, Professor?"

"At Billings. Lying on the sidewalk with his head smashed in."

"You others meet us there," he called.

Clumsily, they mounted the Sheriff's horse together again. It seemed to
take hours to ride the short distance.

They dismounted and Johnson knelt and touched the boy tenderly.

Then Professor Maddox heard, barely audible, the sound he would remember
all his life as the most wonderful sound in the world.

"Dad...." Ken's lips moved with the word. "Dad...." His voice was a plea
for help.




Chapter 9. _Judgment_


There was snow. It covered the whole world beyond the hospital window.
Its depth was frightening, and the walls seemed no barrier. It was as
much inside as out, filling the room to the ceiling with a fluffy white
that swirled and pulsed in waves before his eyes.

Much later, when the pain softened and his vision cleared, he saw the
only real snow was that piled outside almost to the level of the
first-story windows. Within the room, the outline of familiar objects
showed clearly.

In half-recovered consciousness he wondered impersonally about the dying
pain in his head and how he came to be where he was. He could remember
only about a strange thing in the sky, and a great fear.

Then it burst upon him in full recollection--the comet, the dust, the
laboratory. They had proved the dust that was in the comet's tail had
accumulated in the metal surfaces of the failed engines. What more did
they need to prove the comet's responsibility?

He slept, and when he awoke his father was there. "Hi, Son," Professor
Maddox said.

Ken smiled weakly. "Hi, Dad."

Dr. Adams wouldn't let them talk much, and he didn't want Ken's father
to tell him why he was there. He wanted Ken to dredge out of his own
memories the circumstances of the attack.

Ken said, "I've got to get out of here. Things must be getting behind at
the lab. Have you found anything new?"

"Take it easy," his father said. "We've got a little better picture of
what we're up against. The dust is quite definitely from the comet's
tail. It has a very large molecule, and is suspended in our atmosphere
in colloidal form. Its basis is a transuranic element, which is,
however, only slightly radioactive. By volume, it is present in the
amount of about one part in ten million, which is fairly heavy
concentration for an alien substance of that kind.

"Perhaps the most important thing we've found is that it has a strong
affinity for metals, so that its accumulation on metallic surfaces is
much higher than in the general atmosphere."

"It would!" Ken said, with a vague attempt at humor. "Why couldn't it
have had an affinity for old rubber tires, or secondhand galoshes?

"How late is it? Can I get up to the lab this afternoon?" Ken struggled
to a sitting position. A gigantic pain shot through his head and down
his spinal column. He felt as if his head were encased in a cement
block. He fell back with a groan.

"Don't try that again for a few days!" his father said severely. "You're
not going anywhere for quite a while. I have to go now, but your mother
will be in tonight. Maria will come, too. You do what the doctors and
nurses tell you to!"

"Dad--why am I here?" He moaned in agony of both spirit and body.

"You had an accident," said Dr. Adams smoothly. "It will all come back
to you and you'll soon be fine."

Ken watched his father disappear through the doorway. He felt the sting
of a needle in his arm and was aware the nurse was standing near. He
wanted to talk some more, but suddenly he was too tired to do anything.

       *       *       *       *       *

It came to him in the middle of the night, like a dark, wild dream that
could be only the utmost fantasy. He remembered the silent, shapeless
figures against the black wall of the old skating rink, and then he knew
it wasn't a dream because he could remember clearly the words of Jed
Tucker and his father. He could also remember Mr. Allen saying, "We
can't let him go. Whoever he is, we've got to get him out of the way."

He remembered the instant of crashing pain. Mr. Allen had struck with
the intent to kill him. Again, he wondered for a moment if it were not
just a nightmare. Mr. Allen, the town's leading attorney, and Mr.
Tucker, the banker--what would they be doing, plotting robbery and
killing?

In the morning he told his father about it. Professor Maddox could not
believe it, either. "You must be mistaken, Ken," he protested. "These
men are two of our leading citizens. They're both on the Mayor's food
committee. You suffered a pretty terrible shock, and you'll have to
realize the effects of it may be with you, and may upset your thinking,
for quite a while."

"Not about this! I know who it was. I recognized their voices in the
dark. Jed Tucker admitted his identity when I called his name. If
there's anything gone from the warehouse, Sheriff Johnson will find it
in their possession."

The Sheriff had to wait for permission from Dr. Adams, but he came
around that afternoon, and was equally unbelieving. He advanced the same
arguments Professor Maddox had used about the character of those Ken
accused.

"These men will do something far worse, if you don't stop them," said
Ken.

"He's right, there," said Professor Maddox. "Those who did this, menace
the whole community. They've got to be found."

"We'll make fools of ourselves," said the Sheriff, "if we go to Tucker's
and Allen's, and demand to search the premises. We've got to have more
than your word, Ken; some evidence of their positive connection with the
crime."

"I just know I saw and heard them. That's all."

"Listen," the Sheriff said suddenly, "there's one man in this town
that's really out to get you: Frank Meggs. Don't you think it could be
Meggs and some of his friends?"

"No. It wasn't Frank Meggs."

       *       *       *       *       *

Art Matthews came around later that same day. "You look worse than one
of these engines that's got itself full of stardust," he said. "You must
have been off your rocker, prowling around back alleys in the middle of
the night!"

Ken grinned. "Hi, Art. I knew you'd be full of sympathy. What's going on
outside while I've been laid up? Say--I don't even know how long I've
been here! What day is it?"

"Tuesday. Not that it makes any difference any more."

"Tuesday--and it was Saturday when I was working with the spectroscope.
I've been here three days!"

"A week and three days," said Art Matthews. "You were out cold for three
days straight, and they wondered if your bearings were ever going to
turn again."

Ken lay back in astonishment. "Nobody's told me anything. What's
happening outside?"

"It's going to be a rough winter," Art Matthews said, grimly. "Snow's
started heavy, two weeks earlier than usual. I understand Professor
Douglas thinks it's got something to do with the comet dust in the air."

"That figures. What about the fuel supply?"

"In pretty sad shape, too. So far, the stockpile is big enough for about
a week and a half of real cold. They laid off woodcutting for three days
to spend all the time converting oil burners, and making new heaters out
of 50-gallon barrels and anything else they could find. It's going to be
a mighty cold winter--and a hungry one."

Ken nodded, but he seemed to be thinking of something else.

"I've had an idea," he said. "How's your stock of spare parts in the
garage?"

"Good. I always was a fool about stocking up on things I could never
sell."

"Any blocks?"

"About a dozen, why?"

"Could you make a brand-new engine out of spare parts?"

The mechanic considered, then nodded. "I think I could put together a
Ford or Chevy engine. What good would that do? It would run down in a
few days, just like all the rest."

"Do you think it would, if you put it in a sealed room, and supplied
only filtered air to it?"

Art's eyes lighted. "Why the dickens didn't we think of that before? If
we could keep the stardust from getting to the engine, there's no reason
at all why it shouldn't run as long as we wanted it to, is there?"

"If a generator could be assembled in the same way, we could stir up a
little power on an experimental basis, enough to charge our radio
batteries. I wonder how much power could be generated in the whole
country by such means?"

"I know we could get a couple of dozen engines going here in Mayfield,
at least!" said Art.

"Why don't you get started right away? Get some of the club guys to
help. If that filter idea works there may be a lot of things we can do."

Art started for the door. "Sheer genius," he said admiringly. "That's
sheer genius, Boy!"

Ken smiled to himself. He wondered why they hadn't tried that when they
first had the hunch that comet dust could be responsible. Maybe they
could have saved some of the cars if they had rigged more efficient
filters on the air intakes.

His thoughts went back to the attack. He was still thinking about it
when his father and Sheriff Johnson returned.

"We took your word, Son," the Sheriff said, chagrined. "We got a warrant
and searched the Tucker and Allen premises from top to bottom. We went
out to Tucker's farm and went through the barns and the house. They've
got a 2-day supply of rations just like everybody else.

"They screamed their heads off and threatened suit for slander and false
arrest and everything else in the books."

"I'll get hold of Jed Tucker when I get out of here," said Ken. "He'll
talk when I get through with him!"

"Don't get yourself in a worse jam than you've stirred up already.
Unless you can prove what you say, you'll just have to forget it and
keep quiet."

Ken smiled suddenly. "It just occurred to me--when a banker wants to
keep something safe, where does he put it?"

"In the bank, of course," said the Sheriff. "Wait a minute, you don't
think...."

"Why not? The bank isn't doing business any more. Tucker is the only
one, probably, who has any excuse to go down there. As long as things
are the way they are, nobody else is going to get inside the vault--or
even inside the building."

Professor Maddox and the Sheriff looked at each other. "It's a logical
idea," said Ken's father.

"It's as crazy as the rest of it! We've made fools of ourselves already
so we might as well finish the job!"

       *       *       *       *       *

When breakfast was served the next morning, Ken found out his hunch had
been right. He heard it from Miss Haskins the nurse and knew, therefore,
that it must be all over town.

The nurse was wide-eyed. "What do you think?" she said, as she set out
the bowl of oatmeal. "The Sheriff found that Mr. Tucker had filled his
bank vault with food. He'd stolen it from the warehouse. The Sheriff's
men obtained a warrant and forced Tucker to open the vault, and there
were cases of canned goods stacked clear to the ceiling!"

"He must have been afraid of getting hungry," said Ken.

"To think a man like Mr. Tucker would do something like that!" She went
out, clucking her tongue in exaggerated dismay.

Ken leaned back with satisfaction. He quite agreed with Miss Haskins. It
was a pretty awful thing for a man like Mr. Tucker to have done.

How many others would do far worse before the winter was over?

       *       *       *       *       *

The sun came out bright and clear after the series of heavy snowstorms.
The comet added its overwhelming, golden light and tinted the world of
snow. Some of the snow was melted by the tantalizing warmth, but water
that had melted in the daytime froze immediately at night, and the
unequal contest between the elements could have only one outcome in a
prematurely cold and miserable winter.

As the pain in his head dwindled, and he was able to get about in the
hospital, Ken grew more and more impatient to be released. He wondered
about the heating and other facilities in the hospital and learned the
Mayor's committee had ordered one wing kept open at all times, with heat
and food available to care for any emergency cases.

Three days after he was allowed on his feet, Ken was told by Dr. Adams
that he could be released for the hearing of the Tuckers and Mr. Allen.

Ken stared at him. "I don't want to go to any hearing! I'm going back to
the laboratory!"

"You can go home," said Dr. Adams. "I want you to rest a few more days,
and then I would prefer seeing you get out in the open, working with
the wood crew, instead of going right back to the lab.

"As for the trial and hearing, I'm afraid you have no choice. Judge
Rankin has postponed the hearing so that you could appear, and he'll
issue a subpoena if necessary to insure your presence."

"They caught Tucker redhanded with his bank vault stuffed to the ceiling
with stolen goods. They don't need me!"

"They tried to kill you," Dr. Adams reminded him. "That's quite
different from robbing a warehouse."

"I'm not interested in their punishment. It's more important to work on
the analysis of the comet dust."

But there was no way out of it. Judge Rankin ordered Ken to appear. In
spite of the fact that the building was unheated, and mushy snow was
falling from a heavy sky once more, the courtroom was jammed on the day
of the hearing.

Ken raged inwardly at the enormous waste of human resources. Men who
should have been in the hills gathering wood, women who should have been
at work on clothing and food projects were there to feed on the
carcasses of the reputations presently to be destroyed.

Ken had little difficulty feeling sorry for Jed. His former teammate had
been a good sport in all Ken's experience of playing with him. He could
almost feel pity for Jed's father, too. On the stand, the banker looked
steadfastly at the floor as he answered questions in a dull, monotone
voice. He admitted the theft of the warehouse goods.

Judge Rankin asked severely, "Why, Mr. Tucker? Why did you think you had
any more right to hoard supplies than the rest of us?"

For the first time the banker looked up, and he met the judge's eyes.
"We were scared," he said simply. "We were scared of what is going to
happen this winter."

The judge's eyes flashed. "So you were scared?" he cried. "Don't you
think we're all scared?"

The banker shook his head and looked at the floor. "I don't know," he
said, as if in a daze. "We were just scared."

The lawyer, Allen, was more belligerent when he took the stand. "We
merely did what anyone else in this courtroom would do if he had the
chance, and thought of it first," he said. "Do with me what you like,
but before this winter is over, I'll see you self-righteous citizens of
Mayfield at each other's throats for a scrap of food."

He admitted the attack on Ken, but denied the intent to kill.

When Ken's turn came, he told his story as simply and as quickly as
possible, and when he had finished he said, "I'd like to add one more
word, if I may."

The judge nodded. "Go ahead, Ken."

He looked over the faces of the audience. "We've got troubles enough,"
he said slowly. "As much as we hate to admit it, the picture Mr. Allen
gives us may be right--unless we do what we can to stop it.

"We're wasting time and resources today. My father and I should be at
the laboratory. Every man and woman here is neglecting a job. We waste
time, deliberating about punishment for some of our neighbors who are
perhaps weaker, but certainly no more frightened than the rest of us. If
we lock them up in prison somebody has to watch out for them, and the
whole community is deprived of their useful labor.

"Why don't we just let them go?"

A gasp of surprise came from the spectators, but a slow illumination
seemed to light the face of Judge Rankin. His eyes moved from Ken to the
accused men and then to the audience.

"This court has just heard what it considers some very sound advice," he
said. "Jed, Mr. Tucker, Mr. Allen...."

The three stood before him.

"I am taking it upon myself, because of the emergency conditions that
confront us, to declare that the penalty for your crime is continued and
incessant labor at any task the community may see fit to assign you. You
are marked men. Your crime is known to every member of this community.
There will be no escape from the surveillance of your neighbors and
friends. I sentence you to so conduct yourselves in the eyes of these
people that, if we do come through this time of crisis, you may stand
redeemed for all time of the crime which you have committed.

"If you fail to do this, the punishment which will be automatically
imposed is banishment from this community for the duration of the
emergency.

"Court stands adjourned!"

A burst of cheers broke out in the room. The Tuckers and Mr. Allen
looked as if they could not believe what they had heard. Then Jed turned
suddenly and rushed toward Ken.

"It's no good saying I've been a fool, but let me say thanks for your
help."

Mr. Tucker took Ken's other hand. "You'll never regret it, young man.
I'll see to it that you never regret it."

"It's okay," said Ken, almost gruffly. "We've all got a lot of work to
do."

He turned as a figure brushed by them. Mr. Allen pushed through the
crowd to the doorway. He looked at no one.

"We were fools," said Mr. Tucker bitterly. "Brainless, scared fools."

When they were gone, Dr. Aylesworth put his hand on Ken's shoulder.
"That was a mighty fine thing you did. I hope it sets a pattern for all
of us in times to come."

"I didn't do it for them," said Ken. "I did it for myself."

The minister smiled and clapped the boy's shoulder again. "Nevertheless,
you did it. That's what counts."




Chapter 10. _Victory of the Dust_


By the time Ken was through with the ordeal in court, Art Matthews had
succeeded in building an engine from entirely new parts. He had it
installed in an airtight room into which only filtered air could pass.

This room, and another air filter, had been major projects in
themselves. The science club members had done most of the work after
their daily stint at the laboratory, while Art had scoured the town for
parts that would fit together.

At the end of the hearing Ken went to the garage. The engine had been
running for 5 hours then. Art was grinning like a schoolboy who had just
won a spelling bee. "She sure sounds sweet," he said. "I'll bet we can
keep her going as long as we have gasoline."

"I hope so," Ken said. "It's just a waste of power to let it run that
way, though."

Art scratched his head. "Yeah. It's funny, power is what we've been
wanting, and now we've got a little we don't know what to do with it."

"Let's see if we can find a generator," said Ken. "Charge some batteries
with it. Do you think there's one in town?"

"The best deal I can think of would be to scrounge a big motor, say an
elevator motor, and convert it. The one belonging to the 5-story
elevator in the Norton Building is our best bet. I don't imagine it
froze up before the power went out."

"Let's get it then," said Ken. "Shut this off until we're ready to use
it. To be on the safe side, could you cast some new bearings for the
generator?"

"I don't see why not."

When he returned home Ken told his father for the first time about the
project Art was working on.

"It sounds interesting," Professor Maddox said. "I'm not sure exactly
what it will prove."

Ken slumped in the large chair in the living room, weak after his
exertions of the day. "It would mean that if we could find enough
unfrozen engines, or could assemble them from spare parts, we could get
some power equipment in operation again.

"However, as Art said about this one engine, what good is it? Dad--even
if we lick this problem, how are things ever going to get started up
again?"

"What do you mean?"

"We've got one automobile engine going. Pretty soon we'll run out of gas
here in Mayfield. Where do we get more? We can't until the railroad can
haul it, or the pipelines can pump it. What happens when the stock at
the refineries is all used up? How can they get into operation again?
They need power for their own plant, electricity for their pumps and
engines. All of their frozen equipment has to be replaced. Maybe some of
it will have to be manufactured. How do the factories and plants get
started again?"

"I don't know the answers to all that," Ken's father said. "Licking the
comet dust _is_ only half the problem--and perhaps the smallest half, at
that. Our economy and industry will have to start almost from scratch in
getting underway. How that will come about, if it ever does, I do not
know."

To conserve their ration of firewood, only a small blaze burned in the
fireplace. The kitchen and living room were being heated by it alone.
The rest of the house was closed off.

"We ought to rig up something else," Ken said tiredly. "That wastes too
much heat. What's Mom cooking on?"

"Mayor Hilliard found a little wood burner and gave it to me. I haven't
had time to try converting our oil furnace."

Ken felt unable to stay awake longer. He went upstairs to bed for a few
hours. Later, his mother brought a dinner tray. "Do you want it here, or
would you rather come down where it's warm?" she asked.

"I'll come down. I want to get up for a while."

"Maria is out in the shack. She has a scheduled contact with Berkeley,
but she says the transmitter won't function. It looks like a burned-out
tube to her. She wanted to call Joe."

Ken scrambled out of bed and grabbed for his clothes. "I'll take care of
it. Save dinner for me. We've got to keep the station on the air, no
matter what happens!"

He found Maria seated by the desk, listening to the Berkeley operator's
repeated call, to which she could not reply. The girl wore a heavy
cardigan sweater, which was scarcely sufficient for the cold in the
room. The small, tin-can heater was hardly noticeable.

Maria looked up as Ken burst through the doorway. "I didn't want you to
come," she said. "They could have called Joe."

"We can't risk disturbing our schedule. They might think we've gone
under and we'd lose our contact completely."

Hastily he examined the tube layout and breathed a sigh of relief when
he saw it was merely one of the 801's that had burned a filament. They
had a good stock of spares. He replaced the tube and closed the
transmitter cage. After the tubes had warmed up, and the Berkeley
operator paused to listen for their call, Ken picked up the microphone
and threw in the antenna switch.

"Mayfield calling Berkeley." He repeated this several times. "Our
transmitter's been out with a bum bottle. Let us know if you read us
now." He repeated again and switched back to the receiver.

The Berkeley operator's voice indicated his relief. "I read you,
Mayfield. I hoped you hadn't gone out of commission. The eggheads here
seem to think your Maddox-Larsen combination is coming up with more dope
on comet dust than anybody else in the country."

Ken grinned and patted himself and Maria on the back. "That's us," he
said. She grimaced at him.

"Hush!" she said.

"I've got a big report here from Dr. French. Confirm if you're ready to
tape it, and I'll let it roll."

Maria cut in to confirm that they were receiving and ready to record.
The Berkeley operator chuckled as he came back. "That's the one I like
to hear," he said. "That 'Scandahoovian' accent is real cute. Just as
soon as things get rolling again I'm coming out there to see what else
goes with it."

"He's an idiot," Maria said.

"But probably a pretty nice guy," Ken said.

They listened carefully as the Berkeley operator read a number of pages
of reports by Dr. French and his associates, concerning experiments run
in the university laboratories. These gave Ken a picture of the present
stage of the work on the comet dust. He felt disheartened. Although the
material had been identified as a colloidal compound of a new,
transuranic metal, no one had yet been able to determine its exact
chemical structure nor involve it in any reaction that would break it
down.

It seemed to Ken that one of the biggest drawbacks was lack of
sufficient sample material to work with. Everything they were doing was
by micromethods. He supposed it was his own lack of experience and his
clumsiness in the techniques that made him feel he was always working in
the dark when trying to analyze chemical specimens that were barely
visible.

When the contact was completed and the stations signed off, Maria told
Ken what she had heard over the air during the time he was in the
hospital. Several other amateur operators in various parts of the
country had heard them with their own battery-powered sets. They had
asked to join in an expanded news net.

Joe and Al had agreed to this, and Ken approved as he heard of it. "It's
a good idea. I was hoping to reach some other areas. Maybe we can add
some industrial laboratories to our net if any are still operating."

"We've got three," said Maria. "General Electric in Schenectady, General
Motors in Detroit, and Hughes in California. Amateurs working for these
companies called in. They're all working on the dust."

Through these new amateur contacts Maria had learned that Chicago had
been completely leveled by fire. Thousands had died in the fire and in
the rioting that preceded it.

New York City had suffered almost as much, although no general fire had
broken out. Mob riots over the existing, scanty food supplies had taken
thousands of lives. Other thousands had been lost in a panicky exodus
from the city. The highways leading into the farming areas in upstate
New York and New England areas were clogged with starving refugees.
Thousands of huddled bodies lay under the snow.

Westward into Pennsylvania and south into Delaware it was the same. Here
the refugees were met with other streams of desperate humanity moving
out of the thickly populated cities. Epidemics of disease had broken
out where the starving population was thickest and the sanitary
facilities poorest.

On the west coast the situation was somewhat better. The population of
the Bay Area was streaming north and south toward Red Bluff and
Sacramento, and into the Salinas and San Joaquin valleys. From southern
California they were moving east to the reclaimed desert farming areas.
There were suffering and death among them, but the rioting and mob
violence were less.

From all over the country there were increasing reports of groups of
wanderers moving like nomadic tribesmen, looting, killing, and
destroying. There was no longer any evidence of a central government
capable of sufficient communication to control these elements of the
population on even a local basis.

Maria played the tapes of these reports for Ken. She seemed stolid and
beyond panic as she heard them again. To Ken, hearing them for the first
time, it seemed utterly beyond belief. It was simply some
science-fiction horror story played on the radio or television, and when
it was over he would find the world was completely normal.

He looked up and saw Maria watching him. He saw the little tin-can stove
with a few sticks of green wood burning ineffectively. He saw the large
rack of batteries behind the transmitter. Unexpectedly, for the first
time in many days, he thought of the Italian steamship alone in the
middle of the Atlantic.

"The _White Bird_," he said to Maria. "Did you hear anything more of
her?"

"One of the amateurs told me he'd picked up a report from the ship about
a week ago. The radio operator said he was barricaded in the radio room.
Rioting had broken out all over the ship. Dozens of passengers had been
killed; the ones who were left were turning cannibalistic. That was the
last report anyone has heard from the ship."

Ken shuddered. He glanced through the window and caught a vision of
Science Hall on College Hill. A fortress, he thought. There were maybe a
dozen other such fortresses scattered throughout the world; in them lay
the only hope against the enemy that rampaged across the Earth.

In the sky, he could see the comet's light faintly, even through the
lead-gray clouds from which snow was falling.

"You should get back to bed," said Maria. "You look as if you had been
hit two hours ago instead of two weeks."

"Yeah, I guess I'd better." Ken arose, feeling weak and dizzy. "Can you
get that report typed for Dad tonight? It would be good for him to be
able to take it to the lab with him in the morning."

"I'll get it done," said Maria. "You get off to bed."

As much as he rebelled against it, Ken was forced to spend the next two
days in bed. Dr. Adams allowed him to be up no more than a few hours on
the third day. "I'm afraid you took a worse beating than any of us
thought," the doctor said. "You'll just have to coast for a while."

It was as he was finally getting out of bed again that he heard Art
Matthews, when the mechanic came to the door and spoke with Ken's
mother.

"This is awfully important," Art said. "I wish you'd ask him if he
doesn't feel like seeing me for just a minute."

"He's had a bad relapse, and the doctor says he has to be kept very
quiet for a day or two longer."

Dressed, except for his shoes, Ken went to the hall and leaned over the
stair railing. "I'll be down in just a minute, Art. It's okay, Mom. I'm
feeling good today."

"Ken! You shouldn't!" his mother protested.

In a moment he had his shoes on and was racing down the stairs. "What's
happened, Art? Anything gone wrong?"

The mechanic looked downcast. "Everything! We got the Norton elevator
motor and hooked it up with the gas engine. It ran fine for a couple of
days, and we got a lot of batteries charged up."

"Then it quit," said Ken.

"Yeah--how did you know?"

"I've been afraid we had missed one bet. It just isn't enough to supply
filtered air to the engines built of new parts. The parts themselves are
already contaminated with the dust. As soon as they go into operation,
we have the same old business, all over again.

"Unless some means of decontamination can be found these new parts are
no better than the old ones."

"Some of these parts were wrapped in tissue paper and sealed in
cardboard boxes!" Art protested. "How could enough dust get to them to
ruin them?"

"The dust has a way of getting into almost any corner it wants to," said
Ken. "Dad and the others have found it has a tremendous affinity for
metals, so it seeps through cracks and sticks. It never moves off once
it hits a piece of metal. What parts of the engine froze?"

"Pistons, bearings--just like all the rest."

"The generator shaft, too?"

Art nodded. "It might have gone a few more revolutions. It seemed loose
when we started work, but as soon as we broke the bearings apart they
seemed to fasten onto the shaft like they were alive. How do you account
for that? The bearings were new; I just cast them yesterday."

"They were contaminated by dust between casting and installation in the
protected room. We've got to dig a lot deeper before we've got the right
answer. It might be worthwhile setting up another rig just like the one
we have in order to get some more juice in our batteries. Do you think
you could do it again, or even several times? That engine lasted about
90 hours, didn't it?"

"Eighty-eight, altogether. I suppose I could do it again if you think
it's worth it. The trouble is getting generators. Maybe we could machine
the shaft of this one and cast a new set of bearings to fit. I'll try if
you think it's worth it."

"Get it ready to run," said Ken. "The battery power for our radio isn't
going to last forever. We'll be in a real jam if we lose touch with the
outside."




Chapter 11. _The Animals Are Sick_


That night, Ken reported to his father the fate of the engine assembled
by Art.

"It did seem too good to be true," said Professor Maddox. He stretched
wearily in the large chair by the feeble heat of the fireplace. "It
bears out our observation of the affinity of the dust for metals."

"How is that?"

"It attaches itself almost like a horde of microscopic magnets. It
literally burrows into the surface of the metal."

"You don't mean that!"

"I do. Its presence breaks down the surface tension, as we had supposed.
The substance actually then works its way into the interstices of the
molecules. As the colloid increases in quantity, its molecules loosen
the bond between the molecules of the metal, giving them increased
freedom of motion.

"This can be aggravated by frictional contacts, and finally we have the
molecular interchange that binds the two pieces into one."

"The only metal that would be clean would be that which had been
hermetically sealed since before the appearance of the comet," said Ken.
"Look--wouldn't this affinity of the dust for metal provide a means of
purifying the atmosphere? If we could run the air through large filters
of metal wool, the dust would be removed!"

"Yes, I'm very sure we could do it that way. It would merely require
that we run the atmosphere of the whole Earth through such a filter. Do
you have any idea how that could be done?"

"It would work in the laboratory, but would be wholly impractical on a
worldwide scale," Ken admitted. "How will we ever rid the atmosphere of
the dust! A colloid will float forever in the air, even after the comet
is gone."

"Exactly," Professor Maddox said, "and, as far as we are concerned, the
whole atmosphere of the Earth is permanently poisoned. Our problem is to
process it in some manner to remove that poison.

"During the past few days we have come to the conclusion that there are
only two alternatives: One is to process the whole atmosphere by passing
it through some device, such as the filter you have suggested. The
second is to put some substance into the air which will counteract and
destroy the dust, precipitate it out of the atmosphere."

"Since the first method is impractical what can be used in carrying out
the second?"

"We've set ourselves the goal of discovering that. We're hoping to
synthesize the necessary chemical compound to accomplish it."

"It would have to be a colloid, too, capable of suspension in the
atmosphere," said Ken.

"Correct."

"If we do find such a substance we still have the problem of
decontaminating existing metals. We couldn't build a moving piece of
machinery out of any metal now in existence without first cleaning the
dust out of its surface."

"That's part of the problem, too," said his father.

       *       *       *       *       *

Ken resumed his duties in the laboratory the following morning. Dr.
Adams had warned him not to walk up College Hill, so he had borrowed the
horse Dave Whitaker still had on loan from his uncle. He felt
self-conscious about being the only one enjoying such luxury, but he
promised himself he would go back to walking as soon as Dr. Adams gave
permission.

On the third day, the horse slipped and fell as it picked its way
carefully down the hill. Ken was thrown clear, into the deep snow, but
the horse lay where it had fallen, as if unable to move. Ken feared the
animal had broken a leg. He felt cautiously but could find no evidence
of injury.

Gently, he tugged at the reins and urged the horse to its feet. The
animal finally rose, but it stood uncertainly and trembled when it tried
to walk again.

Ken walked rather than rode the rest of the way home. He took the horse
to the improvised stable beside the science shack. There he got out the
ration of hay and water, and put a small amount of oats in the trough.
The animal ignored the food and drink.

After dinner, Ken went out again to check. The horse was lying down in
the stall and the food remained untouched.

Ken returned to the house and said to his father, "Dave's horse slipped
today, and I'm afraid something serious is wrong with him. He doesn't
seem to have any broken bones, but he won't eat or get up. I think I
should go for the vet."

His father agreed. "We can't afford to risk a single horse, considering
how precious they are now. You stay in the house and I'll go to Dr.
Smithers' place myself."

Ken protested. He hated to see his father go out again on such a cold
night.

Dr. Smithers grumbled when Professor Maddox reached his house and
explained what he wanted. As one of the town's two veterinarians, he had
been heavily overworked since the disaster struck. The slightest sign
of injury or illness in an animal caused the Mayor's livestock committee
to call for help.

"Probably nothing but a strained ligament," Smithers said. "You could
have taken care of it by wrapping it yourself."

"We think you ought to come."

When the veterinarian finally reached the side of the animal, he
inspected him carefully by the light of a gasoline lantern. The horse
was lying on his side in a bed of hay; he was breathing heavily and his
eyes were bright and glassy.

Dr. Smithers sucked his breath in sharply and bent closer. Finally, he
got to his feet and stared out over the expanse of snow. "It couldn't
be," he muttered. "We just don't deserve that. We don't deserve it at
all."

"What is it?" Ken asked anxiously. "Is it something very serious?"

"I don't know for sure. It looks like--it could be anthrax. I'm just
afraid that it is."

Dr. Smithers' eyes met and held Professor Maddox's. Ken did not
understand. "I've heard that name, but I don't know what it is."

"One of the most deadly diseases of warm-blooded animals. Spreads like
wildfire when it gets a start. It can infect human beings, too. How
could it happen here? There hasn't been a case of anthrax in the valley
for years!"

"I remember Dave Whitaker saying his uncle got two new horses from a
farmer near Britton just a week before the comet," said Ken. "Maybe it
could have come from there."

"Perhaps," said Smithers.

"What can we do?" asked Professor Maddox. "Can't we start a program of
vaccination to keep it from spreading?"

"How much anthrax vaccine do you suppose there is in the whole town?
Before we decide anything I want to get Hart and make some tests. If he
agrees with me we've got to get hold of the Mayor and the Council and
decide on a course of action tonight."

Hart was the other veterinarian, a younger man, inclined to look askance
at Dr. Smithers' older techniques.

"I'd just as soon take your word," said Professor Maddox. "If you think
we ought to take action, let's do it."

"I want Hart here first," said Smithers. "He's a know-it-all, but he's
got a good head and good training in spite of it. Someday he'll be a
good man, and you'll need one after I'm gone."

"I'll go," said Ken. "You've already been out, Dad. It's only 4 or 5
blocks, and I feel fine."

"Well, if you feel strong enough," said his father hesitantly. Fatigue
was obvious in his face.

Dr. Hart was asleep when Ken pounded on his door. He persisted until the
veterinarian came, sleepily and rebelliously. Ken told his story
quickly.

Hart grunted in a surly voice. "Anthrax! That fool Smithers probably
wouldn't know a case of anthrax if it stared him in the face. Tell him
to give your horse a shot of terramycin, and I'll come around in the
morning. If I went out on every scare, I'd never get any sleep."

"Dr. Hart," Ken said quietly. "You know what it means if it is anthrax."

The veterinarian blinked under Ken's accusing stare. "All right," he
said finally. "But if Smithers is getting me out on a wild-goose chase
I'll run him out of town!"

Smithers and Professor Maddox were still beside the ailing horse when
Ken returned with Dr. Hart. No one spoke a word as they came up. Hart
went to work on his examination, Ken holding the lantern for him.

"Here's a carbuncle, right back of the ear!" he said accusingly. "Didn't
anybody notice this earlier?"

"I'm afraid not," Ken admitted. "I guess I haven't taken very good care
of him."

"Ken's been in the hospital," Professor Maddox said.

"I know," Hart answered irritably, "but I think anybody would have
noticed this carbuncle; these infections are characteristic. There's not
much question about what it is, but we ought to get a smear and make a
microscope slide check of it."

"I've got a 1500-power instrument," said Ken. "If that's good enough you
can use it."

Hart nodded. "Get some sterile slides."

       *       *       *       *       *

Afterward, Smithers said, "We've got to get Jack Nelson first and find
out how much anthrax vaccine he's got in his store. Nobody else in town
will have any, except maybe some of his customers who may have bought
some lately. What about the college laboratories? Do they have any?"

"I don't know," said Professor Maddox. "We'll have to contact Dr. Bintz
for that."

"Let's get at it," said Hart. "We've got to wake up the Mayor and the
Council. The cattle committee will have to be there. Nelson and Bintz,
too. We'll find out how much vaccine we've got and decide what to do
with it."

Two hours later the men met in the Council chambers of City Hall.
Because of the lack of heat, they retained their overcoats and sheepskin
jackets. The incrusted snow on their boots did not even soften. In
soberness and shock they listened to Dr. Smithers.

"Nobody grows up in a farming community without knowing what anthrax
means," he said. "We've got a total of twenty-eight hundred head of beef
and dairy cattle in the valley, plus a couple of thousand sheep, and
about a hundred horses.

"Jack Nelson's stock of vaccine, plus what he thinks may be in the hands
of his customers, plus some at the college is enough to treat about a
thousand animals altogether. Those that aren't treated will have to be
slaughtered. If they prove to be uninfected they can be processed for
meat storage.

"Some vaccine will have to be held in reserve, but if we don't clean up
the valley before next year's calf crop we won't stand a chance of
increasing our herds. That's the situation we're up against, Gentlemen."

Mayor Hilliard arose. "The only question seems to me to be which animals
are of most worth to us. I say we should let all the sheep go. A cow or
a horse is worth more than a sheep to us now.

"That leaves the question of the horses. Which is worth more to us: a
horse or a cow? We can't haul logs without horses, but we won't need to
worry about staying warm if we haven't got food enough."

Harry Mason of the fuel committee stood up immediately. "I say we've got
to keep every horse we've got. It would be crazy to give any of them up.
There aren't enough now to haul the fuel we need."

"A horse is a poor trade for a cow in these times," protested the food
committee's chief, Paul Remington. "Every cow you let go means milk for
two or three families. It means a calf for next year's meat supply. We
can freeze and still stay alive. We can't starve and do the same thing.
I say, let every horse in the valley go. Keep the cows and beef cattle."

An instant hubbub arose, loudly protesting or approving these two
extreme views. Mayor Hilliard pounded on the desk for order. "We've got
to look at both sides of the question," he said, when the confusion had
died down. "I know there are some horses we can lose without much
regret; they don't haul as much as they eat. What Paul says, however, is
true: Every horse we keep means trading it for a cow and the food a cow
can provide.

"I think we need to keep some horses, but it ought to be the bare
minimum. I've got an idea about this log hauling. Right now, and for a
long time to come, we don't need horses once the logs are on the road.
It's a downgrade all the way to town. When the road freezes hard we can
coast a sled all the way if we rig a way to steer and brake it properly.
There are only two bad curves coming out of the canyon, and I think we
can figure a way to take care of them. Maybe a team at each one.

"This would leave most of the horses free to snake the logs out of the
hills to the road. I'm for cutting the horses to twenty-five, selecting
the best breeding stock we've got, and including the ones needed for
emergency riding, such as the Sheriff has."

For another hour it was argued back and forth, but in the end the
Mayor's plan was adopted. Then Dr. Aylesworth, who had not previously
spoken during the whole meeting, arose quietly.

"I think there's something we're forgetting, Gentlemen," he said.
"Something we've forgotten all along. Now that we are faced with our
most serious crisis yet, I suggest that you members of our city
government pass a resolution setting aside the next Sabbath as a special
day of prayer. Ask the ministers of all our denominations to co-operate
in offering special prayer services for the safety of our animals, which
we need so badly, and for the success of those who are working on
College Hill and elsewhere to find a solution to this grave problem."

Mayor Hilliard nodded approvingly. "We should have done it long ago," he
agreed. "If no one has any objections I will so declare as Dr.
Aylesworth has suggested." There were nods of approval from everyone in
the room.

By dawn the next morning the crews were ready to begin the vaccination
program. One by one, they examined the animals to make sure the best
were saved. The rest were slaughtered, examined for signs of anthrax,
and most were prepared for storage.

       *       *       *       *       *

On Sunday, while the cattle crews still worked, Ken and his parents
attended services in Dr. Aylesworth's congregation. A solemnity was over
the whole valley, and the only sound anywhere seemed to be the tolling
of the bells in the churches.

The anthrax outbreak had seemed to the people of Mayfield one more, and
perhaps a final, proof that their hope of survival was beyond all
realization. Before, with severe rationing, it had seemed that they
would need a miracle to get them through the winter. Now, with the
brutally lessened supply of milk and breeding cattle, it seemed beyond
the power of any miracle.

Dr. Aylesworth's white mane behind the pulpit was like a symbol
testifying that they never need give up hope as long as any desire for
life was in them. In himself there seemed no doubt of their eventual
salvation, and in his sermon he pleaded with them to maintain their
strength and hope and faith.

In his prayer he asked, "Father, bless our cattle and our beasts of
burden that this illness that has stricken them may be healed. Bless us
that our hearts may not fail us in this time of trial, but teach us to
bear our burdens that we may give thanks unto Thee when the day of our
salvation doth come. Amen."




Chapter 12. _Decontamination_


By late November some drifts of snow on the flats were 3 feet deep. The
temperature dropped regularly to ten or more below zero at night and
seldom went above freezing in the daytime. The level of the log pile in
the woodyard dropped steadily in spite of the concentrated efforts of
nearly every available able-bodied man in the community to add to it.
Crews cut all night long by the light of gasoline lanterns. The fuel
ration had to be lowered to meet their rate of cutting.

The deep snow hampered Mayor Hilliard's plan to sled the logs downhill
without use of teams. Criticisms and grumblings at his decision to
sacrifice the horses grew swiftly.

There had been no more signs of anthrax, and some were saying the whole
program of vaccination and slaughter had been a stupid mistake. In spite
of the assurance of the veterinarians that it was the only thing that
could have been done, the grumbling went on like a rolling wave as the
severity of the winter increased.

The Council was finally forced to issue a conservation order requiring
families to double up, two to a house, on the theory that it would be
more efficient to heat one house than parts of two. Selection of family
pairings was optional. Close friends and relatives moved together
wherever possible. Where no selection was made the committee assigned
families to live together.

As soon as the order was issued, Ken's mother suggested they invite the
Larsens to move in with them. The Swedish family was happy to accept.

Thanksgiving, when it came, was observed in spirit, but scarcely in
fact. There were some suggestions that Mayor Hilliard should order
special rations for that day and for Christmas, at least, but he stuck
to his ironhard determination that every speck of food would be
stretched to the limit. No special allowance would be made for
Thanksgiving or any other occasion until the danger was over.

Ken and his father and their friends had done their share of criticizing
the Mayor in the past, but they now had only increasing admiration for
his determination to take a stand for the principles he knew to be
right, no matter how stern. Previously, most of the townspeople had
considered him very good at giving highly patriotic Fourth of July
speeches, and not much good at anything else. Now, Ken realized, the
bombastic little man seemed to have come alive, fully and miraculously
alive.

       *       *       *       *       *

The day after Thanksgiving Ken and Professor Maddox were greeted by Mrs.
Maddox upon coming home. "Maria wants you to come to the radio shack
right away," she said. "There's something important coming in from
Berkeley."

They hurried to the shack, and Maria looked up in relief as they
entered. "I'm so glad you're here!" she cried. "Dr. French is on the
radio personally. I've been recording him, but he wants to talk to you.
He's breaking in every 10 minutes to give me a chance to let him know if
you're here. It's almost time, now."

Ken and his father caught a fragment of a sentence spoken by the
Berkeley scientist, and then the operator came on. "Berkeley requesting
acknowledgment, Mayfield."

Ken picked up the microphone and answered. "This is Mayfield, Ken Maddox
talking. My father is here and will speak with Dr. French."

Professor Maddox sat down at the desk. "This is Professor Maddox," he
said. "I came in time to hear your last sentence, Dr. French. They tell
me you have something important to discuss. Please go ahead."

Ken switched over to receive, and in a moment the calm, persuasive voice
of Dr. French was heard in the speaker. "I'm glad you came in, Dr.
Maddox," he said. "On the tape you have my report of some experiments we
have run the last few days. They are not finished, and if circumstances
were normal I would certainly not report a piece of work in this stage.

"I feel optimistic, however, that we are on the verge of a substantial
breakthrough in regard to the precipitant we are looking for. I would
like you to repeat the work I have reported and go on from there, using
your own ideas. I wanted you to have it, along with the people in
Pasadena, in case anything should happen here. In my opinion it could be
only a matter of days until we have a solution."

"I certainly hope you are right," said Professor Maddox. "Why do you
speak of the possibility of something happening. Is there trouble?"

"Yes. Rioting has broken out repeatedly in the entire Bay Area during
the past 3 days. Food supplies are almost non-existent. At the
university here, those of us remaining have our families housed in
classrooms. We have some small stock of food, but it's not enough for an
indefinite stay. The rioting may sweep over us. The lack of food may
drive us out before we can finish. You are in a better position there
for survival purposes. I hope nothing happens to interrupt your work.

"Our local government is crumbling fast. They have attempted to supply
the community with seafood, but there are not enough sailing vessels.
Perhaps two-thirds of the population have migrated. Some have returned.
Thousands have died. I feel our time is limited. Give my report your
careful attention and let me know your opinion tomorrow."

They broke contact, uneasiness filling the hearts of Dr. French's
listeners in Mayfield. Up to now, the Berkeley scientist had seemed
impassive and utterly objective. Now, to hear him speak of his own
personal disaster, induced in them some of his own premonition of
collapse.

When Maria had typed the report Professor Maddox stayed up until the
early-morning hours, studying it, developing equations, and making
calculations of his own. Ken stayed with him, trying to follow the
abstruse work, and follow his father's too-brief explanations.

When he finished, Professor Maddox was enthusiastic. "I believe he's on
the right track," he said. "Unfortunately, he hasn't told all he knows
in this report. He must have been too excited about the work.
Ordinarily, he leaves nothing out, but he's omitted three or four
important steps near the end. I'll have to ask him to fill them in
before we can do very much with his processes."

The report was read and discussed at the college laboratory the next
day, and the scientists began preliminary work to duplicate Dr. French's
results. Ken and his father hurried home early in order to meet the
afternoon schedule with Berkeley and get Dr. French to the microphone to
answer the questions he had neglected to consider.

As they arrived at the radio shack and opened the door they found Maria
inside, with her head upon the desk. Deep sobs shook her body. The
receiver was on, but only the crackle of static came from it. The
filaments of the transmitter tubes were lit, but the antenna switch was
open. The tape recorder was still running.

Professor Maddox grasped Maria by the shoulders and drew her back in the
chair. "What is the matter?" he exclaimed. "Why are you crying, Maria?"

"It's all over," she said. "There's nothing more down there. Just
nothing..."

"What do you mean?" Ken cried.

"It's on the tape. You can hear it for yourself."

Ken quickly reversed the tape and turned it to play. In a moment the
familiar voice of their Berkeley friend was heard. "I'm glad you're
early," it said. "There isn't much time today. The thing Dr. French
feared has happened.

"Half the Bay Area is in flames. On the campus here, the administration
building is gone. They tried to blow up the science building. It's
burning pretty fast in the other wing. I'm on the third floor. Did I
ever tell you I moved my stuff over here to be close to the lab?

"There must be a mob of a hundred thousand out there in the streets. Or
rather, several hundred mobs that add up to that many. None of them know
where they're going. It's like a monster with a thousand separate heads
cut loose to thrash about before it dies. I see groups of fifty or a
hundred running through the streets burning and smashing things.
Sometimes they meet another group coming from the opposite direction.
Then they fight until the majority of one group is dead, and the others
have run away.

"The scientists were having a meeting here until an hour ago. They
gathered what papers and notes they could and agreed that each would try
to make his own way, with his family, out of the city. They agreed to
try to meet in Salinas 6 weeks from now, if possible. I don't think any
of them will ever meet again."

A sudden tenseness surged into the operator's voice. "I can see him down
there!" he cried in despair. "Dr. French--he's running across the campus
with a load of books and a case of his papers and they're trying to get
him. He's on the brow of a little hill and the mob is down below.
They're laughing at him and shooting. They almost look like college
students. He's down--they got him."

A choking sob caught the operator's voice. "That's all there is," he
said. "I hope you can do something with the information Dr. French gave
you yesterday. Berkeley is finished. I'm going to try to get out of here
myself now. I don't think I stand much of a chance. The mobs are
swarming all over the campus. I can hear the fire on the other side of
the building. Maybe I won't even make it outside. Tell the Professor and
Ken so long. I sure wish I could have made it to Mayfield to see what
goes with that Swedish accent. 73 YL."

       *       *       *       *       *

After dinner, Professor Maddox announced his intention of going back to
the laboratory. Mrs. Maddox protested vigorously.

"I couldn't sleep even if I went to bed," he said, "thinking about
what's happened today in Berkeley."

"What if a thing like that happened here?" Mrs. Larsen asked with
concern. "_Could_ it?"

"We're in a much better position than the metropolitan areas," said
Professor Maddox. "I think we'll manage if we can keep our people from
getting panicky. It's easier, too, because there aren't so many of us."

Professor Larsen went back to the laboratory with the Maddoxes.
Throughout the night they reviewed the work of Dr. French. To Ken it
seemed that they were using material out of the past, since all of those
responsible for it were probably dead.

"We'll have to fill in these missing steps," said Professor Maddox. "We
know what he started with and we know the end results at which he was
aiming. I think we can fill the gaps."

"I agree," said Professor Larsen. "I think we should not neglect to
pass this to our people in Stockholm. You will see that is done?" he
asked Ken.

"Our next schedule in that area is day after tomorrow. Or I could get it
to them on the emergency watch tomorrow afternoon."

"Use emergency measures. I think it is of utmost importance that they
have this quickly."

       *       *       *       *       *

As the days passed, strangers were appearing more and more frequently in
Mayfield. Ken saw them on the streets as he went to the warehouse for
his family's food ration. He did not know everyone who lived in the
valley, of course, but he was sure some of the people he was meeting now
were total strangers, and there seemed so many of them.

He had heard stories of how some of them had come, one by one, or in
small groups of a family or two. They had made their way from cities to
the north or the south, along the highway that passed through the
valley. They had come in rags, half-starved, out of the blizzards to the
unexpected sanctuary of a town that still retained a vestige of
civilization.

Unexpectedly, Ken found this very subject was being discussed in the
ration lines when he reached the warehouse. People had in their hands
copies of the twice-weekly mimeographed newssheet put out by the
Council. Across the top in capital letters was the word: PROCLAMATION.

Ken borrowed a sheet and read, "According to the latest count we've made
through the ration roll, there are now present in Mayfield almost three
thousand people who are refugees from other areas and have come in since
the beginning of the disaster.

"As great as our humanitarian feelings are, and although we should like
to be able to relieve the suffering of the whole world, if it were in
our power to do so, it is obviously impossible. Our food supplies are at
mere subsistence level now. Before next season's crops are in, it may be
necessary to reduce them still further.

"In view of this fact, the Mayor and the City Council have determined to
issue a proclamation as of this date that every citizen of Mayfield will
be registered and numbered and no rations will be issued except by
proper identification and number. It is hereby ordered that no one
hereafter shall permit the entrance of any stranger who was not a
resident of Mayfield prior to this date.

"A barbed-wire inclosure is to be constructed around the entire
residential and business district, and armed guards will be posted
against all refugees who may attempt to enter. Crews will be assigned to
the erection of the fence, and guard duty will be rotated among the male
citizens."

Ken passed the sheet back to his neighbor. His mind felt numb as he
thought of some of those he had seen shuffling through the deep snow in
town. He knew now how he had known they were strangers. Their pinched,
haunted faces showed the evidence of more privation and hardship than
any in Mayfield had yet known. These were the ones who would be turned
away from now on.

Ken heard the angry buzz of comments all around him. "Should have done
it long ago," a plump woman somewhere behind him was saying. "What right
have they got to come in and eat our food?"

A man at the head of the line was saying, "They ought to round them all
up and make them move on. Three thousand--that would keep the people
who've got a right here going a long time."

Someone else, not quite so angry, said, "They're people just like us.
You know what the Bible says about that. We ought to share as long as we
can."

"Yeah, and pretty soon there won't be anything for anybody to share!"

"That may be true, but it's what we're supposed to do. It's what we've
_got_ to do if we're going to stay human. I'll take anybody into my
house who knocks on my door."

"When you see your kids crying for food you can't give them you'll
change your tune!"

Just ahead of him in line Ken saw a small, silent woman who looked about
with darting glances of fear. She was trembling with fright as much as
with the cold that penetrated her thin, ragged, cloth coat.

She was one of them, Ken thought. She was one who had come from the
outside. He wondered which of the loud-mouthed ones beside him would be
willing to be the first to take her beyond the bounds of Mayfield and
force her to move on.

       *       *       *       *       *

That night, at dinner, he spoke of it to his parents and the Larsens.

"It's a problem that has to be faced," said Professor Maddox, "and
Hilliard is choosing the solution he thinks is right. He's no more
heartless than Dr. Aylesworth, for example."

"It seems a horrible thing," said Mrs. Larsen. "What will happen to
those who are turned away?"

"They will die," said Dr. Larsen. "They will go away and wander in the
snow until they die."

"Why should we have any more right to live than they?" asked Mrs.
Maddox. "How can we go on eating and being comfortable while they are
out there?"

"_They_ are out there in the whole world," said Dr. Larsen as if
meditating. "There must be thirty million who have died in the United
States alone since this began. Another hundred million will die this
winter. The proportion will be the same in the rest of the world. Should
we be thankful for our preservation so far, or should we voluntarily
join them in death?"

"This is different," said Mrs. Maddox. "It's those who come and beg for
our help who will be on our consciences if we do this thing."

"The whole world would come if it knew we had stores of food here--if it
could come. As brutal as it is, the Mayor has taken the only feasible
course open to him."

Ken and Maria remained silent, both feeling the horror of the proposal
and its inevitability.

In the following days Ken was especially glad to be able to bury himself
in the problems at the laboratory. His father, too, seemed to work with
increasing fury as they got further into an investigation of the
material originated by Dr. French. As if seized by some fanatic
compulsion, unable to stop, Professor Maddox spent from 18 to 20 hours
of every day at his desk and laboratory bench.

Ken stayed with him although he could not match his father's great
energy. He often caught snatches of sleep while his father worked on.
Then, one morning, as an especially long series of complex tests came to
an end at 3 a.m., he said to Ken in quiet exultation, "We can
decontaminate now, if nothing else. That's the thing that French had
found. Whether we can ever put it into the atmosphere is another matter,
but at least we can get our metals clean."

Excited, Ken leaned over the notebook while his father described the
results of the reaction. He studied the photographs, taken with the
electron microscope, of a piece of steel before and after treatment with
a compound developed by his father.

Ken said slowly, in a voice full of emotion. "French didn't do this,
Dad."

"Most of it. I finished it up from where he left off."

"No. He wasn't even on the same track. You've gone in an entirely
different direction from the one his research led to. _You_ are the one
who has developed a means of cleaning the dust out of metals."

Professor Maddox looked away. "You give me too much credit, Son."

Ken continued to look at his father, at the thick notebook whose
scrawled symbols told the story. So this is the way it happens, he
thought. You don't set out to be a great scientist at all. If you can
put all other things out of your mind, if you can be absorbed with your
whole mind and soul in a problem that seems important enough, even
though the world is collapsing about your head; then, if you are clever
enough and persevering enough, you may find yourself a great scientist
without ever having tried.

"I don't think I'll ever be what the world calls a great scientist,"
Professor Maddox had said on that day that seemed so long ago. "I'm not
clever enough; I don't think fast enough. I can teach the fundamentals
of chemistry, and maybe some of those I teach will be great someday."

So he had gone along, Ken thought, and by applying his own rules he had
achieved greatness. "I think you give me far too much credit, Son," he
said in a tired voice.




Chapter 13. _Stay Out of Town!_


It took a surprisingly short time to ring Mayfield with a barbed-wire
barricade. A large stock of steel fence posts was on hand in the local
farm supply stores, and these could be driven rapidly even in the frozen
ground. There was plenty of wire. What more was needed, both of wire and
posts, was taken from adjacent farmland fences, and by the end of the
week following the Mayor's pronouncement the task was completed and the
guards were at their posts.

In all that time there had been no occasion to turn anyone away, but
sentiment both for and against the program was heavy and bitter within
the community.

On the Sunday after completion of the fence, Dr. Aylesworth chose to
speak of it in his sermon. He had advertised that he would do so. The
church was not only packed, but large numbers of people stood outside in
the freezing weather listening through the doors. Even greater
excitement was stirred by the whispered information that Mayor Hilliard
was sitting in the center of the congregation.

The minister had titled his sermon, "My Brother's Keeper." He opened by
saying, "Am I my brother's keeper? We know the answer to that question,
my friends. For all the thousands of years that man has been struggling
upward he has been developing the answer to that question. We know it,
even though we may not always abide by it.

"We know who our brothers are--all mankind, whether in Asia or in Europe
or next door to our own home. These are our brothers."

As he elaborated on the theme, Ken thought that this was his mother's
belief which she had expressed when the fence was first mentioned.

"We cannot help those in distant lands," said Dr. Aylesworth. "As much
as our hearts go out to them and are touched with compassion at their
plight, we can do nothing for them. For those on our own doorstep,
however, it is a different matter.

"We are being told now by our civil authorities in this community that
we must drive away at the point of a gun any who come holding out their
hands for succor and shelter. We are told we must drive them away to
certain death.

"I tell you if we do this thing, no matter what the outcome of our
present condition, we shall never be able to look one another in the
eye. We shall never be able to look at our own image without remembering
those whom we turned away when they came to us for help. I call upon you
to petition our civil authorities to remove this brutal and inhumane
restriction in order that we may be able to behave as the civilized men
and women we think we have become. Although faced with disaster, we are
not yet without a voice in our own actions, and those who have made this
unholy ruling can be persuaded to relent if the voices of the people are
loud enough!"

He sat down amid a buzz of whispered comment. Then all eyes turned
suddenly at the sound of a new voice in the hall. Mayor Hilliard was on
his feet and striding purposefully toward the pulpit.

"Reverend, you've had your say, and now I think I've got a right to have
mine. I know this is your bailiwick and you can ask me to leave if you
want to. However, these are my people six days a week to your one. Will
you let me say my piece?"

Dr. Aylesworth rose again, a smile of welcome on his face. "I think we
share the people, or, rather, they share us on all 7 days of the week,"
he said. "I will be happy to have you use this pulpit to deliver any
message you may care to."

"Thanks," said Mayor Hilliard as he mounted the platform and stood
behind the pulpit. "Dr. Aylesworth and I," he began, "have been good
friends for a long time. We usually see eye to eye on most things, but
in this we are dead opposite.

"What he says is true enough. If enough of you want to protest what I've
done you can have a change, but that change will have to include a new
mayor and a new set of councilmen. I was elected, and the Council was
elected to make rules and regulations for the welfare of this community
as long as we were in office.

"We've made this rule about allowing no more refugees in Mayfield and
it's going to stand as long as we're in office. By next summer, if the
harvest is even a few days late, your children are going to be standing
around crying for food you can't give them, and you are going to have to
cut your supplies to one-fifth their normal size. That's the way it adds
up after we count all the people in the valley, and all the cases and
sacks of food in the warehouses.

"It's just plain arithmetic. If we keep adding more people we're all
going to get closer and closer to starvation, and finally wake up one
morning and find we've gone over the edge of it.

"Now, if that's what you want, just go ahead and get some city officers
who will arrange it for you. If anybody in this town, including you, Dr.
Aylesworth, can think of a more workable answer or one that makes
better sense than the one we've got I'd like to know about it."

It snowed heavily that afternoon out of a bitter, leaden sky. It started
in the midst of the morning service, and by the time the congregation
dispersed it was difficult to see a block away.

There was little comment about what they had heard, among the people
leaving the church. They walked with heads bowed against the snow toward
their cold homes and sparsely filled pantries.

The community chapel was near the edge of town. One of the boundary
fences lay only two blocks away. From that direction, as the crowd
dispersed, there came the sudden sound of a shot. It was muffled under
the heavy skies and the dense snow, but there was no mistaking the
sound.

Ken jerked his head sharply. "That must have been one of the guards!" he
said. His father nodded. Together, they raced in the direction of the
sound. Others began running, too, their hearts pounding in anticipation
of some crisis that might settle the unanswered questions.

Ken noticed ahead of them, through the veil of snow, the chunky figure
of Mayor Hilliard running as rapidly as he could. As they came to the
fence they saw the guard standing on one side, his rifle lowered and
ready. On the other side of the barbed-wire enclosure was a stout,
middle-aged man. He wore an overcoat, but there was no hat on his head.
His face was drawn with agony and uncomprehending despair.

He staggered on his feet as he pleaded in a tired voice. "You've got to
let me come in. I've walked all the way in this blizzard. I haven't had
any food for two days."

A group of churchgoers lined the fence now, additional ones coming up
slowly, almost reluctantly, but knowing they had to witness what was
about to take place. Ken exclaimed hoarsely to his father, "That's Sam
Baker! He runs the drugstore and newsstand in Frederick. Everybody in
Mayfield knows Sam Baker!"

Sam Baker turned in bewildered, helpless pleading to the crowd lined on
the other side of the fence. Mayor Hilliard stood back a dozen yards
from the wire.

"You've got to help me," Sam Baker begged. "You can't make me go back
all that way. It's 50 miles. There's nothing there. They're all dead or
lost in the snow. Give me something to eat, please..."

"You've got to move on," the guard said mechanically. "Nobody gets in.
That's the law here."

Along the fence, people pressed close, and one or two men started
hesitantly to climb. Mayor Hilliard's voice rang out, "Anybody who goes
on the other side of that fence _stays_ on the other side!"

The men climbed down. No one said anything. Sam Baker scanned them with
his helpless glance once more. Then he turned slowly. Fifty feet from
the fence he fell in the snow, face down.

Mayor Hilliard spoke slowly and clearly once more. "If anyone so much as
throws a crust of bread over that fence the guard has orders to shoot."

As if frozen, the onlookers remained immobile. The guard held his fixed
stance. Mayor Hilliard stood, feet apart, his hands in his pockets,
staring defiantly. On the other side of the fence, the thick flakes of
snow were rapidly covering the inert form of Sam Baker. In only a few
moments he would be obliterated from their sight. That would be the
signal for them all to turn and go home, Ken thought.

Impulsively, he took a step forward. He looked at his father's face.
"Dad..."

Professor Maddox touched Ken's arm with a restraining hand. His face was
grim and churned by conflicting desires.

The utter stillness was broken then by the crunching sound of boots in
the snow. All eyes turned to the powerful, white-maned figure that
approached. Dr. Aylesworth was hatless and the snow was thick in his
hair. He paused a moment, comprehending the situation. Then he strode
forward to the fence.

He put a foot on the wire, and climbed. His coat caught on the barbs as
he jumped to the other side. He ripped it free, ignoring the tear of the
fabric.

Mayor Hilliard watched as if hypnotized. He jerked himself, finally, out
of his immobility. "Parson!" he cried. "Come back here!"

Dr. Aylesworth ignored the command. He strode forward with unwavering
steps.

"It's no different with you than it is with any other man," Hilliard
shouted. He took the gun from the guard. "You're breaking the law. If
you don't stop I'll shoot!"

The majestic figure of the minister turned. He faced Hilliard without
hesitation. "Shoot," he said. He turned back and moved once more to the
fallen druggist.

There was sweat on Mayor Hilliard's face now. He brushed it with a
gloved hand. His hat fell unnoticed to the ground. He raised the gun no
higher. "Aylesworth," he called, and his voice was pleading now, "we've
got to do what's right!"

The minister's voice came back to him, hollowly, as if from an immense
distance. "Yes, we've got to do what's right." Dr. Aylesworth could be
seen faintly through the veil of snow as he bent down, raising the
druggist's heavy form to his own back in a fireman's carry, then turning
to retrace his steps.

Mayor Hilliard let the gun sag in his hands. At the fence Dr. Aylesworth
paused. "Separate those wires," he ordered those standing near.

They hastily obeyed, pressing their feet on the lower wire, raising the
center one. "Take him!" the minister commanded. He rolled the figure of
Sam Baker gently through the opening and crawled through himself.
"Bring him to my house," he said. Without a glance at the Mayor, he
strode off through the parted crowd and disappeared.

One by one, the onlookers followed, slowly, never glancing at the
immobile figure of the Mayor. Hilliard watched the last of them fade
into the snow curtain, and he stood there alone, still holding the gun
in his hand.

The guard came up at last. "Do you want me to keep on here, Mr.
Hilliard?"

       *       *       *       *       *

"I still say it was the only thing to do," said Mrs. Maddox at the
dinner table. "How could anyone claim to be human and think of leaving
poor Mr. Baker lying there in the snow?"

"It was the only thing Dr. Aylesworth could do," said Professor Maddox.
"Mayor Hilliard did the only thing _he_ could do. Which was right, and
which was wrong--I don't think any of us are really sure any more."

"What do you suppose may come of this?" asked Professor Larsen.

"I don't know," Ken's father admitted. "There's a lot of excitement in
town. A fellow named Meggs is stirring up talk against Hilliard. He's
the storekeeper who tried to hold a profiteering sale, you remember."

"I heard there were some fights in town after church," said Maria.

Ken nodded. "Yes, I heard about them, too."

"It mustn't start here!" exclaimed Mrs. Larsen. "That must be the way it
began in Chicago and Berkeley. We can't let it happen here!"

       *       *       *       *       *

During the next few days a kind of unspoken truce seemed to reign over
the town. It was rumored that both Mayor Hilliard and Dr. Aylesworth
were waiting for the other to come for a talk, but that neither was
willing to go first under the circumstances. Orders had been given that
Sam Baker was to get no special ration. He would get only what others
shared with him out of their own meager allotment.

In the laboratory on College Hill it was confirmed that Professor Maddox
had indeed discovered a completely effective means of cleansing metals
of the destroying dust. Art Matthews and the science club boys were once
again scouring the town for engine parts that could be cleaned and used
in assembling new and, this time, workable engines.

On Friday morning Professor Douglas came in late, after all the others
had been there for a couple of hours. He was panting from his rapid walk
up the hill. "Have you heard the news?" he exclaimed.

The others looked up. "What news?" Professor Maddox asked.

"A couple of farmers and ranchers from the south end of the valley rode
in about 3 o'clock this morning. They were half-dead. They said their
places and several others had been attacked last night. Everything in
the whole southern part of the valley, beyond the point, has been looted
and burned. Six families, still living on their own places were wiped
out."

"Who did it?" Professor Larsen exclaimed.

"Nomads! The ranchers say there's a band of over three thousand camped
down by Turnerville, about 20 miles from here. They've been moving
across the country, killing and looting everything that's in their way.
Now they're headed for Mayfield. They've heard about us having a big
cache of supplies."

All work in the laboratory ceased as the men gathered around Professor
Douglas. They stared into the distance, but their thoughts were alike.

"Three thousand," said Professor Maddox slowly. "We could put twice
that many good men against them. We ought to be able to stand them off,
if they attack. What's Hilliard doing about it?"

"He wants us all down there this morning. There doesn't seem to be much
question about him staying on as Mayor since this came up."

In a group the men left the half-completed experiments and made their
way down the hill to the City Hall. When they arrived they found the
Council chamber already filled. The Mayor and the councilmen were at
their conference table on the platform in front of the room.

At one side, facing both the leaders and the audience, were three
ragged, unshaven strangers in heavy boots and ill-fitting coats. They
had not bothered to remove the fur-lined caps from their heads.

Nomads, Ken thought. It was apparent what was going on.

"We're coming in," the center man was saying. His massive size and
strength showed even under the thick covering of clothes. "I say we're
coming in, and we either come peaceable and you treat us right or we
come in our own way. It doesn't make much difference to us how we do it.
You just call the shots, Mister, and we'll play it your way. We've got
two thousand armed men who know how to shoot fast and straight because
they've done a lot of it the last two months. They're the ones that shot
faster and straighter than the guys they were shooting at."

"You want to live here peaceably with us, is that it?" questioned Mayor
Hilliard.

The man laughed harshly. "Why sure! We're peaceful people, aren't we,
Men?" He took reassurance from his grinning companions. "Just as
peaceful as them around us."

"How about those ranch families you murdered last night?"

The speaker laughed again. "They didn't want peace, did they, Men? All
we asked for was a little something to eat and they started an argument
with us. We just don't like arguments."

Mayor Hilliard glanced beyond the table to the first row of listeners.
His glance fell upon Dr. Aylesworth. "Before giving my consent to your
coming in," he said slowly, "I'd like to hear from one of our more
prominent citizens. This is Dr. Aylesworth, one of our ministers. Would
you like to tell these people how we feel about their proposal,
Reverend?"

The minister rose slowly, his eyes never leaving the three nomads. "It
will be a pleasure to tell them." Then to the three he said, "You can go
right back where you came from. That's our answer to your proposal."

The big man snarled. "So that's the way you want it, is it? Well then,
we'll be back, and when we come you'll wish you'd sung a different
tune!"

Mayor Hilliard smiled a wry smile. "I didn't expect our minister to be
quite so unfeeling of your plight. Since I am in agreement with his
views, however, I must say that you will not be back, because you are
not going anywhere. Sheriff, arrest these men!"

Instantly, the big man dropped his hand to his pocket. Before his gun
was halfway out, a shot rang from the rear doorway of the crowded room.
The stranger dropped to the platform like a crumpled bull.

"You're covered," said Hilliard to the other two. "You came here with a
white flag, but it had our people's blood all over it. We are not
violating any truce because this is not an affair of honor among
gentlemen. It's going to be only an extermination of wild beasts!"




Chapter 14. _Mobilization_


The two nomads stood glaring and snarling before the drawn revolvers
that pointed at them from the doorways of the room. For an instant it
looked as if they were going to draw their own weapons and make a
pitched battle of it right there in the Council chamber. Then their
glances fell on their comrade, writhing in pain on the floor. They
raised their hands in slow surrender.

"If we're not back by sundown, you'll be wiped out!"

"When will the attack begin if you do go back?" asked Hilliard bitterly.
"Two hours before sundown? We thank you for the information about your
timetable, at least. We have 3 hours to prepare a defense of the town."
He nodded to the policeman. "Take them away. Put them in cells and tie
them up until this is over."

When they had been removed he turned back to the group. "I've had
nightmares," he said, "and this has been one of them. I guess if I had
been the Mayor some people think I ought to have been, we would have
been drilling and rehearsing our defenses for weeks. I had planned to do
so soon. I thought we'd have more time; that's my only excuse.

"The Sheriff and I have done a little preliminary planning and thinking.
We've made an estimate of weapons available. From what Jack Nelson and
Dan Sims report on hunting licenses issued locally a year ago, there
must be about two thousand deer rifles in town. They also guess about
four or five hundred 22's. We're lucky to live in hunting country.

"Dan and Jack have about two hundred guns of all kinds and sizes in
their rental and selling stock, and they've got nearly all the
ammunition in the valley. They had stocked up for the hunting season,
which we never had this year, so their supply sounds as if it would be
pretty good. You've got to remember the difference in requirements for
bagging a deer and carrying on a war. We have very little ammunition
when you consider it from that angle.

"The police, of course, have a few guns and some rounds. I'm placing
Sheriff Johnson in full charge of defense. The police officers will act
as his lieutenants." The Mayor stepped to a wall chart that showed the
detailed topography of Mayfield and its environs. "This is your battle
map right here, Sheriff. Come up and start marking off your sectors of
the defense perimeter and name your officers to take charge of each. I
hope somebody is going to say it's a good thing we've got the
barbed-wire defense line before this meeting is over!

"I want a rider to leave at once to bring back the wood detail. All
their horses will be turned over to the police officers for use in their
commands. I want fifty runners to go through town and notify one man in
each block to mobilize his neighbors, with all weapons available, and
lead them to the sectors which the Sheriff will designate. Each man will
bring all the ammunition he owns. Additional stores will be distributed
by wagon to the sectors. Above everything else, each man must be warned
to make each shot count."

The room was silent, and there was no protest or disagreement. Mayor
Hilliard, the man who had made fancy speeches, seemed to have vanished.
Hilliard, the dynamic, down-to-earth leader had taken his place. For a
moment no one in the room was more surprised than Hilliard himself.

"There's one thing I want to make absolutely clear," he said after a
pause. "You people who are working at the laboratory on College Hill are
to keep away from the front-lines and away from all possible danger.
That's an order, you understand?"

"No," said Professor Maddox abruptly. "It's our duty as much as anyone
else's to share in the defenses."

"It's your duty to keep your skins whole and get back into the
laboratories as quickly as you can and get things running again! We
haven't any special desire to save your necks in preference to our own,
but in the long run you're the only hope any of us has got. Remember
that, and stay out of trouble!"

The Sheriff made his appointments in rapid-fire sequence, naming many
who were not present, ordering messengers sent to them. Ken volunteered
to ride after the wood detail.

"I guess it's safe enough to let you do that," the Mayor said. "Make it
fast, but don't break your neck."

"I'll take it easy," Ken promised.

Outside, he selected the best of the three police horses and headed up
out of town, over the brittle snow with its glare ever-reminding of the
comet. When he was on higher ground, he glanced back over the length of
the valley. The nomads were not in sight. Not in force, anyway. He
thought he glimpsed a small movement a mile or two away from the
barrier, at the south end of the valley before it turned out of sight at
the point, but he wasn't sure. Once he thought he heard a rifle shot,
but he wasn't sure of that, either.

As he appeared at the edge of the forest clearing, Mark Wilson, foreman
of the detail, frowned irritably and paused in his task of snaking a log
out to the road.

"You'll ruin that horse, besides breaking your neck, riding like that in
this snow. You're not on detail, anyway."

"Get all your men and horses up here right away," Ken said. "Mayor's
orders to get back to town at once." He told briefly the story of what
had happened.

Mark Wilson did not hesitate. He raised a whistle to his lips and
signaled for the men to cease work and assemble. One by one they began
to appear from among the trees. The horses were led along, their
dragging harnesses clanking in the frozen air. "We could cut for 2 more
hours," they protested. "No use wasting this daylight and having to cut
by lantern."

"Never mind," said Wilson. "There's something else to do. Wait for the
rest."

When all had assembled he jerked his head toward Ken. "Go ahead," he
said. "You tell them."

Ken repeated in detail everything that had happened. He outlined the
Mayor's plan of defense and passed on the order for them to take all
mounts to City Hall, to go by their own homes on the way and pick up
such weapons as they owned. "You'll get your further orders there," he
finished.

The group was silent, as if they could not believe it was actually
happening. Mark Wilson broke the spell that seemed to be over them.
"Come on!" he cried. "Get the lead out of your shoes and let's get down
there! Sunset's the deadline!"

There was a rush of motion then. They hitched up the necessary teams and
climbed aboard the half-filled sleds. There was no excitement or
swearing against fate and their enemies. Rather, a solemn stillness
seemed to fill each man as the sleds moved off down the hard, frozen
roadway.

Almost, but not quite the same pervading stillness was present in the
town when Ken returned. There was a stirring of frantic activity like
that of a disturbed anthill, but it was just as silent. The runners
moved from block to block. In their wake the alarmed block leaders
raced, weapons in hand, from house to house, arousing their neighbors.
Many, who had already completed the block mobilization, were moving in
ragged formations to the sector ordered by the block runner according to
Sheriff Johnson's plan.

Ken did not know what was planned for the many weaponless men who were
being assembled. They would be useless at the frontline. There was need
for some at the rear. He supposed Johnson would take care of that later
when every weapon was manned at the defense barrier.

He stopped at his own house. His mother greeted him anxiously. He could
see she had been crying, but she had dried her tears now and was
reconciled to the inevitable struggle that was at hand.

"Your father came in a few minutes ago, and left again," she said. "He's
been placed in charge of distribution of medical supplies under Dr.
Adams. He wants you and the other boys of the club to help in arranging
locations for medical care. Meet him at Dr. Adams' office."

"Okay, Mom. How about packing a load of sandwiches? I may not be back
for a long time. I don't know what arrangements they are making for
feeding the people on duty."

"Of course. I'll make them right away." She hurried to the kitchen.

Maria said, "There must be something I can do. They'll need nurses and
aides. I want to go with you."

"I don't know what they've planned in that department, either. They
ought to have plenty of room for women in the food and nursing details."

His mother came with the sandwiches and placed them in his hands. "Be
careful, Ken." Her voice shook. "Do be careful."

"Sure, Mom."

Maria got her coat. Mrs. Larsen let her go without protest, but the two
women watched anxiously as the young people rode toward town on the
police horse.

At the doctor's office, Ken found his father surrounded by an orderly
whirl of activity. "Ken! I was hoping you'd get back soon. You can help
with arrangements for hospital care, in assigned homes. The rest of your
friends are out on their streets. Take this set of instructions Dr.
Adams has prepared and see that arrangements are made in exact
accordance with them at each house on the list."

"I can help, too," said Maria.

"Yes. Dr. Adams has prepared a list of women and girls he wants to
assign as nurses and aides. You can help contact them. Get the ones on
this list to meet here as quickly as possible and they'll be assigned to
the houses which the boys are lining up."

The comet was setting earlier now, so that its unnatural light
disappeared almost as soon as the sun set below the horizon. In the
short period of twilight, tension grew in the city. Everything possible
had been done to mount defenses. An attack had been promised if the
nomad emissaries did not return. Now the time had come.

Darkness fell with no sign of activity in any direction. It seemed
unreasonable that any kind of night attack would be launched, but
Hilliard and Johnson warned their men not to relax their vigilance.

The pace of preparatory activity continued. Blankets, clothing and food
were brought to the men who waited along the defense perimeter. Medical
arrangements were perfected as much as possible.

Ken and his father made their quarters in another room of the building
where Dr. Adams' office was. There was no heat, of course, but they had
brought sleeping bags which were unrolled on the floor. After the
sandwiches were gone their rations were canned soup, to be eaten
directly from the can without being heated.

Maria was quartered elsewhere in the building with some of the women who
were directing the nurses' activities.

Through the windows could be seen the campfires which Johnson had
permitted to be built at the guard posts. Each had a wall of snow ready
to be pushed upon it in case of any sign of attack.

"We'd better get some sleep," Professor Maddox said finally to Ken.
"They'll take care of anything that's going to happen out there tonight.
We may have a rough day tomorrow."

Ken agreed, although he did not feel like sleeping. After hours, it
seemed, of thrashing restlessly he dozed off. He thought it was dawn
when he opened his eyes again to the faint, red glow reflected on the
walls of the room. He was unaware for a moment of where he was. Then he
saw the glow was flickering.

He scrambled to his feet and ran to the window. In the distance the glow
of burning houses lit the landscape. The rapid crack of rifle fire came
faintly to his ears.

Professor Maddox was beside him. "How could they do it?" Ken exclaimed.
"How could they get through our lines and set fire to the houses?"

On the southern sector of the defense line Sheriff Johnson's men
crouched behind their improvised defenses. The glow of the fire blinded
them as they attempted to pierce the darkness from which the attack was
coming.

From a half-dozen different points fireballs were being lobbed out of
the darkness. Ineffective on the snow-laden roofs, many others crashed
through the windows and rolled on the floors inside. Such targets became
flaming infernos within minutes.

They were all unoccupied because the inhabitants had been moved closer
to the center of town for protection.

A fusillade of shots poured out of the darkness upon the well-lighted
defenders. They answered the fire, shooting at the pinpoints of light
that betrayed the enemy's position, and at the spots in the darkness
from which the flaming fireballs came. It was obvious that the attackers
were continuously moving. It was difficult to know where the launching
crews of the fireball catapults were actually located in that
overwhelming darkness.

Sheriff Johnson was on the scene almost at once. He had once been an
infantry lieutenant with combat experience. His presence boosted the
morale of the defenders immediately.

"Hold your fire," he ordered the men. "Keep under cover and wait until
you can see something worth shooting at. Try to keep the fire from
spreading, and watch for a rush attack. Don't waste ammunition! You'll
find yourselves without any if you keep that up."

Reluctantly, they ceased firing and fell back to the protection of their
barricades. Patrolman John Sykes, who was lieutenant of the sector, had
been in the National Guard, but he had never seen anything like this.
"Do you think they'll rush us?" he asked. "Tonight, I mean, in the
dark."

"Who knows? They may be crazy enough to try anything. Keep your eyes
open."

The flames quickly burned out the interiors of the houses that had been
hit. As the roofs crashed in, their burden of snow assisted in putting
out the fires, and there was no spreading to nearby houses.

In his room, Ken dressed impatiently. It was useless to try to sleep any
more. "I wish they'd let us go out there," he said. "We've got as much
right as Johnson or any of the rest."

His father remained a motionless silhouette against the distant
firelight. "As much right, perhaps," he said, "but more and different
responsibilities. Hilliard is right. If we were knocked down out there
who would take over the work in the laboratory? Johnson? Adams?

"In Berkeley there are thousands fighting each other, but with French
and his group gone, no one is fighting the comet. I don't think it is
selfish to say we are of infinitely more value in the laboratory than we
could ever be out there with guns in our hands."

He turned and smiled in the half-darkness. "That's in spite of the fact
that you have the merit badge for marksmanship and won the hunting club
trophy last year."

After an hour the attack ceased, apparently because the defenders
refused to waste their fire on the impossible targets. Sheriff Johnson
sent word around for his men to resume rotation of watch and get all the
sleep possible before the day that was ahead of them.

The fires burned themselves out shortly before dawn. Their light was
followed soon by the glow of the comet rising in the southeast. Ken
watched it and thought of Granny Wicks. It wouldn't be hard, he thought,
to understand how a belief in omens could arise. It wouldn't be hard at
all.

The sky had cleared so that the light of the comet bathed the entire
countryside in its full, bitter glory. At sunrise the faint trickles of
smoke rose from hundreds of wood fires, started with the difficult green
fuel, and stringent breakfasts were prepared. A thought went through
Ken's mind and he wondered if anybody was taking note of the supply of
matches in town. When they ran low, coals of one fire would have to be
kept to light another.

It was 9 o'clock, on a day when ordinarily school bells would have been
sounding throughout the valley. The first war shouts of the attacking
nomads were heard on the plain to the south. About thirty men on
horseback raced single file along the highway that bore the hard, frozen
tracks of horses and sleds that had moved to and from the farms down
there.

Patrolman Sykes watched them through his glasses. His command rang out
to his company. "Hold fire." He knew the nomads would not hope to break
through the barbed wire on such a rush. It looked as if they planned an
Indian-style attack as the line began breaking in a slow curve something
less than 100 yards away.

"Fire!" Sykes commanded. Volleys of shots rang out on both sides almost
simultaneously. The lead rider of the nomads went down, his horse
galloping in riderless panic at the head of the line. The hard-riding
column paralleled the barrier for 200 yards, drawing the fire of
adjacent guard posts before they broke and turned south again. It was,
evidently, a test of the strength of the defenses.

"Every shot counts!" Sykes cried out to his men. As the attackers rode
out of effective range he sighted four riderless horses. Beside him, in
the barricade, one of his own men was hit and bleeding badly. A
tourniquet was prepared until two men of the medical detail arrived with
an improvised stretcher.

Sykes sat down and rested his head on his arms for a moment. The air was
well below freezing, but his face was bathed with sweat. How long? he
asked himself silently. How long can it go on? First the comet, then
this. He roused at a sudden cry beside him.

"They're coming back," a man shouted. Sykes stood up and raised his
fieldglasses to his eyes. From around the point a fresh group of riders
was pouring toward the town. At least three times as many as before.

In a flash, he understood their intent. "They're going to come through!"
he cried. "They're going to come right through the barrier, no matter
what it costs them!"




Chapter 15. _Battle_


The hard-riding nomad cavalry bore down on the defense line. They did
not break into a circling column as before, I but began forming an
advancing line. When they were 75 yards away, Sykes ordered his men to
begin firing.

The nomads were already shooting, and what their emissary had said was
true: these men were expert shots, even from horseback. Sykes heard the
bullets careening off the sloping face of the barricade. Two of his men
were down already.

He leveled his police pistol and fired steadily into the oncoming ranks.
He thought they were going to try to jump the fence this time, and he
braced for the shock. To his dismay, he now saw that a perfectly clear
space for their landing had been left between his own position and the
adjacent barricade.

Suddenly the line of attackers swerved to the left just a few feet from
the wire. The defending fire was furious, and for a moment Sykes thought
they were going to turn the line back. Then several of the nomads raised
their arms and hurled dark, small objects toward the barrier. Sykes
recognized them even while they were in the air. Grenades.

He shouted to his men and they flattened behind the barricade. Six
explosions thundered almost simultaneously. Mud and rocks sprayed into
the air and fell back in a furious rain upon the defenders.

Cautiously, Sykes lifted himself from the ground and got a glimpse of
the scene once more. A hundred feet of barbed-wire fence had disappeared
in a tangle of shattered posts and hanging coils. Through the opening,
the nomads poured over the barricades in the midst of Sykes' men.
Smashing hoofs landed almost upon him but for his frantic rolling and
twisting out of their path. Gunfire was a continuous blasting wave.
Sykes thought he heard above it the sound of Johnson's voice roaring
commands to the retreating men.

It sounded like he was saying, "Close up! Close up!" but Sykes never
knew for sure. An enormous explosion seemed to come from nowhere and
thunder directly in front of him. The day darkened suddenly and he felt
himself losing all control of his own being. He wondered if a cloud had
crossed the sun, but almost at the same time he ceased to be concerned
about the question at all.

       *       *       *       *       *

The first of the wounded came in slowly, borne by stretcher bearers on
foot who had literally dragged their charges through the lines of
invading horsemen. Ken directed their assignment to the hospital-houses.
He had always believed he could take a scene like this in his stride,
but now he felt he must keep moving constantly to keep from becoming
violently sick.

Overhead, a pall of smoke surged again, blotting out, partly, the
comet's light. More houses had been fired by the invaders. The sound of
crackling flames mingled with the thunder of hoofs and the roll of rifle
fire.

Surely it wouldn't be possible, Ken thought, for such a charge to
succeed unless it were backed by strong infantry. He moved into one of
the houses and directed the placement of the severely wounded man
brought up now by the bearers. As they left, he looked down at the
stained and bloody face. A nurse was already at work cutting away the
matted clothing from the wound.

Ken exclaimed loudly before he realized what he was saying. "Mr. Harris!
Mr. Harris--you shouldn't have been out there!"

The man opened his eyes slowly against the terrible pain. He smiled in
recognition. It was Mr. Harris, the principal of Mayfield High School;
the one Ken had attended. He was an old man--at least fifty--much too
old to have been at the barricade with a rifle.

"You shouldn't have been out there," Ken repeated. Mr. Harris seemed to
have difficulty in seeing him.

"Ken," he said slowly. "It's Ken Maddox, isn't it? Everybody has to do
something. It seemed like this was the best thing I could do. No school
to teach. No school for a long time."

His voice wavered as he began to ramble. "I guess that makes all the
students happy. No school all winter long. I always dreamed of Mayfield
being a school where they would be glad to come, whose opening in the
fall would be welcomed and closing in the spring would be regretted. I
never got that far, I guess.

"I didn't do a really bad job, did I, Ken? Mayfield is a pretty good
school, isn't it?"

"Mayfield is a swell school, Mr. Harris," said Ken. "It'll be the best
day ever when Mayfield opens up again."

"Yes ... when school opens again," Mr. Harris said, and then he was
still.

The nurse felt his pulse and regretfully drew the sheet up to cover his
face. "I'm sorry," she said to Ken.

Blindly, he turned and went out to the porch. Mr. Harris, he thought,
the little bald-headed man they'd laughed at so often with schoolboy
cruelty. He had wanted to make Mayfield a good school, so students would
be glad to attend.

He'd done that--almost. Mayfield _was_ a good school.

Ken looked at the rolling clouds of black smoke in the sky. The gunfire
seemed less steady now. Suddenly he was running furiously and with all
his strength. He turned down Main Street and headed south. He ran until
he caught sight of the first nomad he had seen since the events in the
Mayor's Council chamber.

The enemy had stopped his horse, rearing high, while he hurled some kind
of incendiary through the window of a house. It exploded inside and
billows of flame and smoke poured out. A heart-tight pain gripped Ken.
He looked wildly about and saw a fragment of brick lying beside a
demolished house nearby.

He snatched up the missile and wound up as if pitching one straight over
the corner of the plate. The horseman saw the motion of his arm and
tried to whirl, but he was too late. The brickbat caught him at the side
of the head and he dropped to the snow without a sound. Ken ran forward
and caught up the nomad's rifle and ammunition belt. The horse had fled
in panic.

Without a backward glance Ken raced on down the street toward the
dwindling sound of battle. The invaders were retreating, streaming from
all directions toward the break in the barrier, firing steadily as they
came. The defenders were trying to block the escape.

Ken dropped behind a barricade next to an older man he didn't know. He
searched for an opening and waited for a rider to cross his sights; then
he squeezed the trigger and the man fell. When he looked up again the
last of the invaders were gone. Only half of those who had come up to
the attack were leaving it.

The men around Ken slowly relaxed their terrible tension. From some
lying prone there were cries of pain. Those who could stand did so and
revealed their drawn faces to one another.

Teams of the medical group began moving again. A horse-drawn wagon was
brought up that had been fitted with boards across the sides so that two
layers of wounded men could be carried at once.

Ken heard sudden hoofbeats behind and turned. Sheriff Johnson rode up
and surveyed the scene. His eye caught Ken's figure standing in the
midst of it, rifle in hand, the captured ammunition belt draped over his
shoulder.

"You!" White anger was on Johnson's face. "You were ordered to stay out
of the frontline!" he thundered. "Any other man would be court-martialed
for such disobedience. Get back where you belong and don't show your
face in this area again. I'll jail you for the rest of the fighting if
you disobey again!"

Half-ashamed, but half only, for his impulsive action, Ken turned and
moved down the street.

"Leave that gun here!" the Sheriff commanded harshly.

Ken gave it to the nearest soldier. He took off the ammunition belt and
handed it over too, then resumed his course. He should not have done it,
he told himself, but he felt better for it. He felt he had paid a little
of his debt to Mr. Harris.

When he reached the hospital center he told his father.

"It wasn't a good thing," said Professor Maddox gently, "but maybe it
was something that had to be done."

Throughout the day they continued to bring in the wounded and the dead.
There seemed to be an incredible number, but the invaders had suffered
heavily, too. Half their force had been lost. A dozen fine horses had
been captured, which were a considerable prize.

There was speculation as to why the nomads chose to attack in this
manner. They had done great damage, it was true, yet the attack had not
had a chance of being decisive in spite of their insane persistence.

Hilliard and Johnson held a staff meeting that afternoon while a sharp
watch was kept for further attack. They considered that they had done
very well so far. The chief worries were the grenades and incendiaries,
which the nomads seemed to have in large quantity.

Toward evening, Johnson asked for two volunteers to go out as scouts to
try to reach the top of Lincoln's Peak, west of town, to spot the camp
of the nomads and scout their activities. A pair of volunteers was
chosen from the many who offered. On two of the best of the nomads'
horses, they made their way across the frozen plain and up the small
ravine leading to the ridge. Observers watched until they were out of
sight in the ravine.

It was agreed the two would return by 6 o'clock. At 5 there was the
faint sound of gunfire from somewhere in the hills. The scouts did not
return at the appointed time. They did not return at all.

Night came, and word spread among the townspeople of the disappearance
of the two scouts. Anxiety increased as it became apparent they were
under close surveillance by the enemy. Perhaps it was the intention of
the nomads to wear them down with a winter-long siege of attack after
attack, until they no longer had the ability or strength to fight.

Hilliard and Johnson doubted this. The nomads were far less equipped for
such a siege than Mayfield was.

Maria continued to return to the radio shack in the evening to maintain
the schedule with the network. She reported the plight of Mayfield to
the other stations. From across the country came the fervent best wishes
of those who heard her. Wishes were all they could offer.

The scientists were particularly anguished because they considered the
Maddox-Larsen group among the most likely to crack the barrier that kept
them from conquest of the comet dust. "Our prayers are with you," the
Pasadena group said.

They sent a new report and Maria typed it and showed it to Professor
Maddox that evening. He scanned it and put the pages in his coat pocket
as he glanced out the window toward College Hill.

"It seems like ages," he said. "I wonder if we'll ever get back up
there."

The next attack came well before dawn. Sheriff Johnson was among the
first to be aware of it. The thunder of seemingly countless horses'
hoofs was heard faintly out of the south and he put his glasses to his
eyes. The nomads were a black patch against the snow.

"How many horses have they got?" he exclaimed to the patrolman beside
him. This was Ernest Parkin, one of his best officers.

"I'd say there must be at least a hundred of them," said Parkin in awe.
"They must have been gathering horses for weeks."

"Feed," said Johnson, "for themselves and the animals--they may be
rabble and savages, but they've had genius of leadership."

Behind shelter, they waited for the blow. All orders had already been
given. Only the general alarm was sounded now. It had been expected that
the previous pattern of attack would be repeated. The defenders had been
moved back from the barbed wire. They fired slowly and methodically with
a splendidly efficient barrage as the nomads swung out of the night to
blast with their grenades at the reconstructed fence.

The way opened and they plunged in, the defenders closing behind and
retreating to the other side of their barricades.

Ken paced restlessly as he heard the shooting. "I'm going up on the
roof," he told his father. "There can't be any objection to that."

"I guess not. I'll call you when we need you."

Ken climbed the stairs of the 6-story building, which was the highest in
Mayfield. He came out on the frozen surface of the roof and looked into
the distance. The mounted invaders were circling like Indians about
several blocks of houses, firing steadily at the defenders and hurling
incendiaries at the houses.

Then, as Ken turned his eyes to the northern end of the valley, he felt
as if the whole world had suddenly fallen to pieces in the dim, morning
light.

On foot, a vast host of the invaders moved toward the northern defenses
of the town. Instantly, he understood their strategy. While their small
parties of mounted attackers had pressed the southern defenses, giving
the impression they intended to make their major approach there, the
bulk of their forces had marched entirely around Lincoln's Peak and come
upon the northern boundary at night. That was why the peak had been so
heavily guarded against the scouts.

It had been a march of over 40 miles to by-pass the valley. Now,
however, the nomads were in a position to achieve their goal. The bulk
of the town's defense was concentrated in the south. Little stood in the
way of the horde advancing from the north.

His heart sickened as he saw them rip through the barbed-wire enclosure.
The poorly manned defense posts seemed almost non-existent. Only a
scattering of shots was thrown at the invaders.

From somewhere, a warning siren sounded, the agreed-upon signal to
indicate invasion in that sector. It was far too late for that, Ken
thought. The horde was already in the streets, fanning out, dispersing
in the deserted streets.

Ken started for the doorway leading from the roof. His responsibility to
College Hill was gone now. Every man in the valley was fighting for his
own life. If that battle were lost, College Hill would be only an empty
symbol, where ghosts were housed, as in Berkeley, as in Chicago, as in
a thousand centers of learning the world around.

With his hand on the latch of the door he paused at a new sound that
broke upon the air. An incredible barrage of firing was occurring along
northern Main Street near 12th Avenue. He put the fieldglasses to his
eyes again and watched the scattering nomads seeking cover. Dozens of
them lay where they fell headlong in the streets.

Ken strained his eyes to see where the defense had come from. It was
centered in the houses and buildings that lined the streets, and on
their rooftops. He could see the ant-sized outlines of figures on those
roofs. For a moment he failed to understand. Then he felt a choking
sensation in his throat.

In a desperate gamble, Johnson and Hilliard had anticipated this move
and prepared for it as best they could. They had allowed the main body
of the attackers to enter the town itself and had deployed the majority
of their guns to ring them about, while offering only token defense on
the south.

This was it. The battle would be fought here and now, in the streets of
Mayfield, and before the day was over it would be known whether the city
would continue its struggle to live or whether it would become another
Berkeley.




Chapter 16. _Black Victory_


The spearhead of the nomad infantry attack broke through between two
lightly manned guard posts whose garrisons fled in retreat with a few
ineffective shots. The column came through in a widening wedge. As it
met more defenders it fell back, but it appeared to the nomads that the
whole defense line had crumbled or had been diverted to the south, as
anticipated.

They poured along Main Street in the faint dawnlight until they reached
12th Avenue. There, they split and fanned along 12th, east and west. It
was their strategy, obviously, to occupy and seal off this large
northern sector of the town, which amounted to one-quarter of its total
area and cut across a large portion of the business section. They would
solidify their position here, destroy all opposition, then move to still
another sector until they were in command of the entire town.

It was a strategy that would work, unless everything Mayfield possessed
were thrown against it, Ken thought. He saw now why 12th Avenue had been
chosen as the line of attack: the defenders were intrenched there and
were offering forceful opposition.

He looked for a moment to the south again. The defenses there were
light, yet the charge of the mounted nomads had to be contained or they
would drive all the way to the center of town, burning and killing as
they went. If they succeeded in joining with the infantry they would
have split Mayfield's defenses in two.

Johnson had mounted his best men, using the captured nomad horses as
well as the town's own. Desperately, this small force was trying to
contain and exterminate the fierce-riding enemy. Picked sharpshooters
had been carefully stationed with the best rifles available. Although
the gunfire was not heavy, Ken could see Johnson's men were taking a
heavy toll of the invader.

In the north, the lines of fixed battle had now been established. The
nomads had drawn back to positions of cover in the empty houses facing
12th. Their flanks were more mobile, fighting for advantage along
streets parallel to Main but some blocks away on either side, and
extending all the way back to the point of breakthrough. While he
surveyed the scene from the roof, Ken watched the stealthy movement of
defenders moving behind the main line to try to surround the enemy. That
was the strategy of the defense, and the gamble on which their entire
fate hung.

If they succeeded they would have the breach closed, leaving no retreat
for the surrounded invader.

The comet slowly appeared, illuminating the scene of battle as if it lay
upon some other planet. The day was clear so far, but a band of stratus
hung low over the western hills. It would probably be snowing by
nightfall, Ken thought.

Through the glasses he recognized the leader of a small patrol that was
moving east on 18th Avenue. It was Tom Wiley, the barber. His men were
mostly students from the college. They were trying to gain a house
farther up the block to provide a covering point from which a general
advance of the line on both sides of them could hinge. Tom could not
see that an opposing patrol had him under observation.

He led his men into the open to cross the street. Ken wanted to shout
for him to go back, but it was impossible to be heard at such distance.
The enemy patrol moved out slightly. They centered Tom and his men in a
murderous burst of rifle fire. The barber fell. Two of the others were
hit, but they managed to reach cover with the rest of their companions.

The body of Tom Wiley lay motionless where it fell in the snow-covered
street. Ken could see the sign, just a block away, that read, "Wiley's
Barber and Beauty Shop." From where Ken stood, the sign, which jutted
out over the sidewalk, seemed to project just above the body of the
fallen barber.

Ken hesitated in his resolve to go down there in the midst of the
fighting. He thought of Johnson's words and Hilliard's orders. Would the
defense strategy succeed? The nomads were trained and toughened by their
weeks of fight for survival, but Mayfield's men were only weakened by
their strained effort to keep the town alive.

On the eastern side of the encirclement a burst of smoke with a core of
orange flame at its center spurted upward from a house. This was
followed by a second and a third and a fourth. Defending fighters ran
from the rear of the burning houses to the row beyond. Behind the screen
of billowing smoke the nomads crept forward to repeat their tactics and
fire the houses where the defenders now had cover. It was obvious they
recognized the danger of encirclement by forces stronger than any they
had anticipated. They were making a desperate effort to straighten their
lines parallel to the barbed wire, with their flanks and rear clear of
threat.

Ken watched the success of their second incendiary thrust. They could go
on indefinitely unless the defenders succeeded in flanking them. That
was being attempted now. The defenders moved under the cover of the
smokescreen to fire on the advancing nomads. The latter recognized their
danger and held to solid cover of houses adjacent to those they had
fired.

North of this bulge, however, another column was forming, and Ken saw in
sudden horror that it was headed directly toward the warehouse! A house
only a half-block from the warehouse burst into flame.

There was a flurry of activity from the defenders as they, too,
recognized the fresh danger and brought up reinforcements before the
threatened warehouse.

This added resistance seemed to inflame the determination of the nomads.
They answered the increased fire sharply. Another incendiary ignited a
wooden building a step nearer the warehouse. The defenders tried to
flank the threatening column but the latter ran between a row of burning
houses along an alleyway, firing additional incendiaries as they went.

Then sudden flame burst against the wooden walls of the old skating rink
and licked with red fury along its painted surface. In moments the
warehouse was bathed on all sides in seething flame, and the nomad
column spread beyond it, unaware of the mortal damage they had done.

       *       *       *       *       *

Ken turned away. He walked slowly and decisively down the stairs. He
told his father what had just happened. "I'm going out there, Dad," he
said. "They're going to wipe us out, or destroy every chance we'll have
to survive even if we drive them off. Half of our food supply is gone
now. What chance have we got even if we kill every nomad in the valley?"

Ken's father turned to a closet and drew out a .30-06. From a hook he
took down a hunter's jacket. Its pockets were loaded with shells, and
he had an extra box he gave to Ken.

"Johnson left this here," he said. "He intended it for our use if the
nomads reached this far. I think maybe it had better be used before the
medical center needs defending."

Ken's eyes lighted with gratefulness. "Thanks, Dad," he said. "I'm glad
you're willing."

"I don't know if I'm willing or not. However, I think I agree with you
that there's nothing else to be done."

Ken ran from the building, clutching the solid, reassuring weight of the
rifle in his hand. His coat pockets and the hunting jacket were weighted
heavily with the supply of ammunition. There was a feeling of security
in the weapon and the shells, but he knew it was a short-lived,
deceptive security.

He went to Eighth Street and turned north, which would bring him close
to the burned warehouse. He could see the immense, rolling column of
black smoke and hear the bursting crackle of its flames. The whole town
could go, he thought, if the fire became hot enough. It would spread
from building to building regardless of the snow cover. He glanced at
the sky and hoped the snow might soon resume.

From the rooftop, it had seemed to Ken that the small units of the
defenders were almost leaderless, and there was lack of co-ordination
between them. He came up in their rear ranks and confirmed this
suspicion. They seemed to be depending as best they could on unanimous
and intuitive agreement about a course of action. What had happened to
their sergeants and lieutenants, Ken did not know. Perhaps in their
haste of organization there never had been any.

There was top-level command, of course, as appointed by Sheriff Johnson
for the entire sector, but it did not extend to the lower levels in any
degree Ken could see.

The men paid no attention as Ken joined them. He knew a few of the dozen
nearby, but they seemed to regard him as a total stranger. The shock of
battle was in their eyes, and they seemed wholly unaware of anything in
the world except the desperate necessity to find cover and to destroy
the invader.

Ken followed them into the shelter of a house flanking the
still-advancing incendiaries. He crouched at a window with an older man
whom he did not know and leveled his rifle through an opening. A pair of
figures appeared momentarily at the edge of the smoking cloud. The older
man jerked his gun and fired frantically and ineffectively.

"Slow!" Ken cried. "Aim before you shoot!"

The man glanced at him in a kind of daze. Ken sighted patiently and
carefully. The smoke cloud parted once again and he squeezed the
trigger. One of the figures dropped and the smoke cloud closed down
again.

Ken's calmness seemed to penetrate his companion who leaned back for a
moment to wipe a shaking hand across his sweat-stained face.

"I've never done anything like this before," he murmured helplessly.

"None of us have," said Ken; "but we've got to do it now. Watch it!
We're drawing their fire!"

Bullets shattered the window casing above and beside them. Across the
room a man crumpled. Ken risked a glance through the window. "We've got
to get out!" he exclaimed. "They're going to rush the house!"

It might have been possible to hold if he knew what cover and
reinforcements they had in the adjacent houses, but as far as he could
tell the small, 12-man patrol might be entirely alone in the area.

Suddenly, it all seemed utterly hopeless without communication, without
leadership--how could they hope to withstand?

"Let's go!" he cried. The others seemed willing to follow him. As they
went through the back he saw that the next house had indeed been
occupied, but they, too, were retreating, not knowing what strength was
near.

A new line of defenders was moving up from halfway down the block. Ken
held back to shout to the other patrol and to those coming, "Let's stand
in the next street!"

There were shouts of assent from down the line and they moved to the
shelter of the empty houses.

They were close to the edge of town, near the barbed-wire barricade, and
the nomads would obviously make their biggest effort here to wipe out
the forces that threatened to close them off. His own group, Ken saw,
would also have to make their stand here or risk being pocketed by the
uncoiling line of nomads.

"Don't let them get close enough to fire the buildings!" he shouted down
the line. The word was passed along with agreement. They broke into
small patrols and occupied the houses, Ken joining one that took over
the top floor of a 2-story house. This gave them the advantage of good
observation, but the added danger of difficult escape in case the house
was set on fire. Its walls were brick, however, and offered a good
chance of being held.

Within minutes, the nomads had occupied the houses just abandoned. Ken
fired rapidly and carefully as he saw them exposed momentarily in their
move to new positions. His marksmanship had a telling effect on the
enemy, and encouraged his companions. As soon as the nomads had obtained
cover however, it was a stalemate.

It was mid-morning already, and Ken wondered how it had grown so late.
For an hour or two they exchanged shots with the enemy. Twice, attempts
were made to hurl firebombs. Both were driven back.

Beyond this, however, the nomads seemed in no mood to make further
attack. They were waiting for darkness, Ken thought, and then they
would advance with their firebombs and grenades and have free choice of
battle setting. If that happened, Mayfield might be a huge inferno by
midnight. They had to seize the initiative from the invaders.

He called his companions and told them how it looked. They agreed. "What
can we do?" a tired, middle-aged man asked.

"We've got to take the initiative before they come at us again." Ken
glanced at the sky. "Within an hour it may be snowing hard. That will
make it more difficult to hit a target. When daylight is almost gone
we'll attack them instead of waiting for them to come after us. It can
be done if we hit hard and fast enough. We'll lose some men, but not as
many as if we wait and let them pick us off with their grenades and
incendiaries as they feel like it."

The men considered it dubiously. "We've got a better chance to hit them
as they break from cover," someone suggested.

"Not after dark, and that's what they're waiting for. They'll burn our
houses and drive us back all night long if we give them the chance. We
must not give it to them!"

Reluctant nods of agreement came from his group. "The way you put it, I
guess it's the only chance we've got," the former objector agreed.

"I'll talk with the other groups," Ken said.

He moved down the stairs and out the back door of the house. The space
between the two houses was entirely open. He flung himself down and
crawled. Twice, he heard the whine of bullets above his head.

After heated argument, the group in the next house agreed to the plan to
rush the invaders. He moved on down the block, regretting his own lack
of authority that made it necessary for him to have to plead for
co-operation. He wondered what was happening in the rest of the town.
There had been gunfire all day, but it seemed incredible there had been
no communication from any other sector or any evidence of command. No
one he talked to had any idea what had happened to their command. There
had been some in the beginning, but it had simply seemed to vanish.
Ken's pleading for co-operation in an attack was the nearest thing to
leadership they had seen for hours.

The snow was swirling hard and the sun was almost beyond the hills, what
little of it was visible in the clouds. It was getting as dark as he
dared allow before giving the signal for attack, but there was one more
group to contact. He debated and decided to go to them.

Then, as he entered the rear of the house, he heard the cries of alarm
from those houses he had been to. The invaders were breaking out for an
incendiary attack.

He seized his gun and fired the signal for their own advance. He ran
into the street shouting for the others to follow. The nomads were
concentrating their fire charge at the other end of the row of houses,
and there the defenders fell back without an attempt to advance.

Like watching a wave turned back by a rocky shore, Ken saw his
companions fleeing in disorderly retreat through the rear of the houses
to the block beyond. A bullet whizzed by his head. He dropped to the
ground and crawled on his stomach to the safety of cover behind a brick
house.

For a long time he lay in the snow, unmoving. He could not hold back the
sobbing despair that shook him. He had never before known what it was
like to be utterly alone. Mayfield was dying and taking away everything
that was his own personal world. He had listened to news of the
destruction of Chicago and of Berkeley without knowing what it really
meant. Now he knew.

For all he knew, the nomads might even now be in control of the major
part of the town. He could not know what had happened to his father, to
Maria, to anyone.

The crackling of flames in the next house aroused him. He crawled
inside the brick house, which was still safe, for a moment of rest. He
knew he should be fleeing with the others, but he had to rest.

He heard sporadic shooting. A few nomads were straggling after their
companions at the other end of the street. It was too far to shoot.
However, one nomad stopped and swung cautiously under the very windows
of the burning house next door. Ken leveled his rifle and fired. The
bullet caught the man in the shoulder and flung him violently against
the wall. Ken saw that he would be buried by the imminent, flaming
collapse of that wall.

The man saw it, too. He struggled frantically to move out of the way,
but he seemed injured beyond the power to get away.

Ken regarded him in a kind of stupor for a moment. The man out there was
responsible for all this, he thought, for the burning and for the
killing....

He swung his rifle over his shoulder and went out. Brands were falling
upon the wounded enemy. Ken hoisted the man under the arms and dragged
him to the opposite side of the adjacent house. The nomad looked at Ken
with a strange fury in his eyes.

"You're crazy!" he said painfully. "You're the one who shot me?"

Ken nodded.

"You'll be cut off. Well, it won't matter much anyway. By tomorrow your
town will be burned and dead. Soon, we'll all be dead."

Ken kneeled on the ground beside him, as if before some strange object
from a foreign land. "What were you?" he asked. "Before, I mean."

The man coughed heavily and blood covered his mouth and thick growth of
beard. The bullet must be in his lungs, Ken thought. He helped wipe away
the blood and brushed the man's mouth with a handful of snow.

"You're crazy," the nomad said again. "I guess we're all crazy. You're
just a kid, aren't you? You want to know what I was a million years ago,
before all this?"

"Yes," Ken said.

The man attempted a smile. "Gas station. Wasn't that a crazy thing? No
need of gas when all the cars quit. I owned one on the best little
corner in Marysvale."

"Why are you with them?" Ken nodded in the darkness toward the distant
attackers.

The man glared, twisting with the pain. Then his glance softened. "You'd
have done it, too. What else was there? I had a wife, two kids. No food
within a hundred miles after we used what was in our own pantry and
robbed what we could from the supermarket downtown.

"We all got together and went after some. We got bigger as we went
along. We needed men who were good with rifles. We found some. We kept
going. People who had food fought to keep it; we fought to take it.
That's the way it had to be.

"We heard about your town with its big hoard of food. We decided to get
it."

"Did you know you burned half of it this morning?"

"No. That's tough. That's tough all the way around. Don't look at me
that way, kid. You would have done the same. We're all the same as you,
only we didn't live where there was plenty of food on hand. We were all
decent guys before. Me, those guys out in the street that you knocked
off. I guess you're decent, too."

"Where's your family now?"

"Twenty miles down the valley, waiting with the rest of the women and
children for us to bring them food."

Ken rose slowly to his feet. The man was bleeding heavily from the
mouth. His words were growing muffled. "What are you going to do?" he
asked.

"Get on with what has to be done," said Ken wearily. He felt sure he
must be walking in a nightmare and in just a little while he would
awaken. "If there's a chance, I'll try to send somebody after you."

"Never mind me!" the nomad said with sudden fierceness. "I'm done for.
You've finished me. If our outfit should be unlucky enough to lose, see
my wife and try to do something for my kids. Get some food to them. Tom
Doyle's the name," the man said.

A fit of coughing seized him again and blood poured from his mouth. His
eyes were closed when he lay back again. "Tom Doyle's the name," his
bloody lips murmured. "Don't forget that, kid. Tom Doyle's Service,
corner of First and Green in Marysvale. We were all good guys once."

       *       *       *       *       *

The snow was so heavy it seemed like a solid substance through which Ken
walked. In spite of it, row upon row of houses burned with a fury that
lit the whole scene with a glow that was like the comet's own. Above
this, the blanket of black smoke lay as if ready to smother the valley
as soon as the light was gone.

Ken didn't know for sure where he was going. A kind of aimlessness crept
over him and there no longer seemed any rational objective toward which
to move. He crept on from house to house in the direction his group had
gone, but he could not find any of them. Somewhere he touched the edge
of combat again. He had a nightmare of going into a thousand houses,
smashing their windows out, thrusting his rifle through for a desperate
shot at some fleeing enemy.

The night was held back by a hundred terrible fires. He shot at shadows
and ghosts that moved against the flames. He sought the companionship of
others who fought, like himself, in a lonely vastness where only the
sound of fire and gunshots prevailed.

Later, he moved through the streets stricken with cold that he could not
lose even when he passed and stood close to a mass of burning rubble.
He had stopped shooting quite a long time ago, and he guessed he was out
of bullets. The next time he met someone, he thought, he would ask them
to look in his pockets and see if any were left.

He kept walking. He passed streets where the black, charcoal arms of the
skeletons of houses raised to the sky. He passed the hot columns of
smoke and continued to shiver with cold as they steamed upward to the
clouds. He passed others but no one spoke. After a while he threw his
gun away because it was too heavy to carry and he was too tired to walk
any more.

The falling snow was covering the ruins with a blanket of kind
obscurity. Ken kneeled down and was surprised to observe that he wasn't
cold any more. He lay full length in the whiteness, cradling his head on
his arms, and peace and stillness such as he had never known before
closed over him.

       *       *       *       *       *

It seemed an eternity later that there was a voice capable of rousing
him, a familiar voice calling out in anguish, "Ken, Ken--this is your
dad."

He responded, although it was like answering in a dream. "Take care of
them, Dad," he said. "Don't let anything happen to them. A woman and two
children. Tom Doyle's the name--don't forget that, Tom Doyle."




Chapter 17. _Balance of Nature_


He lay between white sheets, and the stench of burning things was
everywhere, in the air that he breathed, in the clean white covers that
were over him. His own flesh seemed to smell of it.

He was not quite sure if he were still in a world of dreams or if this
were real. It was a golden world; the snow-covered ground beyond the
window was gilded with rich, yellow light. He remembered something about
such light that was not pleasant. He had forgotten just what it was.

Maria Larsen stood at the foot of his bed. She smiled as his eyes
opened. "Hello, Ken," she said. "I've been waiting so long. I've been
afraid you'd never wake up."

"Tom Doyle," he said. "Did you find Tom Doyle?"

Maria frowned. "I don't know who you mean!"

"You haven't found his family yet?" Ken cried, struggling to rise in the
bed. "Go and find them right now. I promised Tom Doyle I'd do it."

Maria approached and pushed him gently back upon the pillow, drawing the
covers over him once more. "Tell me about Tom Doyle," she said. "You've
never told me who he is."

It seemed utterly stupid for her not to know, but Ken patiently told
her about Doyle's Service, the best little station in the world, at the
corner of First and Green. "I told Tom I'd take care of them," he said.
"Now go and bring them here!"

"Ken," Maria said, "all the nomads who escaped, and there weren't many,
retreated around the south end of town and picked up the women and
children they'd left there. They moved on south. That was 3 days ago.
We've no idea where they've gone."

Ken tried to rise again against her struggles to hold him down. "They
couldn't have gone so far that a man on horseback couldn't find them!
Why won't you help me? I promised I'd see to it!"

He lay back weakly, covering his face with his arm. "Go and find Tom
Doyle," he said. In detail he described where he had left the man. "You
don't believe what I'm saying. Get Tom Doyle and he'll tell you it's the
truth."

"He wouldn't be there now. All the wounded, including the nomads, have
been moved to homes where they are being cared for. The dead, both
theirs and ours, have been burned and their ashes buried."

"Do what I tell you!" Ken implored.

With bewilderment and fear on her face, Maria stood back from the bed
and looked at Ken's troubled face. Then quietly she stole from the room
and shut the door behind her.

       *       *       *       *       *

He had been overworking himself for weeks, Dr. Adams was saying, and had
been living on a poor diet that would scarcely keep a medium-sized pup
going.

"Then you had a shock, the kind of shock that shakes a man to his very
roots. Now you're on your way up again."

Ken glanced about the room. It seemed normal now and there was only a
great emptiness within him to replace the frantic urgency he
remembered.

"What you're trying to say, Doc, is that I went off my rocker for a
while."

Dr. Adams smiled. "If you want to put it that way. However, you're fine
now."

Ken stared at the ceiling for a few moments. "Will you still say so if I
ask again about Tom Doyle?"

"What do you want to know?"

"Was he found?"

"No. Maria actually tried to find him for you. I'm afraid your Tom Doyle
was among the dead."

"I killed him."

"We killed a lot of them--and they killed a lot of our people."

"How did it end?" asked Ken. "I remember the darkness and just wandering
around the streets shooting, but I don't know what I hit or where I
went."

"That's the way it ended," said Dr. Adams. "House-to-house street
fighting, and we won. Don't ask me how. You were in a sector that was
cut off almost as soon as you entered it. Even where communication was
maintained things were nearly as chaotic.

"Johnson says it was just plain, dumb luck. Hilliard says he doesn't
think it really happened. Dr. Aylesworth calls it a miracle, a gift and
a blessing that shows we're meant to survive. Most of the rest of us are
willing to look at it his way."

"I could do something for Tom Doyle," Ken said finally. "He was a decent
guy. They all were, once. I could find his wife and children."

The doctor shook his head. "All who are left of that group of nomads are
going to die. We've got to let them die, just as we let the people in
Chicago and Berkeley and ten thousand other towns die. We have no more
power to save Tom Doyle's family than we had to save them."

"We're taking care of the nomad wounded! We could do as much for just
one woman and two kids!"

"We're helping the wounded until they get on their feet," Dr. Adams said
quietly. "Then they'll be sent on--to wherever they came from."

Ken stared at him.

"There is only one thing we could never forgive ourselves for," the
doctor continued. "That one thing would be letting the Earth itself die.
As long as there are people alive who can fight the comet, we still have
a chance. Nothing else in the whole world matters now. Don't you see
there is no other purpose in keeping Mayfield alive except to support
the few people who understand the dust and can fight it? Beyond that,
Mayfield has no more right to live than any other town that has already
died. But Mayfield has to stay alive to keep you and your father and the
others like you fighting the dust."

Dr. Adams gave permission for Ken to be out of bed for a short time. He
tried, after the doctor had left, and almost fell on his face. The whole
world seemed to spin in enormous cart wheels. He persisted though, and 2
hours later he was making his way slowly up College Hill with the help
of Maria who walked beside him and lent her arm for support.

At the top of the hill they stopped and turned for a look at the valley
below them. The ruin was plain to see in spite of the snow cover. A
third of the town had been completely burned. At the old skating rink,
workmen were clawing through the debris for usable remains of food. A
miserably small pile of items showed the extent of their success.

Curls of smoke still rose from the ashes, and the nauseating smell of
death and burning floated over the whole valley.

Of his own experience Ken felt only a numbing confusion as yet. He
thought he should feel like a fool for his collapse at the height of the
battle, but he did not. He felt as if he had marched to the absolute
edge of human endurance and had looked to the dark pit below.

He turned to Maria. "I'll be okay now. It's time for you to get back to
the radio station. Tell them what has happened and get their reports.
I'll see you tonight."

It seemed a long time since he had last been in the laboratory. The
workers were once more in the midst of their thousands of trials and
failures to produce a colloidal, non-poisonous form of the
decontaminant, which could be infused in the atmosphere of the world to
destroy the comet dust.

He stayed until his father left at 7 o'clock, and they went home
together. He still had to depend on someone else for assistance on the
steep and slippery hill.

When they reached home Maria had a lengthy report ready from the
Pasadena people, and one from Schenectady.

Professor Maddox read the reports at the dinner table. He passed the
sheets to Professor Larsen as he finished them. Ken saw he was not
reading with his usual thorough analysis. When he had finished he
returned to his eating with perfunctory motions.

"Anything new?" Ken asked.

"The same old story. A thousand hours of experiments, and no success. I
feel we're all on the wrong track, trying to perfect a chemical colloid,
based on the decontaminant, which will destroy the dust. I feel that
nothing's going to come of it."

Ken said, "I had a crazy dream the other day while Dr. Adams had me
under drugs. I had almost forgotten it. I dreamed I was walking along
the street and had a special kind of flashlight in my hand. When I came
to a car that wouldn't run, standing by the curb, I turned the beam of
the flashlight on it. Then whoever owned it could step in and drive
away. After I had done that to all the cars in Mayfield I turned it on
the sky and just kept flashing it back and forth and the comet dust
fell down like ashes and the air was clean."

Professor Maddox smiled. "A nice dream! I wish we could make it come
true. I'm afraid that idea will have to go back to the pages of your
science fiction, where it probably came from in the first place."

"Dad, I'm serious!" Ken said earnestly.

"About making a magic flashlight?" His father was almost sarcastic,
which revealed the extent of his exhaustion, Ken thought. He was never
like that.

"What I'm trying to say is that there are other ways to precipitate
colloids. We haven't even given any thought to them. Colloids can be
precipitated by heat, by pressure, by vibration. Maybe a dozen other
ways that I don't know anything about.

"Maybe some kind of physical means, rather than chemical, is the answer
to our problem. Why don't we let Pasadena and the other labs go on with
the chemical approach but let us do some work on possible physical
means?"

Professor Maddox sat very still. His glance passed from Ken to Professor
Larsen. The latter nodded. "I think we have indeed been foolish in
ignoring this possibility up to now. I wonder if Ken hasn't got a very
good thought there."

"Have you anything specific to suggest?" Ken's father asked.

"Well, I've been wondering about supersonic methods. I know that a
supersonic beam can be used for coagulation and precipitation."

"It would depend on the size of the colloidal particles, and on the
frequency of the wave, wouldn't it? Perhaps we _could_ find a frequency
that would precipitate the dust, but I wonder if we wouldn't have the
same problem as with mechanical treatment of the Earth's atmosphere.
Even if we succeeded on a laboratory scale, how could it be applied on a
practical, worldwide scale?"

"I don't know," said Ken. "It may not work out, but I think it's worth
trying."

"Yes, I agree. I don't think we'll give up the chemical research, but a
group of you can begin work on this supersonic approach tomorrow."

The losses of food at the warehouse were enormous. Less than 5 percent
of the contents could be removed in usable form. Most of the canned
goods had burst from internal pressure. Grain and other dried products
were burned, for the most part. The food supply of the community was now
reduced to six-tenths of what it had been.

The population had been reduced by one-tenth, in men killed by the
nomads.

Mayor Hilliard and his councilmen struggled to work out a reasonable
ration plan, based upon the ratio of supplies to number of consumers.
There was no arithmetical magic by which they could stretch the food
supply to satisfy minimum needs until next harvest.

There was going to be death by starvation in Mayfield before spring.

Hilliard fought through an agreement in the Council that the researchers
on College Hill, and all their families, were to have first priority,
and that they were to get full rations at all times in order to keep on
with their work.

There were grumblings among the councilmen, but they finally agreed to
the wisdom of this. They agreed there were babies and small children who
needed a somewhat normal ration, at least. There were over four hundred
wounded who had to be cared for as a result of the battle. There were
also the aged, like Granny Wicks, and her companions.

"Well try to give the little ones a chance," said Mayor Hilliard, "but
the old ones don't need it. Perhaps we can spare a little extra for the
wounded who have a chance of survival, but not much. We're going to see
that College Hill survives."

Before spring, however, a choice would still have to be made--who was to
have the remaining share of food, and who was not?

Privately, Hilliard wondered if any of them had a chance to see another
spring.

The decision to support the scientists at the expense of the other
inhabitants of Mayfield could not be kept secret. When it became known,
a tide of fury swept the community. The general public no longer had any
capacity to accept the larger view in preference to relief of their own
suffering. One of the college students who worked in the laboratory was
beaten by a crowd as he walked through town. He died the same evening.

Suddenly, the scientists felt themselves standing apart, pariahs among
their own people. They debated whether to take the allotment. They asked
themselves over and over if they were tempted to take it because they
shared the same animal greed that gripped the whole town, or if genuine
altruism prodded them to accept.

Dr. Adams met their arguments. "You accept," he said, "or everything we
fought for is worthless. You can stand the hate of the townspeople.
Scientists have done it before, and it's a small sacrifice so long as
you can continue your work. Those of us who are supporting you believe
in that work. Now get on with it, and let's not have any more of these
ridiculous arguments!"

The suggestion of physical means of precipitating the dust came like a
burst of light to the entire group as they began to examine the
possibilities. Within a week, they had determined there was indeed a
broad range of supersonic frequencies capable of precipitating the dust.

The night Professor Maddox and his companions came home to announce
their success they were met with the news that Mrs. Larsen was ill.
During the day, she had developed a high temperature with severe pains
in her body.

Professor Larsen was deeply worried. "She's never been ill like this
before."

Ken was sent for Dr. Adams, but the latter did not come for almost 2
hours. When he did arrive, they were shocked by his appearance. His face
was lined and hollow with exhaustion, beyond anything they had seen as
long as they had known him. He looked as if he were on the verge of
illness himself.

He brushed away their personal questions and examined Mrs. Larsen,
rather perfunctorily, they thought. However there was no hesitation as
he announced his diagnosis. "It's the sixteenth case I've seen today.
Over a hundred and fifty this week. We've got an epidemic of flu on our
hands. It's no mild, patty-caking kind, either. It's as virulent as any
that's ever been experienced!"

Mrs. Maddox uttered a low cry of despair. "How much more must we be
called upon to endure?"

No one answered. Dr. Adams rummaged in his bag. "I have vaccine for all
of you. I don't know how much good it will do against this brand of bug
that's loose now, but we can give it a chance."

"Is everyone in town getting it?" Professor Maddox asked.

Dr. Adams snorted. "Do you think we keep supplies of everything in
emergency proportions? College Hill gets it. Nobody else."

"We can't go on taking from everyone else like this!" protested Mrs.
Maddox. "They have as much right to it as we. There should be a lottery
or something to determine who gets the vaccine."

"Hilliard's orders," said Dr. Adams. "Besides, we've settled all this.
You first, Ken."

For a few days after the battle with the nomads, it had seemed as if the
common terror had welded all of Mayfield into an impregnable unit.
There was a sense of having stood against all that man and nature could
offer, and of having won out against it. However, the penetrating
reality of impending competition among themselves for the necessities of
life, for the very right to live, had begun to shatter the bonds that
held the townspeople as one.

The killing of the college student in protest against the partiality to
College Hill was the first blast that ripped their unity. Some protested
openly against the viciousness of it, but most seemed beyond caring.

There were two events of note in the days following. The first was a
spontaneous, almost valley-wide resurgence of memory of Granny Wicks and
her warnings. Everything she had said had come true. The feeling swept
Mayfield that here in their very midst was an oracle of truth who had
been almost wholly ignored. There was nothing they needed to know so
much as the outcome of events with respect to themselves and to the town
as a whole.

Almost overnight, streams of visitors began to pour toward the home for
the aged where Granny lived. When they came, she smiled knowingly and
contentedly, as if she had been expecting them, waiting for them.
Obligingly, and with the peaceful aura of omniscience, she took them
into her parlor and told them of things to come.

At the same time, Frank Meggs felt new stirrings within him. He sensed
that he had been utterly and completely right in all his years of
criticism of those who managed the affairs of Mayfield. The present
condition of things proved it. The town was in utter chaos, its means of
survival all but destroyed. Incompetently, its leaders bumbled along,
not caring for the mass of the people, bestowing the people's goods on
the leaders' favorites. He began saying these things on the streets. He
got a box, and used it for a platform, and he shouted from the street
corners that the leaders were corrupt, and none of them were safe
unless College Hill and City Hall were wiped out. He said that he would
be a better mayor than anyone else in Mayfield.

He had listeners. They gathered on the corners in the daytime, and they
listened at night by the light of flaming torches. Many people began to
believe that he was right.

       *       *       *       *       *

A week after Mrs. Larsen's illness, it was evident beyond all doubt that
Mayfield was the victim of a killer epidemic. Mayor Hilliard himself was
stricken, and he sent word that he wanted Professor Maddox, Ken, and Dr.
Larsen to come to his bedside.

He was like a feeble old man when they arrived. All the fire and the
life had gone from his eyes, but he brightened a little as they came
into the room.

"At least you are still alive," he said gruffly. "I just wanted to make
sure of that fact, and I wanted to have a final understanding that it's
soaked into your thick heads that nothing is to interfere with your own
survival."

"We hope you're not overestimating our worth," said Professor Maddox.

"I don't know whether I am or not! All I know is that if you're not
worth saving then nobody is. So, if this town is going to die, you are
going to be the last ones left alive, and if you don't give me your word
on this right now I'll come back and haunt you every minute you do
survive!"

"In order to haunt, you have to be in the proper realm," said Professor
Maddox, attempting a joke.

Mayor Hilliard sighed. "I think I can take care of that, too. I'm beat.
You're close to it, but you've got to hang on. Carry on with your work
on the hill. One thing more: This fellow Meggs has got to be crushed
like a worm. When I go, there won't be any election. Johnson is taking
over and he'll look out for you, the same as I have done."

"You're going to be all right!" said Professor Maddox. "You'll be up on
your feet in another week!"

The Mayor seemed not to have heard him. He was staring at the ceiling,
and there was an amused smile at the corners of his lips. "Ain't Mother
Nature a funny old gal, though?" he said. "She's planned this to work
out just right, and I think it's another of old Doc Aylesworth's signs
that Mayfield and College Hill are going to live, so that the rest of
the world will, too. It may get knocked pretty flat, but it's going to
get up again."

"What are you talking about?" said Ken.

"The invasion of the nomads, and then this flu. Don't you see it? First
we get our food supply knocked out, and now old Mamma Nature is going to
cut the population down to match it. We tried to figure out who was
going to eat and who was going to starve, and now it's going to be all
figured out for us.

"Balance of nature, or something, you scientists call it, don't you?" He
glanced up at the professors and Ken. "It's a wonderful thing," he said,
"just absolutely wonderful!"




Chapter 18. _Witchcraft_


Three days later, Mayor Hilliard died. It was on the same day that
Maria's mother was buried.

Maria had watched her mother day and night, losing strength and finally
lapsing into a coma from which she never emerged.

Maria and her father did their best to control their grief, to see it as
only another part of the immense reservoir of grief all about them. When
they were alone in their section of the house they gave way to the loss
and the loneliness they felt.

There were no burial services. The deaths had mounted to at least a
score daily. No coffins were available. Each family dug its own shallow
graves in the frozen ground of the cemetery. Sheriff Johnson posted men
to help, and to see that graves were at least deep enough to cover the
bodies. Beyond this, nothing more could be done. Only Dr. Aylesworth
came daily to hold prayer services. It was little enough to do, but it
was all there was left for him.

When the death of Mayor Hilliard became known, Sheriff Johnson called an
immediate session of the councilmen and announced himself as Hilliard's
successor. Visitors were invited, and Professor Maddox thought it of
sufficient importance to attend.

The tension in the air was heavy as the group sat in thick coats in the
unheated hall. Johnson spoke without preliminaries. "There are some of
you who won't like this," he said. "Our town charter calls for an
emergency election in case of the Mayor's death, and some of you think
we should have one now.

"So do those out there." He waved a hand toward the window and the town
beyond. "However, we're not going to have an election, and I'll tell you
why. I know the man who would win it and you do, too. Frank Meggs.

"He hated Hilliard, he hates us, and he hates this town, and he'll do
everything in his power to destroy it. Today he would win an election if
it were held. He's used the discomfort of the people to stir them to a
frenzy against Hilliard's policy of protection for College Hill. He'll
stir them up against anything that means a sacrifice of present safety
for long-range survival. Meggs is a dangerous man.

"Maybe this isn't the way it ought to be done, but I don't know any
other way. When this is all over there will be time enough for
elections, and if I don't step down you can shoot me or run me out of
the country or anything else you like. For the time being, though, this
is the way things are going to be. It's what Hilliard wanted, and I've
got his written word if any of you care to see it."

He looked about challengingly. There was a scuffling of feet. Some
councilmen looked at their neighbors and back again to the Sheriff. None
stood up to speak, nor did any of the visitors voice objections,
although several of Frank Meggs' lieutenants were in the group.

"We'll carry on, then," Sheriff Johnson said, "just as before. Food
rations will remain as they are. We don't know how many of us there will
be after this epidemic is over. Maybe none of us will be here by
spring; we can only wait and see."

Although his assumption of power was accepted docilely by the Council,
it sparked a furor among the populace of Mayfield. Frank Meggs fanned it
with all the strength of his hatred for the town and all it stood for.

Granny Wicks' fortunetelling business continued to grow. Considerations
had been given to the desirability of putting a stop to it, but this
would have meant literally imprisoning her, and, it was reasoned, this
would stir up more fire than it would put out.

Her glory was supreme as she sat in an old rocker in the cottage where
she lived. Lines of visitors waited all day at her door. Inside, she was
wrapped in a blanket and wore an ancient shawl on her head against the
cold of the faintly heated room. She cackled in her high-pitched voice
with hysterical glee.

To those who came, her words were solemn pronouncements of eternal
truth. To anyone else it would have been sheer mumbo jumbo, but her
believers went away in ecstasy after carefully copying her words. They
spent hours at home trying to read great meanings into her senile
nonsense.

It was quite a time before Frank Meggs realized the power that lay in
the old woman, and he berated himself for not recognizing it earlier.
When he finally did go to see her, he was not disappointed. It was easy
to understand how she, with her ancient, wrinkled face and deep-black
eyes, could be confused with a source of prophecy and wisdom in these
times of death and terror.

"I want to lead this people, Granny," he said, after she had bade him
sit down. "Tell me what to do."

She snorted and eyed him sharply. "What makes you think you can lead
this people?" she demanded.

"Because I see they have been led into disaster by selfish, ignorant
fools," said Frank Meggs; "men who believe that in the laboratories on
the hill there can be found a way to dispel the power of the great
comet. Because they believe this, they have persecuted the people. They
have taken their food and have given it to the scientists. They have
protected them, and them alone, from the disease that sickens us.

"You do not believe these men can overcome the power of the comet, do
you, Granny?"

Wild flame leaped in the old woman's eyes. "Nothing can overwhelm the
power of this heavenly messenger! Death shall come to all who attempt
such blasphemy!"

"Then you will give your blessing to my struggle to release the people
from this bondage?"

"Yes!" Granny Wicks spoke with quivering intensity. "You are the man I
have been waiting for. I can see it now! You are appointed by the stars
themselves!

"I prophesy that you shall succeed and drive out those who dare trifle
with the heavens. Go with my blessings, Frank Meggs, and do your great
work!"

Elation filled him as he left the house. It was certain that Granny
Wicks would pass the word of his "appointment" to all who came to her
audience chamber. The way things were going, it looked as if that would
be nine-tenths of the people in Mayfield.

The occupation of the Mayor's chair by Sheriff Johnson gave Frank Meggs
a further opening that he wanted. The crowds grew at his torchlight
harangues. Even though one-third of the population lay ill with the flu,
the night meetings went on.

"Sheriff Johnson has no right to the office he holds," he screamed. His
appreciative audience huddled in their miserable coldness and howled
their agreement.

"This is not the way things should be done. Our charter calls for an
election but when will there be an election? My friends, our good
Sheriff is not the real villain in this matter. He is but the tool and
the dupe of a clever and crafty group who, through him, are the real
holders of power and privilege in this town.

"While we have starved, they have been fed in plenty; while we have been
cold, they have sat before their warm fires; while we sicken and die of
disease, they are immune because the only supply of vaccine in this
whole valley was used by them.

"You know who I am talking about! The scientists who would like to rule
us, like kings, from the top of College Hill!

"They tell us the comet is responsible for this trouble. But we know
different. Who has been responsible for all the trouble the world has
known for ages? Science and scientists! The world was once a clean,
decent place to live. They have all but destroyed it with their unholy
experiments and twistings of nature.

"They've always admitted their atom experiments would make monsters of
future generations of men, but they didn't care about that! Now they're
frightened because they didn't know these experiments would also destroy
the machines on which they had forced us to be dependent. They try to
say it is the comet.

"Well, the world would have been better off without their machines in
the first place. It would have been better off without them. Now we've
got a chance to be free of them at last! Are we going to endure their
tyranny from College Hill any longer?"

Night after night, he repeated his words, and the crowds howled their
approval.

On College Hill, morale and optimism were at their highest peak since
the appearance of the comet. On the roof of Science Hall there was being
erected a massive, 30-foot, hyperbolic reflector whose metal surface had
been beaten out of aluminum chicken-shed roofs. At its center, and at
intervals about the bowl, there projected a series of supersonic
generating units, spaced for proper phasing with one another in beaming
a concentrated wave of supersonic energy skyward.

Power to this unit was supplied by a motor generator set constructed of
decontaminated parts, which had been operating for a full week without
sign of breakdown.

Ken and his companions had worked day and night on the rough
construction, while the scientists had designed and built the critical
supersonic generating equipment. In a solid, 24-hour shift of
uninterrupted work they had mounted and tested the units. It was
completed on their second day of work. Tomorrow it would be turned on
for a full week's run to test the practicability of such a method of
precipitating the comet dust.

Laboratory tests had shown it could be done on a small scale. This
projector was a pilot model to determine whether it would be worthwhile
building a full-size machine with a reflector 250 feet in diameter.

Ken's father looked completely exhausted, but his smile was broader than
it had been for many weeks. "I'm confident we will prove the
practicability of this machine," he said. "After that, we will build a
really big one, and we'll tell the rest of the world how to do it. I
don't know how long it will take, but this will do the job. We'll get
them to build big ones in Tokyo and Pasadena and Stockholm, wherever
there's civilization enough to know how to do it; they can decontaminate
their own metals and build new engines that will run as long as
necessary. We've got the comet on the run!"

He hadn't meant to give a speech, but he couldn't help it. They were
right, and their staggering labors were nearly over, in this phase, at
least.

       *       *       *       *       *

They slept from exhaustion that night. Ken was awakened in the
early-morning hours by the glare in his bedroom window. He sat up and
looked out. It seemed to be a very long time before he could let his
mind admit what his eyes saw.

Science Hall was in flames, the entire structure a mass of leaping,
boiling fire.

Ken ran from his room, crying the alarm.

In their separate rooms, his father and Dr. Larsen stared stupidly at
the flickering light as if also unable to comprehend the vastness of the
ruin. In frenzy of haste, they donned their clothes and ran from their
rooms.

Maria was awake as was Mrs. Maddox. "What is it?" they called. Then
they, too, saw the flames through the windows.

The men ran from the house, hatless, their tousled hair flying in the
night. Halfway up the hill, Ken called to his father, "You've got to
stop, Dad! Don't run like that!"

Professor Maddox came to a halt, his breath bursting from him in great
gasps. Ken said, "There's nothing we can do, Dad."

Dr. Larsen stopped beside them. "Nothing except watch," he agreed.

Slowly, they resumed their way. Behind, they heard the sounds of others
attracted by the fire. As they came at last to the brow of the hill, Ken
pointed in astonishment. "There's a crowd of people over there! Near the
burning building!"

He started forward. A shot burst in the night, and a bullet clipped the
tree over his head. He dropped to the ground. "Get down! They're firing
at us!"

As they lay prone, sickness crept through them simultaneously. "I know
who it is," Ken cried. "Frank Meggs. That crazy Frank Meggs! He's got a
mob together and fired the college buildings!"

In agony of spirit they crawled to the safety of the slope below the
brow of the hill. "We've got to go after Sheriff Johnson," said Ken.
"We've got to fight again; we've got to fight all over again!"

Dr. Larsen watched the fire in hypnotic fascination. "All gone," he
whispered. "Everything we've done; everything we've built. Our records,
our notes. There's nothing left at all."

They moved down the hill, cautioning others about the mob. Sheriff
Johnson was already starting up as they reached the bottom. Quickly,
they told him what they'd found at the top. "We shouldn't let the mob
get off the hill," said Ken. "If we do, we'll never know which ones took
part."

"There are as many down here who would like to be up there," said
Johnson. "You can be sure of that. We don't know who we can trust any
more. Get your science club boys together and find as many patrolmen as
possible. Ask each one to get fifteen men he thinks he can trust and
meet here an hour from now. If we can do it in that time we may stand a
chance of corralling them. Otherwise, we'll never have a chance at
them."

"We can try," said Ken.

By now, others had been fired upon and driven back, so that the
situation was apparent to everyone. A great many townspeople, most of
those well enough to leave their houses, were streaming toward College
Hill.

It would be futile to try to find the patrolmen at their own homes, Ken
knew. They'd be coming this way, too. He soon found Joe Walton and Al
Miner. They mingled in the crowd, calling out for other members of the
club. Within minutes, all but two had been found. Word was passed to
them to carry out the Sheriff's instructions.

It was easier than they anticipated. Within 20 minutes a dozen officers
had been given the word to find their men. At the end of the hour they
were gathered and ready for the advance.

The spectators had been driven back. The armed men fanned out to cover
the entire hill in a slowly advancing line. They dwindled and became
silhouettes against the flames.

At the top, Sheriff Johnson called out to the mob through an improvised
megaphone. "Give up your arms and come forward with your hands up!" he
cried. "In 10 seconds we start shooting!"

His command was answered by howls of derision. It was like the cries of
maniacs, and their drifted words sounded like, "Kill the scientists!"

Bullets accompanied the shouts and howls. The Sheriff's men took cover
and began a slow and painful advance.

There could be a thousand mobbers on top of the hill, Ken thought. The
Sheriff's men might be outnumbered several times over. He wondered if
they ought to try to get reinforcements, and decided against it unless
word should be sent down from the top.

There was no way of telling how the battle was going. Gunfire was
continuous. A freezing wind had come up and swept over the length of the
valley and over those who waited and those who fought. It fanned the
flames to volcanic fury.

Ken touched his father's arm. "There's no use for you to stay in this
cold," he said. "You ought to go back to the house."

"I've got to know how it comes out up there, who wins."

The cold starlight of the clear sky began to fade. As dawn approached,
the flames in the college buildings had burned themselves out. But the
gunfire continued almost without letup. Then, almost as quickly as it
had started, it died.

After a time, figures appeared on the brow of the hill and came down in
a weary procession. Sheriff Johnson led them. He stopped at the bottom
of the hill.

"Was it Meggs?" Ken asked. "Did you get Frank Meggs?"

"He fell in the first 10 minutes," said Johnson. "It wasn't really
Meggs keeping them going at all. They had a witch up there. As long as
she was alive nothing would stop them."

"Granny Wicks! Was she up there?"

"Sitting on a kind of throne they'd made for her out of an old rocking
chair. Right in the middle of the whole thing."

"Did she finally get shot?"

Sheriff Johnson shook his head. "She was a witch, a real, live witch.
Bullets wouldn't touch her. The west wall of Science Hall collapsed and
buried her. That's when they gave up.

"So maybe you can say you won, after all," he said to Professor Maddox.
"It's a kind of symbol, anyway, don't you think?"




Chapter 19. _Conquest of the Comet_


For the first time since the coming of the comet, Ken sensed defeat in
his father. Professor Maddox seemed to believe at last that they were
powerless before the invader out of space. He seemed like a runner who
has used his last reserve of strength to reach a goal on which his eye
has been fixed, only to discover the true goal is yet an immeasurable
distance ahead.

Professor Maddox had believed with all his heart and mind that they had
hurdled the last obstacle with the construction of the pilot projector.
With it gone, and all their tools and instruments and notes, there was
simply nothing.

As Ken considered the problem, it seemed to him the situation was not as
bad as first appeared. The most important thing had not been lost. This
was the knowledge, locked in their own minds, of what means could
prevail against the dust. Beyond this, the truly essential mechanical
elements for starting over again were also available.

Art Matthews had been very busy, and he had parts enough for six more
motor-generator sets. These were decontaminated and sealed in protective
packing. It would be only a matter of hours to assemble one of them, and
that would power any supersonic projector they might choose to build.

And they _could_ still choose to build one. In the radio supply stores
of the town, and in the junk boxes of the members of the science club,
there were surely enough components to build several times over the
necessary number of generator elements. In the barns and chicken sheds
of the valley there was plenty of aluminum sheeting to build reflectors.

The more he considered it, the more possible it seemed to take up from
where they had left off the night before the fire. There was one
important question Ken asked himself, however: Why stop with a replica
of the small pilot model they had built on the roof of Science Hall?

As long as they were committed to building a projector to test for
effectiveness, they might as well build a full-scale instrument, one
that could take its place as an actual weapon against the dust. If there
were errors of design, these could be changed during or after
construction. He could see no reason at all for building a mere 30-foot
instrument again.

The greatest loss suffered in the fire was that of the chemistry
laboratory and its supplies and reagents. Materials for running tests on
the dust could not be replaced, nor could much of their microchemical
apparatus. The electron microscope, too, was gone. These losses would
have to be made up, where necessary, by having such work done by
Pasadena, Schenectady or Detroit. If the projector were as successful as
all preliminary work indicated, there would be little need for further
testing except as a matter of routine check on the concentration of dust
in the atmosphere.

Before approaching his father, Ken talked it over with his fellow
members of the science club. He wanted to be sure there was no loophole
he was overlooking.

"Labor to build the reflector is what we haven't got," said Joe Walton.
"It would take months, maybe a whole year, for us to set up only the
framework for a 250-foot bowl!"

"Getting the lumber alone would be a community project," said Al.

"That's what it's going to be," Ken answered. "Johnson is behind us.
He'll give us anything we want, if he knows where to get it. I don't
think there's any question of his authorizing the construction by the
men here."

There was nothing else they could think of to stand in the way of the
project.

It had been two days since the fire, but Ken's father still seemed
stunned by it. After dinner, he sat in his old chair where he used to
read, but he did not read now. He sat for hours, staring at the opposite
corner of the room.

Professor Larsen seemed locked in a similar state of shock. In addition
to his wife's death, this destruction of their entire scientific
facilities seemed a final blow from which he could not recover.

Ken recognized, too, that there was a burden these men had carried that
no one else knew. That was the burden of top-level responsibility for a
major portion of the world's effort against the "invader." It was an
Atlas-like burden that men could not carry without suffering its
effects.

Ken approached them that evening, after he and Maria had helped his
mother with her chores and had gathered snow to melt overnight for their
next day's water supply.

"Dad," Ken said, "I've been wondering when we could get started on the
project again. The fellows in the club are all ready to go. I guess most
everyone else is, too."

His father looked as if Ken had just uttered something absolutely
unintelligible. "Start!" he cried. "Start what? How can we start
anything? There's nothing left to work with, absolutely nothing!"

Ken hesitated, an ache in his heart at the defeat he saw in his father's
eyes. He held out his hands. "We've got these," he said. He tapped the
side of his head. "And this."

Professor Maddox's face seemed to relax a trifle. He looked at his son
with a faint suggestion of a smile on his lips. "Yes? What do you
propose to do with them?"

Carefully, then, Ken outlined the results of his inventory. "Art can
build up to six engines, if we need them. We've got plenty of electronic
parts, and tubes big enough to put 60 or 70 kilowatts of supersonic
energy in a beam. We don't want to build a little reflector again; we
want to put up a full-scale instrument. When that's done, build another
one, and still another, until we've used every scrap of material
available in the valley. By that time maybe we'll have some cars running
and can go to Frederick and other towns for more parts."

Ken's father leaned back in his chair, his eyes closed. "If enthusiasm
could do it, we could look forward to such a structure the day after
tomorrow."

"Maybe enthusiasm _can_ do it," said Professor Larsen quietly. "I
believe the boy is right. We've let ourselves despair too much because
of the fire. We still have the necessary principles in our heads. If Ken
is right, we've got the materials. The only problem is that you and I
are a pair of old, exhausted men, without the necessary enthusiasm and
energy. Perhaps we can borrow enough of that from these boys. I'm in
favor of undertaking it!"

By the light of oil lamps they planned and talked until far past
midnight. There were still no objections to be found outside the labor
problem. When they were through, rough drawings and calculations for the
first projector were finished.

"Such a projector could surely reach well into the stratosphere," said
Professor Larsen. "With the tremendous velocities of the air masses at
those heights, one projector should be able to process hundreds of tons
of atmosphere per day."

"I am wondering," said Professor Maddox, "if we should not make the
reflector parabolic instead of hyperbolic. We may disperse our energy
too widely to be effective at high levels."

"I think not. The parabola would narrow the beam to little more than its
initial diameter and would concentrate the energy more than is required.
With the power Ken speaks of, I believe the hyperbolic form could carry
an effective wave into the stratosphere. We'll make some calculations
for comparison tomorrow."

       *       *       *       *       *

They authorized Ken to speak with the Sheriff the following day.

"I've been wondering when I'd see some of you people," Johnson said
bluntly. "What are you doing about the mess on the hill?"

"My father thought maybe you'd drop in," said Ken.

The Sheriff shook his head. "It's your move. I just wondered if you had
any ideas, or if this fire had knocked the props out from under you."

"It did, but now we're ready to go, and we need help." Briefly, Ken gave
a description of the projector they planned to build. "Labor is the
problem for us. If we could have all the carpenters in town, and all who
could be spared from woodcutting and every other activity for 2 or 3
weeks I think we could get it done."

"You know how many men are left," said Johnson. "Between the war with
the nomads and the epidemic of flu, one-third of those we had when this
started are dead. A third of the ones left are sick, and quite a few of
those on their feet have to take care of the ones that aren't."

"I know," said Ken.

"You know how the people feel about you scientists?"

"Yes."

The Sheriff stared at him a long time before continuing. "It won't be
easy, but we'll do it. When do you want to start?"

"Tomorrow morning. In Jenkin's pasture, north of town."

"How many men?"

"All the carpenters you can get and a hundred others to rustle materials
and tear down old buildings."

"I meet with the Council this afternoon to go over work assignments.
You'll have your men in the morning."

The rest of the day, Ken and his fellow club members chose the exact
spot to erect the projector and staked it out. They spotted the nearest
buildings that could be dismantled for materials, and made estimates of
how much they needed.

The following morning they met again on the site, and there were ten men
from town, in addition to the college students and others who had taken
part in the research on College Hill.

"Are you all Johnson could spare?" Ken asked the group.

The nearest man shook his head. "They were assigned. No one else would
come. They think you are wasting your time; they think you can't do
anything about the comet. A lot of them are like Meggs and Granny Wicks:
they think you shouldn't _try_ to do anything about it."

Ken felt a blaze of anger. "Sometimes, I think they're right!" he said
bitterly. "Maybe it would be better if we just let the whole thing go!"

"Now don't get me wrong," the man said. "We're on your side. We're here,
aren't we? I'm just telling you what they say and think in town."

"I know and I'm sorry. These other fellows will tell you what we need
done. I'm going to ride in to see Johnson."

The Sheriff was not in his office. Ken was told he had gone over to the
food warehouse where rations were being distributed. There was some
rumor of a disturbance.

Ken remounted his horse and rode to the warehouse. As he approached, he
saw the lineup before the distribution counter was motionless. In front
of the counter, Sheriff Johnson stood with a pair of revolvers in his
hands, holding back the crowd.

He glanced at Ken and said, "Don't tell me! I know you haven't any
workers out there today. They're here in line, trying to collect
groceries without working!"

"We're not going to work so those scientists on the hill can have the
fat of everything!" a man near the head of the line shouted. Others
echoed him with cries of hysteria.

Ken felt his disgust and disappointment vanish before a wave of genuine
fear. These people had ceased to be anything but frightened, hungry
animals. Their capacity for rational action had all but disappeared
under the strains they had suffered. They were ready to lash out at
anything that appeared a suitable target for their own hysterical anger
and panic.

It was useless to expect them to help with the projector. The crew of
scientists and students would have to do it alone, no matter how many
weeks it took.

Sheriff Johnson, however, had no such thought. He fired a bullet over
the heads of the crowd and brought them to silence. "Listen to me," he
said. "I know you're sick and hungry and scared. There's not a man or
woman in this valley who isn't, and that includes me and the members of
the Council, and those you tried to burn off College Hill.

"You don't know how good you've got it! You don't deserve it as good as
you've got. You people should have been with those in Chicago or in San
Francisco. You should have known what it was really like to be suddenly
cut off from every ounce of food beyond that which was in your own
cupboards. You should have known what it was like to fight day after day
in the streets of a burning city without knowing why you were fighting,
or having any hope of victory.

"You've gone through your battle, and you've won, and you're still here,
and there's food left. A lot of us are still going to die before the
epidemic is over. We haven't the medical means to save us all. But some
of us will come out of it, and every one has just as good a chance as
his neighbor.

"That's not important. It doesn't make much difference whether any one
of us stays alive now, or dies in 50 years. What is important is trying
to keep the world alive, and that's what these scientists are doing.

"While you accuse them of every crime in the book, they are the only
chance the world has got for survival!"

"They can't do anything about it!" a woman shouted. "They're just making
it up to get more than the rest of us!"

The crowd started to take up its cry again.

"Shut up!" the Sheriff thundered at them. "I repeat: you don't deserve
to be as lucky as you are! But you aren't going to get out of taking
your part in pulling things back together again. Help is needed out
there north of town, and you're going to help.

"You help or you don't eat!"

A roar of rage thundered from the group. One man stepped forward. "You
can't pull a thing like this, Johnson. We've got guns, too. We've used
them before, and we can use them again!"

"Then you had better go home and get them right now," said Johnson. "My
men and I will be waiting for you. I suppose there could be a lot more
of you than there are of us, so you can probably shoot us down. Then you
can eat all you want for a month, and die. Go get your gun, Hank, and
come after your rations!"

The man turned to the crowd. "Okay, you heard what he said! Let's go and
get 'em!"

He strode away, then turned back to beckon his followers. In the empty
street before the converted theater, he stood alone. "Come on!" he
cried. "Who's coming with me?"

The crowd avoided his eyes. They shifted uneasily and looked at Johnson
again. "What do you mean?" another man asked. "About, we work or we
don't eat--"

"Come on, you guys!" Hank shouted.

"The assignments on the projector will be rotated," said Johnson. "We'll
spare as many men as we can from everything else. Those of you who have
been given assignment slips will get 3 days' rations. When you bring
back the slips with a verification that you did your job on the
projector you'll get an assignment somewhere else until it's your turn
again. The ones without verification on the slips don't get the next 3
days' rations. That's the way it's going to be. If there's no more
argument, we'll get on with the distribution.

"Hank, get down at the end of the line!"

By mid-afternoon, the scientists had their full crew of sullen and
unwilling helpers. The Sheriff had sent along a half-dozen of his own
men, fully armed, to see there was no disturbance, but the objectors
seemed to have had their say.

With a gradual increase of co-operativeness, they did the tasks they
were assigned, bringing up materials, laying out the first members of
the great, skeletal structure that would rise in the pasture. Johnson
came at the end of the day to see how it was going. He breathed a sigh
of relief at the lack of disturbance. "It looks like we've got it made,"
he said.

"I think so," Ken agreed. "All we have to do now is see how many more of
these we can get built in other parts of the world."

They spoke that night to all the stations on the radio net, describing
in detail what they had begun, what they were confident it would do.
Professor Larsen's words were relayed to his colleagues in Stockholm.
They estimated they could begin work almost immediately on six
projectors. Others, elsewhere in the country, were quite probable.

In his conversation with Pasadena, Professor Maddox warned, "We have not
yet been able to make tests with the big projector. Our only work so far
has been with the laboratory models, but they were highly successful."

"That's good enough for us," said Dr. Whitehead, director of the
Pasadena work. "Everything we've done here has failed so far. A direct
chemical approach seems out of the question. We'll start with one, but I
think a dozen projectors, at least, are possible for this area."

Pasadena also reported a new radio contact with Calcutta, and promised
to pass the word on to them and to Tokyo. When they closed down the
transmitter after midnight, Ken totaled the number of projectors
promised with reasonable certainty of having the promises fulfilled.
There were eighty.

"It may take a year," his father said, "or it may take 10 years, but now
we know, without a doubt, that we can someday get our atmosphere back as
it was before the comet."




Chapter 20. _Reconstruction_


On the twentieth of January the comet reached its closest approach to
Earth. It was then less than three million miles away. In the realm of
the stars, this was virtually a collision, and if the head of the comet
had been composed of anything more than highly rarefied gases it would
have caused tremendous upheavals and tidal waves.

There were none of these. Only the dust.

Ken arose at dawn that day and went into the yard to watch the rising of
the golden enemy a little before the sun came over the eastern hills. He
doubted whether anyone else was aware it was closer today than it had
been before, or ever would be again. He doubted there would be much
scientific interest in the event, anywhere in the world.

In the observatory, he opened the dome and adjusted the telescope to
take a few pictures and spectrograms. He remembered when he had done
this, a long time ago, with high excitement and curiosity, and he
remembered later times when he had looked up with a bitter hate in his
heart for the impersonal object in the sky.

Now, he felt nothing. He was aware only of a kind of deadness in his
emotions with respect to the comet.

There was no excitement he could find in today's event of close
approach, which was probably the only one of its kind that would be
recorded in the history of mankind. He wondered if he had lost all his
scientific spirit that so momentous an occurrence could inspire him so
little now.

Yet, he no longer hated the comet, either. It was not a thing that could
be hated, any more than the wind when it leveled a city, or the waters
when they drowned the land and the people on it.

These things were beyond hate. You could fight them, but you never had
the privilege of hating them. That was reserved only for other human
beings. It was because of the great, impersonal nature of their common
enemy, he thought, that people had finally turned to fighting each
other. It was for this reason that the people of Mayfield had turned
their hate upon the scientists. The questions of food and privileges
were only superficial excuses.

After an hour's work, Ken left the observatory. The gassy tail of the
comet was a full halo of lighter yellow hue, as seen directly along its
central axis. The darker yellow of the core seemed to Ken like a living
heart.

The light spread to the dust motes in the air and curtained the whole
sky with shimmering haze. It bathed the snow cover of the Earth, and
reflected its golden image against the trees and the walls of the
buildings, and penetrated the windows. It gilded the stark, charcoal
skeletons of the ruins it had created. It spread over the whole Earth
and penetrated every pore. Ken had a momentary illusion that there was
not a particle of substance in the world not permeated and illumined by
the comet's light. He felt as if it were inside his own being, through
his vitals, and shining in the corridors of his brain.

For a moment the old hate returned. He wanted to shut his eyes against
that omnipresent light and to run with all his strength to some secret
place where it could never penetrate.

He recalled the words of Dr. Larsen that seemed to have been uttered so
long ago that they were scarcely within memory: "The universe is a
terrible place that barely tolerates living organisms. It is a great
miracle that here in this corner of the universe living things have
found a foothold. It does not pay ever to forget the fierceness of the
home in which we live."

There was no closing the eyes against this. He looked again at the
comet, the representative to Earthmen of all the fierceness and terror
that lay in outer space, beyond the thin tissue of atmosphere that
protected man and his fragile life. He would remember all the days of
his life that the universe might be beautiful and exciting and terrible,
but whatever it was, it held no friendliness toward man. It could
destroy him with a mere whim of chance occurrence. Man had gained a
foothold, but there was a long way to go to an enduring security.

       *       *       *       *       *

On the day of the official beginning of operation of the giant projector
in Jenkin's pasture, there was a little ceremony. Sheriff Johnson stood
on an improvised platform and with an impressive gesture threw the
switch that officially turned the power into the great instrument. It
had been successfully tested previously, but now it was launched in an
operation that would not cease until the last trace of comet dust had
fallen from the sky and was mingled with the dust of the Earth.

Most of the townspeople who were well enough to do so turned out for the
ceremony. During the construction, a guard had been kept to prevent
sabotage of the projector, but there had been no attempts made on it.
Now the people stood in the trampled snow and ice of the pasture,
staring up at the giant structure, with a quality of near-friendliness
in their eyes and in the expressions of their faces.

The Sheriff made a little speech after throwing the switch. He thanked
them for their co-operation and thousands of man-hours of labor, not
mentioning that it had been obtained, initially, at the point of his
guns. He praised the scientists and noted that conquest of the comet
might never have been achieved without the genius of their men of
College Hill. He did not mention the attempts to destroy that genius.

"I think we should all like to hear," he said, "from the man who has led
this vast and noble effort from its inception. He will speak for all
those who have worked so steadfastly to bring this effort to a
successful conclusion. Professor Maddox!"

There was a flurry of applause. Then it grew, and a shout went up. They
called his name and cheered as he stood, a figure dwarfed against the
background of the great projector bowl.

Ken knew what he must be thinking as he waited for the cheers to
subside. He must be thinking: they have forgotten already, forgotten the
angers and the jealousies and the fears, their attempts to destroy the
small kernel of scientific hope in their midst. They had forgotten
everything but the warming belief that perhaps the worst of the terror
was over and they had lived through it.

"I'm grateful," Professor Maddox was saying, "for the assistance you
have given this project, although you had no personal knowledge of what
it was meant to do. We asked for your faith and we asked for your
confidence that we knew what we were about, at a time when we did not
know it even for ourselves. We were nourished and cared for at your
expense in order that our work might go on. It would not have succeeded
without you."

Ken realized his father was not speaking ironically but meant just what
he said. And it was true.

The vengeful Meggs and the psychotic Granny Wicks had fought them and
incited others who were frightened beyond reason. Yet there had been
Hilliard and Johnson, the Council, and many others who had supported
them. There were those who had built the projector, even though at the
point of a gun, and at the threat of starvation. All of them together
had made the project possible.

It was a miniature of the rise of the whole human race, Ken supposed.
More like a single individual with a multitude of psychoses, hopes, and
geniuses, than a group of separate entities, they had come to this
point. In the same way, they would go on, trying to destroy the
weaknesses and multiply their strength.

       *       *       *       *       *

By the middle of February the flu epidemic was over. Its toll had
leveled the population to a reasonable balance with the food supply.
Whether Mayor Hilliard's ironic suggestion reflected any real principle
or not, the situation had worked out in accord with his macabre
prediction.

Ken had explained the comet's daily infinitesimal retreat and there was
a kind of steady excitement in estimating how much it diminished each
day. Actually, a week's decrease was too small for the naked eye to
detect, but this did not matter.

Radio reports continued to tell of increased construction of projectors
throughout the world. Tests were showing they were effective beyond all
previous hopes.

The populace of Mayfield was enthusiastic about the construction of
additional units. Two more had been built, and three others were
planned. Serious attention had to be given now to the coming planting
season. Every square foot of available ground would have to be
cultivated to try to build up stores for all possible emergencies of the
following winter.

When the time came for making the first work assignments on the farms,
Professor Maddox and Professor Larsen appeared to receive theirs.
Sheriff Johnson was in the office at the time. "What are you two doing
here? You can get back to your regular business," he stormed. "We aren't
that hard up for farmers!"

"We have no regular business," said Professor Maddox. "The projector
work is being taken care of. Mayfield will probably not be the site of a
university again during our lifetimes. We want to be assigned some acres
to plow. By the way, did you hear Art Matthews has got three more
tractors in operation this week? If we can find enough gasoline we may
be able to do the whole season's plowing by machine."

"You're sure you want to do this?" said Sheriff Johnson.

"Quite sure. Just put our names down as plain dirt farmers."

       *       *       *       *       *

Ken clung to the radio for reports of the outside world. The batteries
were all but exhausted, but a motor generator could be allotted to the
station as soon as other work was out of the way.

In Pasadena, they told him a diesel railway engine had been successfully
decontaminated and put into operation. Airtight packing boxes had been
designed for the wheels to keep them from being freshly affected by the
dust remaining in the air. It was planned to operate a train from the
metropolitan area to the great farming sections to the east and north. A
few essential manufactures had also been revived, mostly in the form of
machine shops to decontaminate engine parts.

Negotiations were under way to try to move the great wheat and other
grain stocks of the Midwest down the Mississippi River to New Orleans
and through the Panama Canal to the Pacific Coast cities. Oldtime
sailing vessels, rotting from years of disuse, were being rebuilt for
this purpose.

Ken found it hard to envision the Earth stirring with this much life
after the destruction that had passed over it. In the civilized areas,
it was estimated that fully two-thirds of the population had perished.
Only in the most primitive areas had the comet's effect been lightly
felt. Yet, around the world, the cities were stirring again. Food for
the surviving was being found. The hates and the terrors were being put
away and men were pulling together again to restore their civilization.

Maria came to the radio shack to tell him dinner was ready. He invited
her to join him for a moment. "It may be possible for you and your
father to return to Sweden much sooner that we thought," he said.

Maria shook her head. "We aren't going back, now. We've talked about it
and decided to stay. It's as Papa always said: Where so much happens to
you, that's the place you always call home. More has happened to us in a
year here than in a lifetime back there."

Ken laughed. "That's a funny way to look at it, especially after the
kind of things that have happened to you here. Maybe your father is
right, at that."

"All our friends are here now," she said.

"All I can say is that it's wonderful," Ken said with a rising surge of
happiness in him. "I mean," he added in sudden confusion, "I'm glad
you've decided this is the best place to live."

He changed the subject quickly. "Dad's even talking of trying to start
up a kind of college here again. We wouldn't have the buildings, of
course, but it could be done in houses or somewhere else. He says he's
been thinking a lot about it and considers it would be our greatest
mistake to neglect the continuance of our education. So I guess you can
finish school right here.

"Personally, I think all the professors out there trying to be dirt
farmers just got tired after a couple of days of plowing and decided
something would have to be done about _that_ situation!"

Maria laughed. "Don't be too hard on them. Papa told me about the plan,
too. He says Sheriff Johnson has agreed to guarantee their pay in food
and other necessities. He's stepping down now, so there can be an
election, but he's demanding approval of that program before he leaves
office. I don't think they ought to let him go."

"He'll be re-elected," said Ken. "He's on top of the heap now. I even
heard old Hank Moss chewing out some guys in town for criticizing
Johnson!"

Ken closed down the transmitter and receiver for the night. Together, he
and Maria walked to the house. They stopped on the back porch and
glanced toward the distant projector bowls reflecting the light of the
comet and of the sun.

Soon there would be only the sun to shine in the sky. The Earth was
alive. Man was on his way up again.




About the Author


At various times, Raymond F. Jones has lived in Utah, Nevada, Arizona,
New Mexico and Texas, thereby enabling him to describe the mountain-west
community, which is the scene of his newest science fiction book, with
sureness and insight. He also has a rich scientific background, which
includes training in the fields of radio operating, and electronic
engineering, followed by meteorological work with the United States
Weather Bureau. To this kaleidoscope of places and things, Mr. Jones has
added another facet, that of "a spare-time writer" and has managed to
produce eight books, something over one hundred magazine stories,
articles and novelettes. This is his third Winston book.

The author was born in Salt Lake City where he is presently living, and
attended the University of Utah. He is now working as a researcher with
a historical society which possesses the world's largest collection of
microfilm copies of ancient documents and records. These documents have
been gathered from all parts of Europe and the United States, and Mr.
Jones is enjoying this new environment.

Mr. Jones describes the theme of THE YEAR WHEN STARDUST FELL in this
way: "It is the portrayal of the unending conflict between ignorance and
superstition on one hand, and knowledge and cultural enlightenment on
the other as they come into conflict with each other during an
unprecedented disaster brought on by the forces of nature."

Coinciding with the surge of interest in all of science, this book will
give the reader a real appreciation of the role of the scientist.

Other Winston Science Fiction Books

    PLANET OF LIGHT
    SON OF THE STARS

Other Published Books

    THE TOYMAKER RENAISSANCE
    THIS ISLAND EARTH
    THE ALIEN
    THE SECRET PEOPLE


_The Editors_


Cecile Matschat, editor of the Winston Science Fiction series, is
recognized as one of this country's most skilful writers and editors.
She has sixteen books to her credit, including the highly praised
_Suwannee River_ in the "Rivers of America" series. Nationally known as
a lecturer, an artist of great ability, Cecile Matschat is also an
expert historian. With this varied background, she is perfectly suited
to select top science fiction authors and books to make this a balanced
and well-rounded series.

Carl Carmer, consulting editor, holds an outstanding position in the
literary world. Author of _Stars Fell on Alabama_, he now edits the
popular "Rivers of America" series. Other of his books are _Genesee
Fever_, _For the Rights of Men_, _Listen for a Lonesome Drum_, and
_Windfall Fiddle_.




Other Winston Science Fiction Books


Ant Men, The by Eric North--_Geologists find living fossils in the
badlands of Central Australia_

Attack from Atlantis by Lester del Rey--_An atomic submarine crew
discovers the lost city of Atlantis_

Battle on Mercury by Erik Van Lhin--_Sun storms sweep Mercury and
threaten man's existence_

Danger: Dinosaurs! by Richard Marsten--_A treacherous big-game hunter
leads an expedition back to the Age of Reptiles_

Earthbound by Milton Lesser--_An ex-space cadet is forced to plunder
ships he was trained to protect_

Find the Feathered Serpent by Evan Hunter--_Explorers in Mexico discover
startling Mayan remains_

Five Against Venus by Philip Latham--_A Moon-bound rocket crashes in the
misty wilds of Venus_

Islands in the Sky by Arthur C. Clarke--_A teen-ager's adventures aboard
a space station_

Lost Planet, The by Paul Dallas--_Two worlds on the verge of war_

Marooned on Mars by Lester del Rey--_A teen-ager on the first
Moon-to-Mars expedition_

Missing Men of Saturn by Philip Latham--_A space crew is held prisoner
by froglike men on Saturn_

Mission to the Moon by Lester del Rey--_Scientists make man's first
journey to the Moon_

Mists of Dawn by Chad Oliver--_A space-time machine hurls a 20th-century
boy back to 50,000 B. C._

Mysterious Planet, The by Kenneth Wright--_A young captive on Planet X
prevents Earth's destruction_

Mystery of the Third Mine by Rob. Lowndes--_Prospecting in the dangerous
Asteroid belt_

Planet of Light by Raymond F. Jones--_A trip to another planet shows how
the Universe can be saved from destruction_

Rocket Jockey by Philip St. John--_A space pilot battles Martians in
rocket race_

Rocket to Luna by Richard Marsten--_A stowaway on a Moon-bound rocket
proves his worth_

Rockets to Nowhere by Philip St. John--_Scientists establish a colony on
the Moon_

Secret of Saturn's Rings, The by Donald A. Wollheim--_A scientist proves
his theories by means of a unique invention_

Secret of the Martian Moons, The by Donald A. Wollheim--_Scientists
discover the secrets of Martian civilization_

Son of the Stars by Raymond F. Jones--_An interplanetary friendship
brings Earth to the brink of destruction_

Sons of the Ocean Deeps by Bryce Walton--_Undersea terrors nearly thwart
a project aimed at saving a continent_

Star Seekers, The by Milton Lesser--_A tale of a spaceship doomed to
crash_

Step to the Stars by Lester del Rey--_The U. S. builds a space station_

Trouble on Titan by Alan E. Nourse--_A rocket experimenter discovers a
plot threatening Earth's existence_

Vandals of the Void by Jack Vance--_A tale of space pirates_

Vault of the Ages by Poul Anderson--_Life 500 years after the flaming
collapse of 20th-century civilization_

World at Bay, The by Paul Capon--_Men from another planet attack Earth_

_The year When Stardust Fell_ By RAYMOND F. JONES--A Mysterious
"Fall-Out" Paralyzes Civilization

Mayfield was the typical college town. Nothing too unusual ever happened
there until a mysterious comet was suddenly observed by the scientists
on College Hill.

And then one day the modified engine on Ken Maddox's car began
overheating mysteriously. By morning it didn't run at all.

Art's Garage, local headquarters for hot-rodders, was soon so full of
cars that wouldn't run, that Ken's science club began working in the
garage after school. It didn't take long for the club to discover that
all the moving parts on these stalled cars had fused together. Soon all
machinery had stopped in Mayfield. There was no longer any light or
power anywhere. This mysterious creeping paralysis was spreading.

The copper-yellow glow of the comet seemed to have brought the whole
world to a grinding halt. Airplanes, trains, generators and heavy
machinery were immobilized. Finally man was left with only a few
primitive tools and communication became possible only by means of
amateur radio. In the resulting chaos parts of Mayfield were burned and
looted by hunger-crazed mobs that stole and killed as they advanced.

Here is science fiction at its thrilling best. A startling and
thought-provoking book that shows how human nature might react to
catastrophe.





End of Project Gutenberg's The Year When Stardust Fell, by Raymond F. Jones

*** END OF THIS PROJECT GUTENBERG EBOOK THE YEAR WHEN STARDUST FELL ***

***** This file should be named 33660.txt or 33660.zip *****
This and all associated files of various formats will be found in:
        http://www.gutenberg.org/3/3/6/6/33660/

Produced by Greg Weeks, Roger L. Holda, Mary Meehan and
the Online Distributed Proofreading Team at
http://www.pgdp.net


Updated editions will replace the previous one--the old editions
will be renamed.

Creating the works from public domain print editions means that no
one owns a United States copyright in these works, so the Foundation
(and you!) can copy and distribute it in the United States without
permission and without paying copyright royalties.  Special rules,
set forth in the General Terms of Use part of this license, apply to
copying and distributing Project Gutenberg-tm electronic works to
protect the PROJECT GUTENBERG-tm concept and trademark.  Project
Gutenberg is a registered trademark, and may not be used if you
charge for the eBooks, unless you receive specific permission.  If you
do not charge anything for copies of this eBook, complying with the
rules is very easy.  You may use this eBook for nearly any purpose
such as creation of derivative works, reports, performances and
research.  They may be modified and printed and given away--you may do
practically ANYTHING with public domain eBooks.  Redistribution is
subject to the trademark license, especially commercial
redistribution.



*** START: FULL LICENSE ***

THE FULL PROJECT GUTENBERG LICENSE
PLEASE READ THIS BEFORE YOU DISTRIBUTE OR USE THIS WORK

To protect the Project Gutenberg-tm mission of promoting the free
distribution of electronic works, by using or distributing this work
(or any other work associated in any way with the phrase "Project
Gutenberg"), you agree to comply with all the terms of the Full Project
Gutenberg-tm License (available with this file or online at
http://gutenberg.org/license).


Section 1.  General Terms of Use and Redistributing Project Gutenberg-tm
electronic works

1.A.  By reading or using any part of this Project Gutenberg-tm
electronic work, you indicate that you have read, understand, agree to
and accept all the terms of this license and intellectual property
(trademark/copyright) agreement.  If you do not agree to abide by all
the terms of this agreement, you must cease using and return or destroy
all copies of Project Gutenberg-tm electronic works in your possession.
If you paid a fee for obtaining a copy of or access to a Project
Gutenberg-tm electronic work and you do not agree to be bound by the
terms of this agreement, you may obtain a refund from the person or
entity to whom you paid the fee as set forth in paragraph 1.E.8.

1.B.  "Project Gutenberg" is a registered trademark.  It may only be
used on or associated in any way with an electronic work by people who
agree to be bound by the terms of this agreement.  There are a few
things that you can do with most Project Gutenberg-tm electronic works
even without complying with the full terms of this agreement.  See
paragraph 1.C below.  There are a lot of things you can do with Project
Gutenberg-tm electronic works if you follow the terms of this agreement
and help preserve free future access to Project Gutenberg-tm electronic
works.  See paragraph 1.E below.

1.C.  The Project Gutenberg Literary Archive Foundation ("the Foundation"
or PGLAF), owns a compilation copyright in the collection of Project
Gutenberg-tm electronic works.  Nearly all the individual works in the
collection are in the public domain in the United States.  If an
individual work is in the public domain in the United States and you are
located in the United States, we do not claim a right to prevent you from
copying, distributing, performing, displaying or creating derivative
works based on the work as long as all references to Project Gutenberg
are removed.  Of course, we hope that you will support the Project
Gutenberg-tm mission of promoting free access to electronic works by
freely sharing Project Gutenberg-tm works in compliance with the terms of
this agreement for keeping the Project Gutenberg-tm name associated with
the work.  You can easily comply with the terms of this agreement by
keeping this work in the same format with its attached full Project
Gutenberg-tm License when you share it without charge with others.

1.D.  The copyright laws of the place where you are located also govern
what you can do with this work.  Copyright laws in most countries are in
a constant state of change.  If you are outside the United States, check
the laws of your country in addition to the terms of this agreement
before downloading, copying, displaying, performing, distributing or
creating derivative works based on this work or any other Project
Gutenberg-tm work.  The Foundation makes no representations concerning
the copyright status of any work in any country outside the United
States.

1.E.  Unless you have removed all references to Project Gutenberg:

1.E.1.  The following sentence, with active links to, or other immediate
access to, the full Project Gutenberg-tm License must appear prominently
whenever any copy of a Project Gutenberg-tm work (any work on which the
phrase "Project Gutenberg" appears, or with which the phrase "Project
Gutenberg" is associated) is accessed, displayed, performed, viewed,
copied or distributed:

This eBook is for the use of anyone anywhere at no cost and with
almost no restrictions whatsoever.  You may copy it, give it away or
re-use it under the terms of the Project Gutenberg License included
with this eBook or online at www.gutenberg.org

1.E.2.  If an individual Project Gutenberg-tm electronic work is derived
from the public domain (does not contain a notice indicating that it is
posted with permission of the copyright holder), the work can be copied
and distributed to anyone in the United States without paying any fees
or charges.  If you are redistributing or providing access to a work
with the phrase "Project Gutenberg" associated with or appearing on the
work, you must comply either with the requirements of paragraphs 1.E.1
through 1.E.7 or obtain permission for the use of the work and the
Project Gutenberg-tm trademark as set forth in paragraphs 1.E.8 or
1.E.9.

1.E.3.  If an individual Project Gutenberg-tm electronic work is posted
with the permission of the copyright holder, your use and distribution
must comply with both paragraphs 1.E.1 through 1.E.7 and any additional
terms imposed by the copyright holder.  Additional terms will be linked
to the Project Gutenberg-tm License for all works posted with the
permission of the copyright holder found at the beginning of this work.

1.E.4.  Do not unlink or detach or remove the full Project Gutenberg-tm
License terms from this work, or any files containing a part of this
work or any other work associated with Project Gutenberg-tm.

1.E.5.  Do not copy, display, perform, distribute or redistribute this
electronic work, or any part of this electronic work, without
prominently displaying the sentence set forth in paragraph 1.E.1 with
active links or immediate access to the full terms of the Project
Gutenberg-tm License.

1.E.6.  You may convert to and distribute this work in any binary,
compressed, marked up, nonproprietary or proprietary form, including any
word processing or hypertext form.  However, if you provide access to or
distribute copies of a Project Gutenberg-tm work in a format other than
"Plain Vanilla ASCII" or other format used in the official version
posted on the official Project Gutenberg-tm web site (www.gutenberg.org),
you must, at no additional cost, fee or expense to the user, provide a
copy, a means of exporting a copy, or a means of obtaining a copy upon
request, of the work in its original "Plain Vanilla ASCII" or other
form.  Any alternate format must include the full Project Gutenberg-tm
License as specified in paragraph 1.E.1.

1.E.7.  Do not charge a fee for access to, viewing, displaying,
performing, copying or distributing any Project Gutenberg-tm works
unless you comply with paragraph 1.E.8 or 1.E.9.

1.E.8.  You may charge a reasonable fee for copies of or providing
access to or distributing Project Gutenberg-tm electronic works provided
that

- You pay a royalty fee of 20% of the gross profits you derive from
     the use of Project Gutenberg-tm works calculated using the method
     you already use to calculate your applicable taxes.  The fee is
     owed to the owner of the Project Gutenberg-tm trademark, but he
     has agreed to donate royalties under this paragraph to the
     Project Gutenberg Literary Archive Foundation.  Royalty payments
     must be paid within 60 days following each date on which you
     prepare (or are legally required to prepare) your periodic tax
     returns.  Royalty payments should be clearly marked as such and
     sent to the Project Gutenberg Literary Archive Foundation at the
     address specified in Section 4, "Information about donations to
     the Project Gutenberg Literary Archive Foundation."

- You provide a full refund of any money paid by a user who notifies
     you in writing (or by e-mail) within 30 days of receipt that s/he
     does not agree to the terms of the full Project Gutenberg-tm
     License.  You must require such a user to return or
     destroy all copies of the works possessed in a physical medium
     and discontinue all use of and all access to other copies of
     Project Gutenberg-tm works.

- You provide, in accordance with paragraph 1.F.3, a full refund of any
     money paid for a work or a replacement copy, if a defect in the
     electronic work is discovered and reported to you within 90 days
     of receipt of the work.

- You comply with all other terms of this agreement for free
     distribution of Project Gutenberg-tm works.

1.E.9.  If you wish to charge a fee or distribute a Project Gutenberg-tm
electronic work or group of works on different terms than are set
forth in this agreement, you must obtain permission in writing from
both the Project Gutenberg Literary Archive Foundation and Michael
Hart, the owner of the Project Gutenberg-tm trademark.  Contact the
Foundation as set forth in Section 3 below.

1.F.

1.F.1.  Project Gutenberg volunteers and employees expend considerable
effort to identify, do copyright research on, transcribe and proofread
public domain works in creating the Project Gutenberg-tm
collection.  Despite these efforts, Project Gutenberg-tm electronic
works, and the medium on which they may be stored, may contain
"Defects," such as, but not limited to, incomplete, inaccurate or
corrupt data, transcription errors, a copyright or other intellectual
property infringement, a defective or damaged disk or other medium, a
computer virus, or computer codes that damage or cannot be read by
your equipment.

1.F.2.  LIMITED WARRANTY, DISCLAIMER OF DAMAGES - Except for the "Right
of Replacement or Refund" described in paragraph 1.F.3, the Project
Gutenberg Literary Archive Foundation, the owner of the Project
Gutenberg-tm trademark, and any other party distributing a Project
Gutenberg-tm electronic work under this agreement, disclaim all
liability to you for damages, costs and expenses, including legal
fees.  YOU AGREE THAT YOU HAVE NO REMEDIES FOR NEGLIGENCE, STRICT
LIABILITY, BREACH OF WARRANTY OR BREACH OF CONTRACT EXCEPT THOSE
PROVIDED IN PARAGRAPH 1.F.3. YOU AGREE THAT THE FOUNDATION, THE
TRADEMARK OWNER, AND ANY DISTRIBUTOR UNDER THIS AGREEMENT WILL NOT BE
LIABLE TO YOU FOR ACTUAL, DIRECT, INDIRECT, CONSEQUENTIAL, PUNITIVE OR
INCIDENTAL DAMAGES EVEN IF YOU GIVE NOTICE OF THE POSSIBILITY OF SUCH
DAMAGE.

1.F.3.  LIMITED RIGHT OF REPLACEMENT OR REFUND - If you discover a
defect in this electronic work within 90 days of receiving it, you can
receive a refund of the money (if any) you paid for it by sending a
written explanation to the person you received the work from.  If you
received the work on a physical medium, you must return the medium with
your written explanation.  The person or entity that provided you with
the defective work may elect to provide a replacement copy in lieu of a
refund.  If you received the work electronically, the person or entity
providing it to you may choose to give you a second opportunity to
receive the work electronically in lieu of a refund.  If the second copy
is also defective, you may demand a refund in writing without further
opportunities to fix the problem.

1.F.4.  Except for the limited right of replacement or refund set forth
in paragraph 1.F.3, this work is provided to you 'AS-IS' WITH NO OTHER
WARRANTIES OF ANY KIND, EXPRESS OR IMPLIED, INCLUDING BUT NOT LIMITED TO
WARRANTIES OF MERCHANTIBILITY OR FITNESS FOR ANY PURPOSE.

1.F.5.  Some states do not allow disclaimers of certain implied
warranties or the exclusion or limitation of certain types of damages.
If any disclaimer or limitation set forth in this agreement violates the
law of the state applicable to this agreement, the agreement shall be
interpreted to make the maximum disclaimer or limitation permitted by
the applicable state law.  The invalidity or unenforceability of any
provision of this agreement shall not void the remaining provisions.

1.F.6.  INDEMNITY - You agree to indemnify and hold the Foundation, the
trademark owner, any agent or employee of the Foundation, anyone
providing copies of Project Gutenberg-tm electronic works in accordance
with this agreement, and any volunteers associated with the production,
promotion and distribution of Project Gutenberg-tm electronic works,
harmless from all liability, costs and expenses, including legal fees,
that arise directly or indirectly from any of the following which you do
or cause to occur: (a) distribution of this or any Project Gutenberg-tm
work, (b) alteration, modification, or additions or deletions to any
Project Gutenberg-tm work, and (c) any Defect you cause.


Section  2.  Information about the Mission of Project Gutenberg-tm

Project Gutenberg-tm is synonymous with the free distribution of
electronic works in formats readable by the widest variety of computers
including obsolete, old, middle-aged and new computers.  It exists
because of the efforts of hundreds of volunteers and donations from
people in all walks of life.

Volunteers and financial support to provide volunteers with the
assistance they need, are critical to reaching Project Gutenberg-tm's
goals and ensuring that the Project Gutenberg-tm collection will
remain freely available for generations to come.  In 2001, the Project
Gutenberg Literary Archive Foundation was created to provide a secure
and permanent future for Project Gutenberg-tm and future generations.
To learn more about the Project Gutenberg Literary Archive Foundation
and how your efforts and donations can help, see Sections 3 and 4
and the Foundation web page at http://www.pglaf.org.


Section 3.  Information about the Project Gutenberg Literary Archive
Foundation

The Project Gutenberg Literary Archive Foundation is a non profit
501(c)(3) educational corporation organized under the laws of the
state of Mississippi and granted tax exempt status by the Internal
Revenue Service.  The Foundation's EIN or federal tax identification
number is 64-6221541.  Its 501(c)(3) letter is posted at
http://pglaf.org/fundraising.  Contributions to the Project Gutenberg
Literary Archive Foundation are tax deductible to the full extent
permitted by U.S. federal laws and your state's laws.

The Foundation's principal office is located at 4557 Melan Dr. S.
Fairbanks, AK, 99712., but its volunteers and employees are scattered
throughout numerous locations.  Its business office is located at
809 North 1500 West, Salt Lake City, UT 84116, (801) 596-1887, email
business@pglaf.org.  Email contact links and up to date contact
information can be found at the Foundation's web site and official
page at http://pglaf.org

For additional contact information:
     Dr. Gregory B. Newby
     Chief Executive and Director
     gbnewby@pglaf.org


Section 4.  Information about Donations to the Project Gutenberg
Literary Archive Foundation

Project Gutenberg-tm depends upon and cannot survive without wide
spread public support and donations to carry out its mission of
increasing the number of public domain and licensed works that can be
freely distributed in machine readable form accessible by the widest
array of equipment including outdated equipment.  Many small donations
($1 to $5,000) are particularly important to maintaining tax exempt
status with the IRS.

The Foundation is committed to complying with the laws regulating
charities and charitable donations in all 50 states of the United
States.  Compliance requirements are not uniform and it takes a
considerable effort, much paperwork and many fees to meet and keep up
with these requirements.  We do not solicit donations in locations
where we have not received written confirmation of compliance.  To
SEND DONATIONS or determine the status of compliance for any
particular state visit http://pglaf.org

While we cannot and do not solicit contributions from states where we
have not met the solicitation requirements, we know of no prohibition
against accepting unsolicited donations from donors in such states who
approach us with offers to donate.

International donations are gratefully accepted, but we cannot make
any statements concerning tax treatment of donations received from
outside the United States.  U.S. laws alone swamp our small staff.

Please check the Project Gutenberg Web pages for current donation
methods and addresses.  Donations are accepted in a number of other
ways including checks, online payments and credit card donations.
To donate, please visit: http://pglaf.org/donate


Section 5.  General Information About Project Gutenberg-tm electronic
works.

Professor Michael S. Hart is the originator of the Project Gutenberg-tm
concept of a library of electronic works that could be freely shared
with anyone.  For thirty years, he produced and distributed Project
Gutenberg-tm eBooks with only a loose network of volunteer support.


Project Gutenberg-tm eBooks are often created from several printed
editions, all of which are confirmed as Public Domain in the U.S.
unless a copyright notice is included.  Thus, we do not necessarily
keep eBooks in compliance with any particular paper edition.


Most people start at our Web site which has the main PG search facility:

     http://www.gutenberg.org

This Web site includes information about Project Gutenberg-tm,
including how to make donations to the Project Gutenberg Literary
Archive Foundation, how to help produce our new eBooks, and how to
subscribe to our email newsletter to hear about new eBooks.
